2
CHAPTER I.
I was
born in one of the eastern cities, and was the sixth
of eleven children, of poor parents. When I was about
six years of age, my family emigrated to Kentucky, then
considered the far west. At the end of six years, my
father failed in business; and as he was now entirely too
poor to provide for his large family, those that were deemed
old enough sought employment to support themselves.
Nor were they wholly unprepared for the exigency; for
our honored parent, in more propitious times, had placed
the proper estimate upon the importance of education, and
from the time we were old enough to go to school, until
the loss of his fortune, (and every dollar was honorably
offered up to his creditors,) we had excellent preceptors.
Being unluckily the sixth child, I was not so far advanced
in the books as my seniors, when the disaster alluded to
befell usbut as I had the advantage of my five juniors,
there was no just cause of complaint. I had the rudiments
of a good English education, and an insatiable passion for
books, which they deemed quite sufficient for the very
humble part it seemed I was destined to play in the great
drama of life.
Two of my sisters that were older than myself, were
married about the time of our misfortunes; and soon after,
three of my brothers (all my seniors) left home to seek
their fortunes. My father then leased a farm of moderate
dimensions, and made no scruple to toil himself, in quest
of an honest livelihood. His creditors, convinced of his
unimpeachable integrity, were indulgent, and suffered him
to retain a male and female servant, in the hope that he
would at no distant day be enabled to liquidate the balance
of their claims, without being under the necessity of
subjecting
him to total destitution. My father, the colored
boy, and myself (I being now some twelve years of age),
cultivated the fields, while my mother superintended the
garden, the raising of poultry, and all the other matters
pertaining to the house and its immediate vicinity.
During the first year all was novelty and happiness.
Farmer Shortfield (the name of my honored father), was
distinguished in the neighborhood for his theoretical
knowledge
of agriculture, (which is so seldom made available
in practice,) and for his excessive delight in rural pursuits.
For my part, I must have the candor to confess, that a few
months sufficed to cool my zeal, and to dampen my ardor
in the use of the hoe and the plough. But I never grew
weary of my country abodeit was a mere repugnance to
labor. No one ever found keener enjoyment in the sight
of green fields, ripening fruit, wild flowers and clear
running
streams, than myself. Each spreading tree was to me
a canopy in Eden; and I was too often surprised by my
indignant father reposing under them, musing over the
pages of some entertaining book, while the old mare at the
plough was playing havoc with the corn. What in the
world are you doing there, Luke? was the exclamation of
my father, which often saluted my astonished ears while
absorbed in such visions of enchantment. And the
exclamation
was frequently, and never amiss, succeeded by
the shrill whistle of the birch across my shoulders. My
father was not severe in his chastisements, only being
impelled
by a sense of duty; and I have more than once seen
his assumed austerity completely overthrown by my ludicrous
expressions of astonishment, on being so suddenly subjected
to the lash in the midst of my empyreal fancies. On such
occasions, I have seen him turn his face away to hide a
smile.
Matters went on thus for several years, without any
incidents
worthy of narration. My repugnance to useful
labor never diminished, although I never hesitated to exert
myself in the way of sport. I had a fondness for angling
and shooting, and would walk or wade from morning till
night in pursuit of such pleasures as these sports would
afford. I preferred to pursue them alone, so that my
solitary
meditations should not be subjected to interruption.
And I may say that these tastes and habits of my boyhood
have remained unchanged throughout my eventful life.
But I must hasten through the intervening space to the
time when I became a western merchant. The experiment
in agriculture did not prove successful. I was not
destined
to be a farmer. It was proposed that I should learn
a trade. I consented to be a printer, and my father made,
or was about making, application to have me bound to Mr.
Francis P. Blair, who published a paper in Frankfort, when
a letter was received from a lawyer, who was the clerk of
the court of a neighboring county, and who had been
informed
(by whom I never knew) of my passion for
reading
,
proposing that I should become a deputy in his office.
For my services, he agreed to board and clothe me;
besides
,
I was to have the use of his excellent library, and
the benefit of his instruction in the study of the law. Being
left free to choose which pursuit I would follow, my
inclination
jumped with the last proposition, and so I embraced it.
I remember it as yesterday. After receiving the
admonitions
and blessings of my parents, I resolutely set out
alone, and on foot, to traverse the country some thirty miles,
in a direction I had never traveled before. I had a couple
of biscuits in my pocket, and two or three shirts in a cotton
handkerchief. I had not more than one dollar in money.
But I was confident of a bright future. I had read of many
poor boys who, by dint of their own exertions, achieved
wealth and distinction; and as my father had convinced me
that my future welfare depended altogether upon the
success
of my own efforts, I had resolved to struggle manfully
for myself. When I had gone about two miles, and had
ceased to meet with any one I knew, or who knew me, as
a matter both of economy and convenience, I transferred
my shoes from my feet to the stick upon my shoulder; and
dismissing every thought of my humble condition from my
mind, resumed my journey with unwonted animation and
cheerfulness. It was a lovely morning in June. The sky
was brightyea, brighter, and the air more exhilarating,
than I have since known them to be in the boasted climes
of the European continent. Such, at least, has been my
experience. The birds sang merrily in every hedge, and
on every tree; and the bright rays of the sun streaming down
through the interstices of the over-hanging sugar maples,
were filled with golden insects. Never shallnever can
that day of my most utter destitution be banished from my
mind. It was the happiest day of my life. For no sooner
had my sad thoughts at parting passed away, than they
2*
were succeeded by a train of bright fancies, which
completely
bereft me of all consciousness of my really pitiful
and forlorn condition. As if by the influence of some
potent spell, I saw myself grown to man's estate. I was
rich, or at least had sufficient wealth to command every
luxury I desired. I was successful as a pleader and orator.
I was married to the being of my choice, (and in reality, I
had at that early age chosen my bride, although she was
my senior, and had never received the slightest intimation
of my intentions,) and finally, pictured myself returning in
my own coach to my delighted parents, and receiving the
congratulations of all my kindred and friends. Such is a
mere outline of the wild, extravagant conceit of my boyish
imagination. The details of that stupendous fancy-piece
occupied my mind the whole day, and my steps never
grew weary. I have here dwelt upon that day-dream
perhaps
too long, because it is my habit often to revert to it.
It was to some extent a true vision. Many of the ideal
enjoyments then revealed to me, subsequently became
reality
.
But there were no reverses, none of the stings of
disappointment, shame and misery, in that bright picture,
which were encountered in after life. Yet had I never
departed from the path which the pious care of my parents
had pointed out for me to pursue; had I never for a
moment
been tempted by the alluring and delusive
blandishments
of the Evil One, to do an act incompatible with the
precepts of morality and religion; or at any time omitted
to do that which I should have donealthough my
transgressions
have not been more numerous, or more flagrant,
perhaps, than those with which a majority of mankind may
be justly reproachedit is my deliberate conviction that
every desirable particular of my prophetic vision would
have been fully realized. And I trust the young reader,
particularly, who may be cast upon the world without
fortune
,
will derive profit from the lesson of my experience.
I arrived at the place of destination about sunset, and
after a refreshing sleep, rose the next morning full of vigor
and hope. I was easily instructed in my duties, and soon
installed in the office. I became an efficient deputy to my
employer or patron, in an unusually short space of time
and before many months had passed, was able to discharge
all the duties of my principal, when business required
his presence elsewhere. The duties were not onerous.
They consisted principally in the recording of deeds and
wills; and as I was expeditious with my pen, I had about
two-thirds of my time to devote to reading. And here I
would warn the young reader against an error I fell into.
I read too rapidly and too much, without sufficient
meditation
,
or exercise. I was more intent upon gleaning new
ideas and new incidents, by running in rapid succession
through the volumes before me, than judiciously digesting
and thoroughly comprehending what I had already perused.
This was a great defect in my early reading, which I have
had reason to deplore ever since. And my taste (all
unguided
as it was) gave a decided preference to historical
and miscellaneous works, instead of the law books. In
less than two years I had galloped through the history of
Greece, of Rome, of England, (Hume and Smollett's large
volumes,) of the United States, and several hundred
volumes
of romances, poetry, &c.; and when I had
accomplished
all this, I had but a very imperfect and confused
recollection of the contents of any of them, except the
latter. And during all this time, I had not gone through
the four volumes (the old edition) of Blackstone! But
now, as I had read everything else in the library, I was in
a manner forced to go through with my legal studies. In
vain I essayed to correct the error of hasty and superficial
study. The habit was fixed upon me, never to be entirely
removed. I made an abstract of Blackstone, and all the
other books put into the hands (at that time) of the law
student. I had all the principles and points, upon which
the student was usually examined, committed to memory,
and could repeat them verbatim, like a parrot, and
understood
them about as well. However, my preceptor
examined
me, and pronounced me capable of answering all
the questions likely to be propounded by the judges. I
had studied as long, and probably nearly as well, as most
of the young lawyers of that day were in the habit of doing.
But then there was one obstacle in my way which I had
not hitherto thought of, and no one, until then, had
apprised
me of it. I could not practice in any of the courts
until I was twenty-one years of age; and, as I lacked
several
years of the prescribed figure, and was becoming very
impatient to be doing something more than merely earning
my victuals and clothes, I wrote a letter to my brother
Joseph, whose lot had cast him into the then wilderness of
Missouri, and who was now getting a very good salary in
a store, in the main village on the river, stating the
particulars
of my condition, and my anxiety to do something
for myself, and for the benefit of our aged and indigent
parents.
In due course of mail, (which was more tedious then
than now,) my brother Joseph's answer came to hand.
He advised me by all means to join him in Missouri, and
stated that his generous employer had been so well pleased
with his conduct, that he designed sending him, with a
branch of his establishment, to a new town about to be
erected farther up the river, and for his services was to
give him one-half of the profits. He said he would need
a clerk; and that I, no doubt, would answer his purpose.
He enclosed me fifty dollars to defray my expenses thither,
which were to be repaid out of my salary. My salary was
to be one hundred and twenty dollars the first year, besides
my boardto be increased the next; and he had no doubt
I would, in the course of a very few years, obtain an
interest
in some one of the numerous establishments then
springing up in all directions. My mind was made up to
go to this new El Dorado, provided my parents consented.
I consulted my preceptor, who neither advised me to go
nor persuaded me to stay; he was a conscientious and
upright
man; he acknowledged his inability to decide which
would be the best course for me to pursue; and so he
referred
me to the counsel of my parents.
An unpleasant occurrence in the office about this time,
confirmed my desire to abandon my official station of
deputy
clerk, and was well nigh involving my principal in
difficulty. It was the law (and I believe it is so still), that
every one entering into the holy state of matrimony, should
first procure a written license from the county court clerk's
office. It sometimes happened that the parties applying
were strangers to the clerk or his deputy, and not
unfrequently
they were inhabitants of some other county. If
either of the parties were under twenty-one years of age, it
was necessary to have the consent of the parent or
guardian
,
and if the clerk issued his license without this
requisition
having been complied with, he was liable to a heavy
penalty. On one or two occasions I had detected and
defeated
fraudulent attempts to procure licenses. They had
attempted to palm off on me counterfeit parents and
guardians
,
without success; and as I had been complimented
for my sagacity, I felt a little proud of my acute
discrimination
in such delicate cases. One day, however, I met
with more than my match, in a pretty, sprightly girl of
sixteen
.
She was one of a party of four or five males and
females
from a neighboring county, who entered my office
early one morning in November. She was the first to
speak, and as I remember the dialogue distinctly, I will
repeat it verbatim.
Miss H.
Well, Mr. Shortfield, I suppose you know what
we are after?
Mr. S.
A license, of course; but you can't be
accommodated
for four or five years to come.
Miss H.
How can you tell? Perhaps my father won't
wish to keep me waiting so longor suppose you were to
fall in love with mewhat then? Would you postpone
your own happiness?
Mr. S.
(considerably confused.) In the latter event, I
would, if unsuccessful in obtaining your father's consent,
run off with you to the Gretna Green, in Ohio, opposite
Maysville.
Miss H.
Oh, but I would not consent to that. I have
read of too many false priests and faithless lovers. I don't
think I would trust you. I would rather rely upon my
own wit to get the license. I could do it! Woman's wit
can cheat the very old boy!
Mr. S.
Yes, but woman's youth and beauty could hardly
be mistaken by any clerk for age and wrinkles. (As I
said this, I glanced at a female seated beside her, who was
to be the bride in this instance, and who bore unmistakable
signs of being upwards of forty.)
Miss H.
Better late than neverdon't you say so, aunt?
The Aunt
. But it's not so very late with me, I'm sure.
Yet I suppose he will make no scruple about my age.
Mr. S.
Oh no! And yet I cannot perceive the
necessity
of one of your years running away from home to get
married.
The Groom, who was about thirty years of age
. I will
explain that to you. Her father and I had a personal
difficulty
,
and he forbade me the house.
Mr. S.
But the clerk of your own county could have no
objection to issue the license, seeing you are both of age.
Miss H.
But then the
romance
of the thing, Mr. S.;
consider
that. I said there ought to be a clandestine marriage,
and there shall be. I always loved runaway matches,
although I would not run away myself, and I am
determined
to enjoy the fun of this one. So just go to work,
Mr. Deputy. I only wish my aunt was about seventeen,
so that I could give you a specimen of woman's wit. I
would cheat you, as sure as you live. I have heard all
about your keenness in detecting cheats, but then the
men
undertook the business.
Mr. S.
And I should like to have an opportunity to try
your wit. If it was yourself, instead of your aunt, you
would certainly have to return without a husband.
Miss H.
That I wouldn't! I'd have the license, and a
magistrate, and be married in this very room, in spite of
you!
This vehement outburst produced much merriment. I
proceeded without farther colloquy to fill up the blanks,
and on asking the name of the lady, the aunt, forcing a
blush, came forward and said, Juliet Frances Hamilton.
The license was duly signed, and delivered to the groom.
About this time the lively young girl complained of a
sudden
indisposition, and asked me in a beseeching tone if I
could procure her a glass of
fresh
water. As I rose to get
the glass, I perceived two men standing outside of the
office near the back window, which roused my suspicions
that there was something mysterious, if not wrong, in the
proceeding. I ran across the street, however, for the water,
and returned in the space of about three minutes, having
been detained that length of time by the young man of
whom I obtained it, who insisted upon giving the glass a
thorough washing. When I entered, I saw that the two
gentlemen who had been standing behind the office, had
joined the party within, and one of them was a
magistrate
of the place, noted for his practical jokes.
It's all over now, Mr. S., said Miss H., when she
took the glass from her lips, her pallor being now succeeded
by one of the most crimson blushes I ever beheld.
I am glad you have recovered, said I; you certainly
look better than you did.
That is not what I mean, she replied; I mean the
wedding
is over. You must excuse hastebut we were
really too impatient to wait till you got backwere we
not, husband? And as she said this, she clasped the arm
of the groom. The truth then flashed upon me at once.
The aunt had assumed the name of the niece, and the young
girl had planned and executed a cheat upon me, sure
enough! That was the last license issued by me. The
party was not overtaken by the girl's father for several
weeks. But the groom's friends mustered in his defence,
and after several gun-shots, and some wounds, the couple
were left together without farther molestation. The parent,
however, for several months, had it in contemplation to
commence legal proceedings against the clerk.
CHAPTER II.
After
mature deliberation, my parents consented that I
might join my elder brother in Missouri. Joseph was the
pioneer of the family, and Providence seemed to crown his
efforts with success. While I was building castles in the
air, he had already amassed enough money to purchase our
aged parents a substantial and comfortable dwelling in the
village. And he was now about to begin business for
himself
,
with a fair prospect of earning as many hard dollars
in reality, as the imaginary ones I had been dreaming
about.
Presto! change!
No one had a greater facility of
abandoning
old schemes, and launching his ideas in new
channels
,
than myself. This I attribute partly to my desultory
reading, and partly to the instability of my natural
disposition
.
No doubt for this cause I have failed in many
undertakings
,
which might have had a successful termination,
had they been perseveringly prosecuted. I have often
been reproached for the habit, and exhorted to be patient.
But it has had its advantages too; for it has more than once
instigated me to abandon bad practices, and impolitic
pursuits
,
which, if persisted in, might have terminated in
inglorious
death, or in hopeless bankruptcy.
My back was now completely turned upon the law. I
sought no more the deep solitude of the woods to practice
Demosthenic oratory. I consigned to the flames nearly all
of my juvenile manuscripts, and put off all my philosophical,
historical and poetical aspirations. Even at that early age
I had sent to the publishers of periodicals more than one
3
specimen of my compositions, to which no manner of
attention
had been paid. I was now determined to be a
merchant, a millionaire, and nothing else. And when I
returned with my princely equipage, my trunks stowed
full of U. S. Bank notes, perhaps, Miss Blanche would
not hesitate to be my bride. But she would certainly have
hesitated then; and her family made no effort to conceal
their repugnance to my intimacy with her. Hers was one
of the first families, while mine was in the category of
the opposite extreme. She had a snug independence,
while I had nothing certain but the very dubious future
before me. I suffered the throes of disappointed true
loveand I believe the first love of boys of that age
happens
,
in a majority of cases, as mine did, to be fixed upon
objects somewhat older than themselves. And, as in my
case, the affection is pretty generally reciprocated. Blanche,
of course, would not marry me; and in truth I had not the
impudence to ask her; but she could easily read all the
unmistakable
signs in my eyes and visage, of a growing
passion
;
and, in turn she was kind enough to permit me to
understand that I was not indifferent to her. This thought
was a constant solace to me during several long years of
absence. But we will let the scroll of the future unroll
itself.
Once more I was upon the highway, trudging along in
solitude, with my bundle at my back. This time I was
not quite so oblivious as formerly of my condition, nor so
happy in my meditations. Once or twice, as I thought of
Blanche, and deplored my cruel fate, a moisture
momentarily
dimmed my eyes. But such emotions could not long
hold one of my temperament. With a rather unusual
fierceness and vehemence, I resolved to make my way in
the world, and to obtain wealth, which, I began to perceive,
was the great talisman by which man's worldly objects are
secured.
I reached Claysville, on the Licking river, about dark,
which was not half the distance I had walked when I set
out from the parental roof on the former occasion. This
time I was tired, and had no appetite. My brother Jacob
(another elder brother) dwelt at Claysville. He was a
merchant in a small way, having bought his goods in
Cincinnati
on credit. He informed me that business was
dull, and it was probable his creditors would sell him out
before long under the hammer, unless some good luck
turned up in his behalf. He likewise expected to be
married
in a few weeks. Both events came to pass shortly
after my departure.
At Claysville, I embarked on a flat boat loaded with
produce for Cincinnati, the Licking river emptying into
the Ohio, opposite that city. And now I was afloat upon
the water, in a rude craft, and among profane men, who
devoted all their time, when not working at the oars, to
cardsmen whom I had never seen before, and whose
manners and conversation were coarse and vulgar in the
extreme. For two days and nights I realized fully the
horrors of one of my age in so forlorn a condition. In
vain they strove to rally my spirits; I was plunged into
deep dejection. They were not really dishonest or vicious
in their naturesindeed they manifested genuine
compassion
for mebut still I had never before been thrown
among such rough associates, or subjected to such fare as
sufficed for them. However, before we arrived at the
mouth of the river, I became more cheerful, as I reflected
upon the necessity I was under to make the most of the
circumstances in which I was placed.
When we arrived at the mouth of the river, I paid the
flat boat captain three dollars for my passage, and hailing
a skiff, I went over to the city, and put up at a hotel. I
bought a trunk, in which I packed my clothes; and, as I
was now in buoyant spirits, everything around being novel
to me, and wearing a cheerful aspect, I joined a company
of young men going that evening to the show. This was
the celebrated Infernal Regions, which I believe they
keep there still. It was a place representing the abode of
the damned. The clanking of chains, hissing of winged
serpents, groans of the tormented, grins of the infernal
spirits
,
and all represented in appalling
propria person;
to say
nothing of the muttering thunder, the flashing lightning,
the sulphurous odors, &c., altogether made up a spectacle
well worthy of its expressive appellation. Many of us, on
first beholding this artificial pandemonium and its
appendages
,
were thrilled with affright; but the scene soon
became
familiar to us, and we then amused ourselves by
marking the effect produced on the countenances of the
new visitors. One of the recesses containing some of the
vilest sinners, was surrounded by a steel railing, which
was kept charged by a concealed galvanic battery. The
company were requested not to touch that railing, and most
of them, being in the secret, kept aloof. One of the
visitors
,
however, being a rough boatman, and in the western
phrase, pretty well corned, soon forgot the injunction,
and unconsciously placed his hand upon the metal to steady
himself. Instantaneously he was knocked down by the
shock. This produced a burst of laughter at his expense.
When he arose, he turned round with an air of defiance,
and shook his fists at the company. As no one seemed
inclined to accept his challenge, presently he very
deliberately
leaned upon the railing again. Again he was
knocked down. This time, when he arose, he pulled off
his coat, vest and hat, and throwing them in different
directions
,
while the company roared with laughter, exclaimed:
Now, come on! Some one of you has knocked me down
twice, and if he has any part of a man's spirit in him, he'll
stand up to me face to face, and have a fair fight. We
all laughed outright, which only enraged him the more.
At length he was informed of his mistake, but not
convinced
of it, as he could not comprehend the
modus
operandi
of the fluid. He was conveyed out by some of his
companions, swearing, and uttering direful threats; and
soon afterwards, we all returned to our lodgings, highly
delighted
with the entertainment, and somewhat shocked to
think there was in reality, a prototype of the place we had
viewed, into which we might ultimately be plunged, sure
enough. I have often thought that this exhibition was
calculated to do the rising generation some service. But
no one of very weak nerves should venture to behold it.
The next morning I went on board the first steamer I
ever saw. It was the old low pressure Belvidere, with the
cabin below, and only separated from the engine by a slight
board partition. Being a mere stripling in appearance, and
there being but few passengers engaged, the captain charged
me only about half-price for the passage to St. Louis,
twelve dollarsnow one can go from Pittsburgh to St. Louis
for ten dollars. The novelty of my condition, new and
strange objects being hourly presented to my view, soon
banished all painful thoughts from my mind. The
captain's
son, the clerk of the boat, was about my age, and we
were soon as intimate as old friends. Even then, as is too
often the case now, the boat remained several days over
the time appointed for it to start; and during that time I
was, of course, boarded and lodged without expense. And
it was well it was so, for after making some essential
additions
3*
to my wardrobe, and having paid my passage money
in advance to secure my berththere were no state rooms
thenthere remained barely sufficient cash in my purse to
pay my expenses by stage coach, from St. Louis to the
place of my destination. During this delay I felt no
impatience
,
for I was getting initiated into the mysteries of
life upon the river, which afforded a constant fund of
excitement
.
At night some would go to the theatre, or other
place of amusement, while others remained on board, and
amused themselves with cards, or other games. I declined
the invitations to join any of these parties, partly from the
condition of my finances, and partly because I occasionally
witnessed among them some reckless exhibitions of
depravity
,
to which I had not been accustomed.
At length the Belvidere departed on her way down the
Ohio, and the second day we arrived at Louisville. By
this time I had become acquainted with all the officers and
most of the passengers on board; and I went out in
company
with some of them, the engineer, pilot, and the
captain's
son, on an excursion to see the city. They led me
into several places of bad resort, such as low tippling
houses, &c.; but could not induce me to partake with them.
They, however, induced me to indulge in a visit to the
theatre; as they assured me, after a nice calculation of the
expenses to the end of my journey, (I having
inconsiderately
exhibited to them the whole amount of my funds,)
that I had sufficient means and need not stint myself. This
was the first time I had ever witnessed a performance on
the stage, and as the piece enacted happened to exemplify
the tricks of miscreant sharpers upon unsuspecting
strangers
,
it had the good effect of rousing my suspicions, and
making me more cautious and guarded in my intercourse
with those in whose company I had been thrown. In vain
they attempted to inveigle me into a farther exploration of
the premises and vicinity; I refused them with some
emphasis
,
and at the hazard of giving offence, I embraced the
first opportunity of withdrawing from them unperceived.
I left the theatre, alone, before the performance was
over, and endeavored to find my way back to the boat.
This was no easy thing to accomplish, for it was dark and
raining. I wandered about for more than an hour in quest
of the wharf, and to no purpose, although I sought
information
of every one I met. Their directions seemed to be
contradictory, or I was incapable of comprehending them.
I was now quite unhappy. My own calculations as to the
sufficiency of my means to carry me to the end of my
journey
,
did not satisfy me; and I was not without
apprehensions
of being robbed, if not murdered, in the streets. At
length I found the Belvidere, and also found my
companions
,
who had arrived first, by a more direct route, and
who had remained till the end of the play; which, by
computation
,
proved that I had been wandering about to no
purpose for more than an hour. The only revenge they
took for my abrupt desertion of them, was an unfounded
conjecture that I had been engaged in an affair of gallantry.
This wounded me a little, which only increased their mirth.
My solemn protestations of innocence attracted the notice
of one of the passengers, who had hitherto secluded
himself
as much as possible from the company. This was
General
Ashley, a member of Congress, from Missouri, as I
learned during the last day of the voyage. He was an
extremely
slim, tall man, advanced in years; his complexion
was dark, his countenance grave and dignified, and its
expression
enhanced by a pair of the blackest and most
lustrous
eyes I ever beheld. They are only quizzing you,
young man, said he; your ingenuous denial of the
charge is sufficient to convince me, for one, of your
innocence
.
This was said in a soothing tone, and at once
attached me to the general. And he seemed to take a
special liking to me. On learning that I was going to
Missouri, he said that he was a resident of that state, and
was pleased to see young men of intelligence going thither.
I can easily excuse the compliment of the politician, when
I reflect upon the service he did me. He afforded me
valuable information in regard to the country; and besides,
did me another favor, as will be seen in the sequel, for
which he deserved my lasting gratitude.
The next morning, there being an abundance of water
in the river, we crossed over the boiling falls without
difficulty
or accident, and proceeded on our way. At that
time there were more snags in the river than at present,
and although steamboats were not so numerous, yet
disasters
were by no means unfrequent. There was a portly
Roman Catholic priest on board, who frequently expressed
to me his apprehensions of danger, but always in a cheerful
and half bantering manner. While he kept aloof from the
rest of the passengers, he was very communicative with
me. I conceived a liking for him, for there was a
simplicity
in his conversation that charmed me. He had been
long a resident of Maryland, and was now going to the
diocese of Missouri. He amused me with a recital of many
of his adventures in this country, (he was a foreigner by
birth,) in which was mingled no little humor, which served
to pass the time agreeably; but there was never anything
in his anecdotes derogatory of his sacred calling. The first
night after leaving Louisville, (where the priest embarked,)
the boat was impeded a good deal by the masses of drift
wood floating on the surface, and it was necessary
sometimes
to stop the engine, (there was but one engine then,)
to prevent the wheels from being broken by the logs, and
sometimes whole trees, drifting about us. About ten
o'clock P. M., when the priest proposed to retire, he
ascertained
to his discomfort that he had been allotted a berth
in the immediate vicinity of the wheel house. In vain he
expostulated with the clerk: all the most desirable berths
had been taken by the other passengers, and the officers of
the boat. But he submitted to his fate with a good grace,
remarking, if any mishap befalls me, I shall lay the blame
at your door. The clerk replied: Yes; and if a snag
should happen to send you to the devil before morning,
you may tell the old boy it was my fault. I tendered my
berth to the priest, which he peremptorily declined taking.
The old gentleman very deliberately disrobed himself, and
after a brief prayer sought repose in the place that had been
assigned him. An hour afterwards I followed his example,
as did most of the passengers.
We had not been asleep many minutes, before we were
all startled by a terrific crash, and springing to our feet,
we beheld with dismay a huge snag, as large in diameter
as a flour barrel, protruding some ten feet through the side
of the cabin, and directly through the berth that had been
occupied by the priest! Perceiving the old gentleman
lying on the floor, I ran to him to ascertain the extent of
his injuries, when to my surprise he rose up, still smiling,
with an ebony crucifix in his hand, and declared that he
felt no pain, and thought that he had received no hurt.
The engine was instantly stopped, and it was ascertained
that the snag had broken off at the water's edge, without
doing farther injury than disabling the wheel and making
an ugly hole through the side of the cabin. The pilot had
run upon the snag on the right hand, while deviating from
his course to avoid a floating tree on the larboard side.
The obtruding timber was soon removed by the carpenters,
when we reached the shore, where we remained the rest
of the night undergoing repairs. It was ascertained sure
enough that the priest was uninjured, notwithstanding he
had been knocked some fifteen feet from his berth; and
what was more extraordinary still, his watch, which had
been cast as far in another direction, was likewise
uninjured
,
and running. But the greatest miracle of all was,
that his money, which he had carried loosely in his pocket,
consisting of gold and silver coins, and which had been
scattered in every direction, was all recovered. Instead
of venting reproaches on the clerk, the good old man
uttered
nothing but exclamations of joy, that he had been so
signally spared. The only request he made, was to be
permitted to place his mattress on the floor of the cabin,
and sleep there, which was accorded him.
For several days there was no other incident worth
remembering
,
and the voyage became tedious. At that day
it was the universal practice on the western rivers, for the
passengers to pass away the time at cards. Even my
friend the general, made one at a game, and invited me to
join the party. I did not refuse, as we played merely for
amusement. I knew but little of whist, or any other game,
but they soon taught me to play pretty well; and I confess
it was not long before I conceived a fondness for that
species
of amusement.
The night before we reached St. Louis, while we were
lying at the shore, the pilot, engineer and captain's son,
induced me to join them in a game of loo, not for money,
but simply for grains of coffee. The old general sat a
small distance apart, looking on, but said nothing. Two
or three times successively I succeeded in winning all the
grains. At last the engineer, (a man of gigantic size, who
is yet living, I believe,) said that kind of a game was
child's play, and that he would play no more, unless the
grains were to represent something, he cared not how small
the value. I was flushed with my success, and being
unwilling
to relinquish the sport, agreed that we should begin
again, with sixteen grains each, each grain representing
a picayune, and the pilot should be the banker. This was
satisfactory, and so the game went on. My success
continued
,
and by degrees the most of the coffee found its way
to my side of the board. When one after another found
himself broken, I perceived, without making any
objection
,
for I was winning it all, that he replenished his means
by handing an additional dollar to the banker, and getting
sixteen more grains. Of course it was not long before the
tide turned, as they were all confederated to pluck me.
Soon my winnings were all gone, and I found myself minus
the dollar originally invested. I betrayed some anxiety,
but did not, in my eagerness, hesitate to invest another
dollar, hoping for a return of my good luck. But I hoped
in vain. Dollar after dollar disappeared, and my very
fingers trembled with excitement. When I perceived that
I had nothing remaining but a five dollar bill, in agony of
heart I rose from the table, and declared I would play no
more. I said I had done wrong, and confessed that I
deserved
to lose my money. It was in vain they attempted
to persuade me that by venturing a little more, I might get
it all back again. I had ventured too far already. I told
them that the bill was all I had left, and as that would not
suffice to pay my stage fare, I intended to undergo the
penance
of completing my journey on foot. But I had not
sounded the depth of my losses yet. Upon reckoning up
the number of grains on the table, it was found that there
were some sixty-four more than had been paid for. So
there had been cheating round that board. Although I
certainly had no participation in that part of the game, I
was reluctantly constrained to pay my proportion of the
deficiency
,
which bereft me of another dollar.
I turned away in disgust from this, the first instance of
my gambling; and when the party dispersed, General
Ashley
remarked to me, that my pluckers were a set of
swindlers
,
and that the officers of many of the boats at that time,
were pretty much of the same description, depending more
upon making money in that way from unwary passengers,
than by their salaries. In reply to a suggestion of mine,
he said it would be best not to molest them, but to leave
it to time and experience to correct the evil. He then
tendered
me as a loan the amount of money he supposed I
would need, which I inconsiderately declined taking.
When we reached St. Louis, on, I believe, the tenth day, it
was getting dark. I separated from the crowd on landing
and set out alone, entire stranger as I was, in quest of
cheap lodgings. I went up Main street, at that time quite
a different looking avenue from what it is now, until I came
to a small hotel, or rather tavern, on the right hand side.
I forget whether it was the United States, the Eagle,
or the Washington; but I remember that it was a
diminutive
,
dirty concern. After agreeing upon terms, I
returned
with a porter to the boat, and removed my baggage
to my new quarters. No chamber was given me; there
was not so much as a parlor or sitting room; and all the
guests were packed into the bar-room, which was filled
with the fumes of tobacco, and the worse odors of
adulterated
liquors. There were not even chairs to sit on; only
rude benches, without backs. And to add to my
discomfort
,
the already riotous and profane company present was
joined by the pilot and engineer of the Belvidere. Not
long after they entered, the bell rang for supper, and I
mechanically
followed the rough herd to a back room, where
a table was scantily furnished, adorned with the dark
fragments
of dilapidated crockery, broken and rusty knives and
forks, and surrounded with long greasy benches, similar to
those in the bar-room. There were black coffee, black
bread, fried potatoes and cabbage, and a most overwhelming
odor of onions and garlic. I sat down; but did not desire
the waiter to holp meand as I did not ask for
anything
,
of course I got nothing.
When I rose from the table, I sallied out, dark as it was,
and somewhat inclement, (it was February,) to endeavor to
find something in the novelty of the scene to dissipate my
painfully gloomy thoughts. Chance directed my steps to
the Post-office, and to my half-furtive inquiry for letters,
to my surprise one was handed me. I read it by the light
of the lamp near the window. It was from Blanche, and
ran thus:
Luke
(there had been a Dear prefixed,
which had been rubbed out, and substituted by a Dr.
which had likewise been obliterated, before sealing the
letter
)I
suppose you will be astonished to receive this
letter from me; you know I promised only to reply to your
letters; but I have just been thinking how unhappy and
forlorn one must be in your condition, alone in the world,
so far from home, among strangers; and I could not resist
the inclination to throw into your sad lot a single little
grain of comfort, provided a cheering word from your old
school-mate Blanche, would suffice. I am aware what a
botheration the discovery of my conduct would occasion
in my uncle's family; but still, as I have a monitor within
which tells me there can be no great harm in it, I am bold
enough to write the first letter, inasmuch as it is not a love
letter. It is nothing of the kind, Luke. I am merely your
4
friend, which you must distinctly understand. It will be
many years, perhaps, before you will be in a condition to
marry any one; and by that time, if I were to remain
single
,
they would be calling me an old maid. No, Luke, I
am not even dreaming of love matters; I only want to
encourage a friend whom I esteem, to struggle manfully
against the adverse waves of the world; and to rely, with
a heart steadily virtuous and upright, upon his own
exertions
for success. And you
will
succeed, if you do right;
and I hope it will be right
speedily
. You must not
forget
to write me as you promised. Enclose the letters in
those to your mother. Good-by, and believe, however
rudely fortune may treat you, you will always have a
friend
in
Blanche
.
Slowly, tenderly, and with suffused eyes, I placed the
letter within my vest, next to my heart. Whatever had
been the intensity of my feelings of attachment for Blanche
before, there could be no longer any doubt as to their
precise
nature now. That arrow, which had sped on the
wings of the wind so many hundred miles, had most
effectually
done its office. Never had Cupid taken a truer aim.
It was a dead shot.
When I returned to the inn, I desired to be shown to
my lodgings. The barkeeper, with the remaining inch of
a tallow candle in his hand, went before, and we ascended
to the second floor, which was next to the roof. The
naked and dingy joists were exposed over head, and
between
them I saw the light of heaven through sundry holes
above. As we pushed open the creaking door, I had
heard a rushing, scampering noise within, which gradually
subsided as we entered. When I looked round, I could
perceive nothing in motion; but I saw a mysterious smile
on the lip of my conductor. The walls were in the same
unfinished condition as the ceiling. There was no
carpet
.
But there were half a dozen beds in the room, each
of them having two or three occupants. By a convulsive
effort I threw off my coat, and placed it on the back of an
old chair.
You'd better not leave your clothes there, said my
conductor.
Why? I inquired.
Because the
rats
are sometimes troublesome here, and
have been known to carry off gentlemen's clothes before
morning, he replied.
Then where shall I place them? I asked.
Tie them up in your handkerchief, your shoes and all,
and then fasten the bundle to this string suspended from the
joist. The noise you heard when we came in was made by
the rats scampering away. But when I take the light out,
they will return.
Friend, said I, very deliberately putting on my coat
again, I hope you will take no offence; but, if I live, I
shall not remain in this house to-night.
Nobody can blame you, he replied in an under tone;
I wish I could leave it myself, but the landlord will not
pay me any wages if I go before my engagement is up.
Those tough old boatmen don't mind them much; but
there's no telling but what a hundred or two of big
Norways
might succeed in cutting
your
throat before morning.
Almost every night somebody gets bit.
My mind was made up. I had now but four dollars in
my pocket, which were reduced to three, after paying for
my
supper
, and hiring a porter to carry my trunk away; but
I went directly to the City Hotel, and demanded a good
room, with as much assurance as if I had had thousands.
I resolved to call upon my friend, General A., the next
morning, and avail myself of his generous offer. That
determined upon, I threw myself on a comfortable bed, and
slept soundly till morning.
I lost no time in waiting upon General A., at his residence
on the morrow; and on learning my business, he spread
open before me his well-filled pocket-book, and told me
to take as much as I wanted, which I could repay at any
future time when it might be convenient. I took but
ten dollars; and, after expressing my thanks, and
promising
faithfully to enclose the like sum to him, out of the
first money I should receive, took my leave, and wended
my way with a light heart to the stage office, and was
booked for Franklin, the place of my destination.
The next morning I set out in the coach. The road was
soft and deep, there being then, as is the case, I believe,
yet, no paved or Macadamized roads in Missouri. On the
second day, I remember a little incident which came nigh
placing me in an unpleasant predicament. When
ascending
a hill, the passengers had to get out and walk, to enable
the horses to drag up the heavy stage. Near the road, and
running parallel with it, we perceived a very pretty little
animal about the size of a rabbit. The driver told me to
catch it, assuring me it was one of a kind easily taken. I
made a dash at it, and, instead of running away, it only
paused, and erected its tail, assuming a menacing attitude.
Just then one of the passengers, remembering that I must
in a few moments resume my seat by his side, called out
for me to desist, and informed me that it was a
polecat
.
He spoke just in time to save me. I was well content to
withstand the laughter of the company on escaping such
an odoriferous salutation as was threatened me. No doubt,
had I been taking my leave of the stage, they would have
permitted me to catch the tartar. Such is a specimen of
western practical jokes.
Here I had my first view of a prairie, and I was charmed
with it. I could easily fancy how beautiful it would be
when the warm breezes of May should cause the various
wild flowers to adorn it. And then, for the first time, I
beheld the prairie hen or grouse in countless numbers; and
ever and anon flocks of deer in the distance.
CHAPTER III.
In
due course of time we arrived at the
new
town of
Franklin, situated in the woods, some two miles from the
river. The
old
town, which had been once the largest
village above St. Louis, was rapidly undergoing one of
the saddest processes incident to western villages on the
great streams. The capricious and rightly-termed Mad
Missouri, was undermining and washing away the original
town. More than two-thirds of it had already disappeared;
and the inhabitants were then bestirring themselves to save
what wrecks they could of their property. They were
removing
the buildings themselves (mostly frame) back to
the hills; and the new village in the woods presented the
grotesque appearance of a new town built in a measure of
old materials.
My brother gave me a hearty welcome, and furnished
me the means to discharge my debt to General Ashley.
And now began my career as a
Western Merchant
. I
found my position altogether a novel, and by no means an
unpleasant one. I soon perceived that the merchant was
4*
an important individual in society. His standing took
precedence
even of that of the professional gentlemen, who,
at that day, at least, were rarely in affluent circumstances.
Indeed, the merchants in a manner monopolized all the
wealth in the country, and wielded the popular influence.
One of the partners in the establishment, which was to
send a branch up the river under the charge of my
brother
Joseph, was daily expected to arrive on his return with
the goods from Philadelphia. Letters had been received
from him, announcing his arrival at St. Louis, a few days
after my departure from that port. He stated that he would
come up the river with his goods on the steamboat Ioway,
which would be ready to start about the first of April, and
might be looked for at Franklin, by the 15th. Boats were
few and far between then, and some of them consumed
two weeks, instead of two days (as now), in ascending the
river.
About this time my brother and myself set off on
horseback
up the river, to see that the building for our new
store should be completed and in readiness to receive the
goods. Towards noon, we arrived opposite the famous new
town of Pike Bluff, and after some delay in consequence
of the great number of emigrants' wagons which were
waiting to get across, we were ferried over the turbulent
stream in a flat, rickety, open boat. We ascended the
hill and beheld the town. It consisted alone of the new
store-house, in a half finished condition. It was composed
of hewed logs, the chinks betwixt them not being yet
plastered
up. It had a roof on, however, and afforded a shelter.
The workmen were that day just sawing out openings for
the doors. We prevailed on them to concentrate all their
forces on one of the rooms, (there were to be just two, each
about twenty feet square,) so that it might be shelved, and
in some degree of completion, provided the goods should
happen to arrive a few days before the time appointed.
They cheerfully complied, and exerted themselves to the
utmost of their ability. The ugly interstices between the
huge logs, were soon filled with clay and lime, and
whitewashed
on the inside. A counter was erected, and shelves
put up.
I remained with the workmen while my brother returned
to Franklin, with the understanding that he would come
up on the boat with the goods. All was bustle and
curiosity
.
The people for miles round came in every day
to inquire when the goods would arrive. There was but
one store in the whole county, which was situated a
considerable
distance in the interior, and the beginning of a
new town on the river, by means of the establishment of a
store there, made a considerable noise in that community.
I soon became acquainted with everybody; and after the
first sight a mutual familiarity exists in new countries. I
must own that I felt flattered by the novel importance of
my position, being a sort of centre of attraction; and as I
was not deficient in personal address, made the most of
my advantage for the interest of the concern. Without the
slightest knowledge of the value of merchandise, it was
yet no difficult matter for me to produce the impression that
our
goods would be sold under the prices the good people
had been in the habit of paying for similar articles; and,
in consequence, the anxiety grew more intense on their part
for them to arrive.
It was not long before I had explored every part of the
town. The site was high and dry, but unfortunately
broken
up immensely by abrupt hills and deep hollows. With
the exception of the road which led from the ferry to the
prairie, and the small space of ground, some forty by twenty
feet, on which the store was situated, and a few transverse
deer paths, every foot of the town was covered with bushes,
brambles and trees. And these in many parts were
impenetrably
united by complete webs of wild vines. More
than once in my explorations, I was under the necessity of
using my knife as a means of extrication. Not
unfrequently
,
the weather being now warm and pleasant, I was
startled and terrified by the warning sound of the
rattlesnake
.
The deer leaped through the bushes within forty
feet of me; and the wild turkey crossed my path with
seeming unconcern. These little incidents gave an
additional
glow to my anticipations of future enjoyment.
I have said that the building my brother and myself
were to occupy, was the only one in town. This was an
error, provided a mud shanty of eight by ten feet
dimensions
,
might be considered a second house. This hovel
was occupied by a Canadian Frenchman, who had married
an American woman in the vicinity, and who dwelt there
only at intervals, when he returned from his annual
expeditions
far up the river, with the fur and trading company,
of which General Ashley was the proprietor. But there
was another house in the suburbs of the town, accessible
by a narrow serpentine path, (literally, as well as
figuratively
,)
through the hazel bushes, along one of the ridges
terminating at the intersection of one of the valleys. This
was a dwelling built somewhat after the fashion of our
store, only the logs were not hewed; they were merely
barked. The crevices, however, were stopped sufficiently
to hide objects within; and the clap-board roof afforded
tolerable shelter from ordinary rains. This house was
occupied
by Mr. White and his family. This was an amiable
family, recently removed from Virginia, (on the James
river,) with the wreck of what had once been an ample
fortune
.
The wreck consisted of some half dozen
superannuated
negroes, and about a dozen of their children and
grandchildren
.
Mr. White had met with misfortune by being
too kind and generous to his friends. To relieve them
from pressing pecuniary difficulty, he had become security
for them, and the return made for such benefits conferred,
was the entailment on his family of permanent distress. His
two plantations, one inherited by himself, and one by his
wife, were sold to meet his liabilities; and the surplus
proceeds
,
after discharging the debts not of his own contracting,
merely sufficed to defray his expenses to the far west, and
to buy him a few scanty acres in the wilds of Missouri. His
family consisted of himself, his wife, his wife's sister, and
three children, one son and two daughters, all nearly
grown, and pretty well educated. But notwithstanding
the privations they had endured, I do not remember to
have met with a more happy family in my life. Their
uninterrupted cheerfulness, and unassumed contentment,
in the comparatively miserable condition to which they
had been so heartlessly reduced, afforded a most convincing
exemplification of the consolations and advantages of
religion
to those in adversity; and it may be hoped that its
benefits apply as well to conditions of prosperity, though
perhaps not often with the same force and effect. With
this family my brother and myself engaged to board, for
about one dollar and a half a week, each.
Nevertheless, Mr. White, in Missouri, was regarded as
a rich man, and his daughters, Mary and Ellen, were
looked upon as heiresses. The fact that he possessed
some twenty negroes, old and young, made him somewhat
famous there as a man of wealth. That he had no
considerable
real estate, in Missouri, where land of the very
best description could be had for one dollar and a quarter
per acre, was a matter of no importance. His credit was
unlimited
, that bane of improvident families; and every
species of property he might desire, was easily attainable.
In truth, Mr. White's circumstances and prospects were
equal, if not superior in most respects, to those of the
generality
of the inhabitants of the country. His cheerfulness
extended to his servants, who made the little huts they
occupied in the rear of the rude mansion, vocal with their
Old Virginny songs. With a hearty good-will they drove
the oxen, and ploughed up the virgin soil of the prairie a
mile or so distant, which as yet belonged to the
government
,
but which Mr. White designed at some convenient
day in future to purchase. Mr. White followed the
example
of others; and at that early day it was rarely the
case that any one fortunately possessing the ability, dared
to incur the odium of entering public lands cultivated by
previous settlers.
By the 15th April, we had the room, originally designed
for the counting-room, shelved round, and prepared for the
reception of the goods. The cash-drawer was ready, and
I had cut a hole through the counter to slip the money into
it. We postponed making a desk, until we could empty
one of the shoe or hat boxes for that purpose. The last
thing we did on the memorable morning of the 15th, was
to put a lock on the door, and a bolt on the window shutter.
About ten o'clock A. M., the people began to arrive.
The first that came were from below, some eight miles
down the river, who had distinctly heard the steamer
puffing
on her way up. At that day the steamboats puffed,
and coughed, and wheezed immensely louder than they
now do. These voluntary messengers had spread the
news as they came along, and many others followed them
to town to see the new goods landed.
It was not long before the cough of the boat could be
heard at Pike Bluff, and she was only hid from view by
an intervening island. By the time I had procured three
or four wagons with ox teams to haul the goods up the
hill, the boat had landed, having our goods on board sure
enough, and my brother Joseph, also.
Some six or seven boxes of dry-goods, and thirty or
forty other packages of less size and value, piled up on the
river bank, made the people stare; and my brother and
myself were regarded as young merchant Crsuses. And
some six thousand dollars worth of goods made a respectable
pile, even then: but at this day of low prices, when two
hundred dollars worth of dry-goods will fill a W box, that
sum would make a very different show on the bank of any
river. There were other descriptions of merchandise
besides
dry-goods. Hardware, queensware, shoes, hats,
sugar, coffee, salt, spice, pepper, dye-stuffs, medicines,
(calomel and barks in enormous quantities,) besides a long
catalogue of other articles, made up the merchant's
assortment
in Missouri, eighteen years ago. And the beauty of
the business was, no flaming advertisements or red-letter
hand bills were required to make known the establishment
of a new store in a new place. Every one took an
interest
in it, and lost no opportunity of spreading the news
far and wide. In the hearty welcome the farmers gave
every new merchant, there was a deep policy which we
did not perceive at the time. It was natural that each
new-comer would increase the competition, and the
more competition that existed, of course the lower would
be the prices. And at that time, it must be confessed by
every old western merchant who may chance to peruse
these memoirs, we made splendid profits. One per
cent., as the trader termed it, when he sold an article that
cost one dollar for two, was no unusual figure; and although
the merchant would only sell some ten or twelve thousand
dollars worth per annum, instead of twenty or thirty
thousand
,
as at this day, yet his balance sheet generally exhibited
a more satisfactory result than it has done in more modern
times.
My first day as a merchant, or rather as a merchant's
clerk, was a busy day. The opening and marking of
goods, and placing them in order on the shelves, occupied
the whole of the day, retarded and obstructed as we were
continually, by the remarks and inquiries of the eager
crowd around us. Every piece of goods taken from the
boxes was subjected to the inspection of the bystanders;
and it would have been impolitic to have repulsed this
interference
.
It was our policy to cultivate the good will of
all. But there was a mark beyond which they could not
go, or rather they could not go through it at all. Several
of them had been either merchants or merchants' clerks
themselves, in Virginia, or Kentucky; and had secretly
conspired to ascertain our private mark, proposing to
derive
advantage from a knowledge of the cost of the goods.
One of them had the following letters pencilled on a slip
of paper: b1l2a3c4k5s6m7i8t9h0; another c1l2e3a4n5s6h7i8r9t0;
hoping by comparison with the letters placed on the tickets,
to find that we made use of the same letters so long used
by other merchants. But they were mistaken; and their
countenances exhibited unequivocal signs of
disappointment
when they began to inspect our letters, which were
as follows: s1u2a3b4d5t6h7r8v9z0. They gave it up in
despair
,
and relied upon our generosity not to impose upon
them.
Towards night all our inquisitive company left us, many
of them promising to bring in their wives and daughters
the next day, or in a few days, when we should be in
readiness
to wait upon them. After night, and deep in the
night, the labors of my brother and myself continued. The
practiced merchant will need no special assurance from me,
to believe that it was no slight undertaking for us to open,
mark, and properly arrange, ready for business, six
thousand
dollars' worth of goods in one day and evening. At
length our labors were completed, and we sat down on the
log steps before the door to rest, and to arrange our plans
for the next day. But we were completely exhausted, and
mused long in silence. The loneliness of the scene made
a deep impression on me. The moon was midway in the
heavens, casting down a flood of light, which made the
smallest objects distinctly visible. The river, so turbid by
day, resembled a sheet of liquid silver by night. The
trees that fringed its margin, and those around us, were
perfectly motionless, not the slightest breath of air
disturbing
the repose of their half-grown leaves. The only
sound we heard was the plaintive note of a solitary
whippoorwill
.
The stillness which brooded over the scene,
threw but a momentary shade of melancholy over Joseph,
as he was less susceptible of poetical influences than
myself
.
His mind was more inclined to dive into the chances
of the future, than to dwell upon the past; and I found all
my romantic meditations suddenly put to flight by the
following
inquiry:
Luke, how much do you say we will sell to-morrow?
I suppose, said I, after some little bewilderment and
hesitation, about seventy-five dollars' worth.
How much of it do you think will be in cash?
I predict about half.
That is your belief, said he, smiling; now I will
make a guess. I say we will sell one hundred dollars'
5
worth, seventy-five of which will be in ready money. It
is always the case that the first day's sales in a new
establishment
,
exhibit a larger proportion of cash than they do
afterwards. At first the really good and responsible men
feel a delicacy in asking to be credited. They wait to
have their undoubted responsibility made known to us by
their neighbors. This is the pride and pleasure a rich
man enjoys in a community; and when you shall have
learned to flatter this vanity in a dexterous manner, you
will possess one of the requisites of the merchant. On the
other hand, it is quite natural for those men who are `not
good,' in mercantile parlance, to thrust themselves boldly
forward at the beginning, presuming we are ignorant of
their inability to pay, and endeavor to obtain credit. Of
this class you must beware, and keep constantly on your
guard. Mr. White has kindly consented to furnish me
with information which will be of service. He has given
me the names of most of the `good' men, for ten or
fifteen
miles round; you will find the list in the cash-drawer.
You can easily refer to it when people are looking at the
goods, without any one perceiving what you are doing.
And when you find any one present in the `good' list, it
will not be difficult for you to intimate to him in a low
tone, so as not to be overheard by the rest, that you will
be happy to sell him whatever he may need, on a credit of
six months; at the end of six months, if he is not ready
to pay, we will take his note, bearing ten per cent.
interest
,
which, you will remember, is the legal rate in
Missouri
.
We must sell all we can to `good' men on time;
they are not so particular about the prices as those who buy
for cash. Nevertheless, when we can get the money down,
it is still better; and it will be well for us, when we
perceive
any one has the cash about him, to endeavor to get
it all, before we hint anything about credit.
Very well, I replied; but must I always adhere to
the selling prices marked on the goods, in figures?
I was just about to speak on that subject, said he;
and it is one of the most difficult parts of the business to
manage adroitly. It is better learned by observation than
by verbal directions. To cash buyers the prices should be
as uniform as possibleand only varied in consideration
of the quantity they buy. In regard to the others, there is
always more or less risk of ultimate loss when goods are
sold on time. The `good' man to-day, may be ruined
by some unforeseen mishap to-morrow. But there are
certain
degrees
of risk between which you must learn to
discriminate
.
For instance there is Dr. Greenleaf, living some
six miles out in the prairie, who is worth twenty-five
thousand
dollars, and his neighbor Gates, not worth one
thousand
dollars. Neither of them is in debt, and both are
responsible for any amount they will be likely to desire to
purchase on credit. But still the probability of the latter
`breaking' before the former, should either of them `fall
through,' is quite apparent. Hence, one is safer than the
other; and hence, it would be both just and politic for us
to put goods a shade lower to the former than the latter
but with a sly injunction that the price is not to be told to
any one, which is another means of pleasing a rich man,
for all like to be made conscious of the realization of the
advantages which wealth is supposed to confer. You will
soon become acquainted with these and a thousand other
peculiarities of the people. A village store is one of the
best places in the world to learn human nature.
By this time I complained of weariness, and we got up
to make arrangements for sleep. We had no bed; but it
was a part of the western merchant's discipline to sleep
without one. It was not long before the litter was swept
from the floor, and two pallets, consisting of coarse cotton
cloth and blankets, with two pieces of flannel as pillows,
were in readiness to receive our weary limbs.
It was in vain I sought repose. My over-wrought
system
refused to slumber. A feverish excitement possessed
my brain, and I turned and tossed on my hard bed for
more than an hour, without enjoying any of the benefits of
`nature's sweet restorer.' Once I placed my hand beyond
my scanty couch, and my fingers dropped into a crack in
the floor about an inch wide. I had noticed a number of
these crevices in the day time, but had then attached no
importance to them. Now my active imagination did not
fail to conjure up all kinds of venomous serpents, gliding
but a few inches beneath us. I fancied that some of them
had ascended into the room, and might be in the fatal coil
near my head, ready to bury their fangs in the first one of
us that should move. By a convulsive effort I succeeded
in springing into a chair on which my clothes were placed,
and after igniting a lucifer match, and casting a hurried
glance at my brother to see that he was safe, proceeded to
light a candle. My movement awoke Joseph, who sat
upright
in amazement, and demanded the cause of my strange
conduct. I told him that there were serpents under the
floor, the house not being underpinned; that I was sure I
had heard them moving about under the place where I
had been lying; and that there was nothing to prevent
them from entering the room through the ample crevices in
the floor. Joseph reproached me with silly dreaming; but
at the same time he rose slowly from his position, and
looked cautiously around him. He then followed my
example
,
and placed his pallet on the counter. The counter
was just long enough between the window and the angle
where it turned towards the partition wall, to admit of our
lying full length on it without touching each other's feet.
My head was just under the window, and his in the
opposite
direction. Our feet met in the centre, or were only a
few inches apart. By degrees I sank into an unquiet
slumber
on my narrow bed. But I was restless, and moved
about a good deal during the night. Once I was awakened
by my feet coming in contact with the floor, and just in
time to arrest my head, which was rapidly following them.
What's the matter now, Luke? inquired Joseph,
lifting his head in the profound darkness that reigned
aroundI supposed that to be his attitude from the
elevation
of his voice.
Oh, nothing. I merely rolled off the counter, but did
not hurt myself, said I.
Why, Luke, replied he, the counter is thirty inches
wide. A western merchant ought to be able to sleep
without
inconvenience, on a board of eighteen inches width.
By this time I had composed my limbs for another trial.
But I was doomed to meet with but little success that
night. I could only attain a semi-repose; my mind was
incessantly disturbed by frightful dreams. Once more I
fancied that I was about to become the victim of a
rattlesnake
;
and just as it was in the act of springing upon me,
I awoke. At that instant I heard a low rubbing sound,
and felt a slight movement against the top of my head.
For a moment I remained horror-stricken, and utterly at a
loss what to do. If I moved, I might be bittenwhereas
it was said that a snake, and particularly the rattlesnake,
would never strike an inanimate object. These thoughts
rushed through my brain with the rapidity of lightning, and
for several minutes I remained perfectly motionless. Again
5*
the rustling was heard, and the movement continued
against my hair, which doubtless stood straight out from
my head. At length I could no longer bear this loathsome
proximity of the venomous reptile. I made a spring to my
knees, at the same time seizing my pillow, with which, as
I faced about, I began to belabor the deadly foe, and
brushed
rapidly to the right and left, for the purpose of dashing
him to the floor. It may be supposed that my surprise
was great, and relief profound, when my brother exclaimed:
Luke, what in the world are you beating my feet for?
The voice came from the front, instead of the rear of me.
I was completely bewildered. I had contrived to turn
entirely
round, like one on a pivot, and had been lying with
my head in the immediate vicinity of Joseph's feet, which
had occasionally produced the motion and the low sound
that my keen ears had detected. But how I had carried my
pillow with me I could never explain. I made a frank
confession of my case to Joseph, who laughed heartily at
my imaginary perils.
CHAPTER IV.
The
next morning by the time the sun was up, we had
everything brushed up and displayed to the greatest
advantage
.
It was a bright morning, and we anticipated a
busy day. When we returned from breakfast, the wife
and daughters of Mr. White accompanied us to the store,
and were our first customers. Joseph desired to see my
first essay as a salesman, and so he put me forward to wait
on the ladies. There was no difficulty as to the prices,
(for they came determined to buy,) nor in the selections,
as the stock was fresh and well assorted; but when I came
to the measuring and cutting part of the business, I
betrayed
considerable awkwardness and confusion. At that
time six yards of calico made a dress, and I attempted to
cut off two dresses for the two daughters from different
pieces. After measuring off the first dress, I severed it
from the piece by the slow process of cutting it with my
scissors. Joseph then instructed me always to tear off the
calico. The next dress I tore off. I then sold Mrs. White
a gingham dress, and forgetting that gingham was not
calico, I tore it also, but the rent ran lengthwise instead of
across! Upon perceiving my mishap, Joseph interposed
and arrested my career. He should have done it sooner;
for upon examination, it was found that I had cut seven
yards for one of the calico dresses, and only five for the
other. This chagrined my brother, and mortified me
exceedingly
.
I remarked, however, that the occurrence
would doubtless prove beneficial, in rendering me more
careful in future. And it was ascertained by the ladies,
who sympathized with me, that the split in the gingham
would not injure the dress, and by cutting off, or rather
tearing off, another yard, the second calico dress could be
made; and to make all whole, Miss Mary declared she
would have the seven yards, as she preferred to have her
dresses made full. I now felt relieved of my painful
embarrassment
,
and wiping the perspiration from my forehead,
displayed renewed activity in showing the goods to the
ladies. I soon attained a degree of familiarity with the
various locations of the goods, and acquired sufficient
confidence
in my capacity to relieve my brother of all
supervision
over my actions. The ladies merely asked the prices
of the different descriptions of goods they bought, and
never attempted to beat me down. Hence, I sold
everything at the marked prices, and of course made
handsome profits. As I cut off the goods, Joseph noted
them down; but when the party departed, they did not ask
for the bill. We were boarding with them, and it was
the same as cash to us. The amount sold them was thirty
dollars' worth, and the eastern cost of them only about
sixteen
dollars. This was a good beginning, and we were
in high spirits.
The Whites had not been long gone, before I espied a
party riding along the narrow road through the bushes,
towards the store. This was Mr. Middletown, his wife,
and Maria, his daughter. Mr. Middletown was one of the
most substantial farmers in that section of the country, and
we had been apprised that he was famous for screwing
great bargains with the merchants, and generally paid the
money down. Joseph took out a chair and assisted Mrs.
Middletown to alight from her horse, while I attempted to
follow his example in assisting the daughter. Miss Maria
was exceedingly pretty, a fair, fresh, regular-featured prairie
flower, which confused my vision very considerably when
I first beheld her, and reminded me of Blanche. I was
only twenty, and too susceptible of new impressions. My
hand quivered a little as she placed hers in it, to step
down from her horse. Her horse was a very tall one, and
in making a long step down to the chair we became
unsteady
,
and she fell upon my shoulder. I prevented her
from falling to the ground, however, and aided her in
adjusting
her skirt, which had hung by the pommel of the
saddle. Our embarrassment was mutual, and was much
increased by this remark from her father, who was fond of
a joke:
See how those young folks are blushing at each other,
out there! Maria dropped her veil and joined her mother
in the store, while I turned my face away, and tied the
horse to a bush.
Well, said the old man, after the party had been
seated a few minutes, during which time they had surveyed
the well-filled shelves, I suppose you are going to sell
goods low, now; at least you'll say so.
I think you'll say so, too, replied Joseph, when I
tell you the prices.
Let us see, then, he continued; what is the price of
that blue gingham?
Fifty cents a yard, replied Joseph, handing it down.
You don't call that low, do you? said he, examining
the goods.
Yes, I do, said Mrs. Middletown, who now came to
our relief, and was a judge of the article. The same
kind of goods out at the mill sells for sixty-two and a half
cents, as you know very well, Mr. Middletown, for you
bought me a dress of it last fall, and could only beat him
down six and a quarter cents.
Yes, it is less than M. S. & Co. sell theirs,
remarked
Miss Maria, in a low voice.
The old gentleman still endeavored to maintain his dry
incredulous smile, but the odds were against him. In
truth the
credit
price of the article was fifty-six and a
quarter cents, it having cost thirty cents; but Joseph knew
his man, and had resolved to make a good impression at
the start.
The dress was sold, measured and cut off by Joseph,
who waited upon the old folks, while I attended to the
daughter. Miss Maria, after inspecting some lace, which
she acknowledged was pretty and cheap, told me to
measure
off two or three yards of it. I noticed that when either
of the ladies made a purchase, the old man's eyes were
sure to be upon Joseph and myself alternately; and so,
when I was measuring the lace very carefully, that no
farther
blunder should be committed by me that day, he turned
abruptly towards me, and asked,
Where are your thumbs?
There they are, said I, after some surprise and
hesitation
,
looking first at him and then at the members named.
Don't you throw her in your thumbs? he continued,
with a grave countenance.
I paused in astonishment, and forgot how many yards I
had measured. Miss Maria smiled at my lack of
comprehension
,
but seemed to deprecate the interference of her
father. The old man, perceiving my ignorance of his
meaning, determined, by way of a joke, to increase my
confusion.
Oh, you must give her your thumb, he repeated, with
imperturbable gravity. You can't refuse that?
Having somewhat recovered from my embarrassment, I
now mustered an unusual degree of assurance; and resolved
to carry on the joke, I laid down the yard-stick, and
stretching my arm over the counter, replied:
I hope I have too much gallantry to be `bluffed off'
in this mannerand, by your leave, I'll make Miss Maria
a tender of my whole hand.
This was too much for the timid, modest daughter. She
sank down in a chair and hid her scarlet face, while the
rest gave vent to an irrepressible explosion of laughter.
Good! good! exclaimed Mrs. M. Mr. M. is
always
full of his jokes with the young men, and I am glad
he has met with his match, at last.
Good humor was now completely established, and we
were as familiar and unreserved as old acquaintances.
Such is the way in the west. The slightest incident, or
briefest encounter of wits, although there was no
premeditated
wit in my remark, will be sure to make persons
hitherto totally unknown to each other, the most intimate
acquaintances.
They now purchased our goods freely, and the dollars
jingled merrily in the drawer. Other parties came in, and
the store was soon filled to its utmost capacity, while my
brother and myself were kept as busy as bees. But I was
doomed to blush for my ignorance more than once that
day. Miss Maria, after buying sundry descriptions of
goods, and having the advantage of the thumb's breadth
thrown in, after the process had been explained to me, cast
her eyes repeatedly to a shelf where the stockings were
kept in small paper boxes. I waited for her to name the
article she wished to see in that direction, and for a long
time she was reluctant to name it. Finally, in reply to
my interrogatory whether there was anything on that shelf
she was desirous of looking at, she had the resolution to
say, I will look at your hose, if you please, sir. That
seemed to me to be a very singular request. It also
attracted
the old man's attention, who looked on with a
quizzical smile. After a pause, I sprang over the counter
and took down from the side of the door, where they had
been hung up by a string run through their eyes, a dozen
black
garden hoes
. I perceived in an instant, from the
girl's manner, that another blunder had been committed
by some body.
White
hose, if you please, she said quickly, hoping
to correct my mistake before her father should observe it.
But she was too latehe was already laughing heartily at
me. But the old lady came to our relief.
She wants
stockings
why don't you say
stockings
, at
once, Maria? there is nothing more indelicate in it, than
to ask for flannel, which everybody knows is intended for
a petticoat.
We succeeded in making good our retreat under cover
of the old lady's battery, and endured no farther
molestation
from the old man. But nevertheless, as all these
occurrences
were narrated in the neighborhood, I was to be
the mark for many a jocular shaft afterwards.
But if my ignorance was great as a seller of goods, it
fell short of that of some of the buyers. There were two
men in the store dressed in buckskin hunting shirts, who
lived some fifteen miles off, up the river.
What is the price of this bolt of brown domestic?
asked one of them.
That piece, said my brother, is only twenty cents.
That is cheap, said the other. And after a little
consultation
,
the first said he would take it, and as he said so
he placed a twenty-cent piece in my brother's hand, and
placed the goods, containing thirty yards, under his arm.
I meant it was twenty cents a yard, said my brother,
beholding him with astonishment.
But you didn't say so, stranger, said the man's
comrade
.
It was a fair bargain, stranger; and I will make
oath as a witness to it.
Here was a difficulty. We were informed by Mr.
Middletown
,
that the men bore bad characters, and were not
too good to take a dishonest advantage of us. The one
who had the goods was obviously intoxicated, and his
thick brogue betrayed the desperate Irishman. Joseph
grew angry, and told him he could not keep the goods
without paying twenty cents for every yard it contained.
He said he would. Joseph, understanding that Mr. Brass,
a constable, was over at Mr. White's house, went thither
in quest of him. While he was gone, I handed back the
money to the man, and told him he had better put down
the goods without having any farther trouble about the
matter. He doggedly refused, saying he had fairly bought
and paid for the whole piece. I said he had not. He
said I
lied
. Now I was neither very brave nor
quarrel-some
.
But such a point-blank insult, in the presence of
Miss Maria, and half a dozen other ladies, was more than
my young blood could bear. Without the slightest
reflection
,
and quicker than thought, I broke the yard stick, with
which I was measuring a dress for Miss Maria, over the
fellow's head. It staggered him considerably. After
recovering
from the effects of the blow, he stood for a
moment
revengefully scowling at me. He then turned round
without uttering a word and walked out. A moment after,
one of the females standing near the door uttered a cry,
and I saw the man with a fierce eye and black brow
returning
with an axe in his hand, which he had picked up
in front of the house. I had no means of retreat, if I had
been disposed to withdraw myself. On he came, in spite
of the screams of the women, and the persuasions of the
men. He entered the door, and deliberately elevated the
fearful instrument in the act of hurling it at me. By an
instinctive effort of self-preservation, I seized a two-pound
iron weight, and threw it at his head. It took effect, striking
the upper part of his forehead, and glancing up
through his
hat
without knocking it from his head, and passing out of
the door almost with the velocity of a cannon ball. Such
is the astonishing power of which a small arm is capable
in a moment of sudden peril. The man fell as one who
had been shot through the brain. The skull, fortunately,
was not injured; but there was a terrible gash cut on his
head; and when consciousness returned, he bled very
profusely
.
6
He relinquished the goods. His companion,
fearing to meet the constable, who knew him of old, had
slipped out of sight. But the bloody Irishman swore
vengeance against me, as he sat upon a stump and tore his
damaged hat to tatters with his teeth. When Joseph
returned
,
(who did not find the officer he went in quest of,)
and learned that the man had endeavored to take my life
with an axeI, a mere striplingit was with difficulty he
could be restrained from administering additional
punishment
to that I had given him. I had acted impulsively;
my brother would have gone to work more deliberately.
Joseph was always ready to resent an affront, and with a
perfect recklessness as to the consequences to himself. I
was generally more circumspect, and had a natural
repugnance
to personal difficulties. However, I was now a hero
and wit in spite of my nature.
The rather thrilling incident above narrated, was
only a matter of five minutes' wonder in the famous town
of Pike Bluff. Even the females dismissed the affair from
their minds in a very short space of time, and re-commenced
business. But my agitation was considerable, and not of
such brief duration, although I strove to conceal it as much
as possible. I was made uneasy by the continued
mutterings
of the bloody fellow, who kept up a sort of harsh
soliloquy
,
as he sat on the stump; and his threats of using the
rifle, and other means of vengeance, occasionally reached my
ears. Such scenes and threats were, perhaps, familiar to
the old inhabitants of the country; but not to me. And,
as a matter of precaution, I bought a rifle, myself, that day,
from an uncle of Miss Maria, who subsequently joined the
party at the store. The Irishman was informed of the fact,
and warned to be careful in his future behavior; and,
indeed
,
upon receiving this intelligence, after casting several
fearful glances towards the door, he quietly mounted his
horse and rode away.
Before the day was over, my hands were actually sore
with cutting goods, weighing sugar, coffee, nails, bar iron,
castings, salt, &c. Here, in this beautiful and proud city,
such employments would no doubt be looked upon as
degrading
,
even by the most destitute and dependent
shop-keeper's
clerk in Second street. But it was and is quite
different in a far-western store. And what was more,
the lily hands of a beautiful girl, the daughter of the richest
inhabitant in that region, did not hesitate to hold the bag
while I poured the groceries into itnor did she
decline
afterwards to have the unseemly burden affixed to her
saddle when she rode home.
At length, when the sun had declined low in the west,
the last of the company departed, and we were enabled, for
the first time during the whole of that day, to sit down and
rest ourselves. We had not even taken the time to eat
our dinners; but soon the tooting horn apprised us that
supper was ready. After returning from our
boarding-house
,
we sat down to sum up the result of the day's
business
.
Joseph added up the items charged on the books,
while I counted the cash. The former amounted to fifty
odd, and the latter to a hundred dollars. We were in the
highest spirits. It was true we discovered a few spurious
coins in the drawer, and it might be that one or two of the
small accounts on the books were of a doubtful character;
nevertheless, the whole of the goods sold, had not cost
more than ninety dollars, and a fine profit had been
undoubtedly
realized. It was a fine day's work for any
country, and if every day had produced the same result, a
fortune could have been realized in a few years. But it
was not a fair sample. We had dull days there as well as
elsewhere.
Yet we did a good business. Our beginning was
propitious
in many respects. My encounter with the desperate
Irishman sufficed to protect us against similar attempts of the
like character in future. It convinced such persons that we
were not the timid effeminate youths they took us for. We
had been bred in the Kentucky school, and were not
novices
either in a frolic or a fight.
But the
thumb
incident was the most lucky occurrence
of all. It was rumored over the country, that I, a tall,
handsome young man, was in the habit of offering my
hand
in marriage
to all the girls that came to our store to
deal. I might have been vain in conjecturing the causeI
was more than once truly annoyed and humiliated with the
factnevertheless, it was true, that for weeks there was a
constant succession of new female visitors at the
establishment
.
I was repeatedly assured that many of them seriously
believed the tale which had been so industriously
circulated
;
that some earnestly designed to take me at my word,
should I pronounce it: while others merely indulged the
irrepressible curiosity of the sex, to witness the offer which
it was generally believed I was in the habit of making, and
then to act according to circumstances. It is certain that
an immense number of them came; and it is likewise
certain
that most of them left a portion, if not all, of their loose
change with us. But I was certainly not much flattered
with some of the supposed candidates for my hand,
however
cheerfully I might give them my thumb. Some
of them were exceedingly fat, broad-shouldered, flat-footed,
rough-handed, yellow-necked, freckle-faced, red-haired
amazonian aspirants! And, in consequence, the gibes and
jokes of my male acquaintances became in time almost
insupportable
.
Some of the girls were as bold in their speech and
manners
,
as they were masculine in their dimensions. I
remember
one in particular, who resolved to make herself
merry at my expense. Her features were rather pretty, but
her education had been sadly neglected. She was the
daughter of the proprietor of one of the many salt works in
that region. Her father, Mr. Beckel, was likewise the
representative of the county in the legislature. As he was
a pretty rough specimen of humanity, and moved out of
the country with his family, at an early day, to pursue his
public career in Texas, I think there can be no impropriety
in designating him so distinctly. He will be recognized
at once by my Missouri readers; he was famous for
shooting
,
wrestling, fighting, gambling, drinking, and all the
other characteristics of too many of the members of the
legislature at that crude time.
Miss Polly, one day, having paid for the goods she had
purchased, sat down right before me, and looking me
steadily in the face, smiled me out of countenance. There
were one or two strangers in the house; but in those wilds
it was seldom that the presence of a third party was
permitted
to interfere with the designs of lovers, much less with
the projects of romping females. She had a female
companion
with her, who alone had accompanied her to the store.
This companion was a coarse, red-faced giggling Miss of
fifteen
,
who rarely spoke at all; but when she did speak, her
voice was as harsh and hoarse as that of an over-grown
boy of seventeen. My brother was absent, on a ride into
the country.
Will you have anything else, Miss Polly? I inquired,
after a pause, and with an effort to assume some assurance.
Yes, said she.
Then I shall be happy to accommodate you.
6*
Very well, said she. I have bought your goods,
understanding that
you
were to be thrown in afterwards.
This caused the strangers to turn round and adjust
themselves
in comfortable hearing positions, that they might
enjoy the fun. Every man, woman and child in the country,
was always ready to enjoy any description of fun. The
young Miss at her side looked on in solemn seriousness,
and perhaps really thought I was to be taken along home
with them like goods tied up in bundles.
But you won't have me, I know? I replied, now
resolved
to outface her, if possible.
But I know I willso you are mistaken, said she,
firmly.
Well, I'm willing, said I, curious to see how far she
would go.
So am Ithere's no back out in me! she continued,
rising up. The other girl rose up too.
I'll try you! said I, leaping over the counter. Will
you marry us on the spot? I continued, speaking to one
of the strangers.
Yes, that I will, if you wish it, said he, stepping
forward
.
I now expected Miss Polly to hang fire, to use a
hunter's phrase. But I was in error. She was true as
steel. She grasped my proffered hand with such vigor
as to make the ends of my fingers tingle.
Go on, stranger! said she, with a compressed lip.
Then I pronounce you man and
Stop a moment! said I, putting my hand on his mouth.
Perhaps her father won't consentperhaps he'd shoot
me. Perhaps we're carrying the joke too farperhaps
you
are
a magistrate, sure enough! I continued, releasing
my hand, and springing back over the counter, trembling
with affright, as the thought flashed upon me that no
licenses
were required in Missouri, all magistrates being
permitted to solemnize marriages, and that no particular
form of solemnization was prescribed.
I now observed, too, that Miss Polly's countenance had
forsaken her. She became quite pale. Mr. Middletown,
the father of Maria, at that moment came in, and declared
that he knew the
stranger
to be a commissioned justice of
the peace! And so, really, Miss Polly had
almost
caught
me. It was never ascertained, to a certainty, whether the
whole affair had been devised by her. A majority of the
people believed it to have been so. For some minutes
she hung her head, like one detected in a shameful act,
but finally strove to laugh it off, and joined the laugh at
my expense, when the
stranger
(who afterwards became
her husband), departed. I felt as if it was no laughing
matter, but at the same time tried to laugh with the rest,
as the glad consciousness of my escape grew upon me.
Well, Miss Polly, what would you have done with
me, if we had been married, sure enough? I asked, when
the merriment had subsided.
I suppose I should have tied you on the horse behind
me, and taken you home, she promptly replied, amid
renewed
shouts of laughter.
Yes, but you know, said I, according to law, the
husband is the lord and master of the wife. I might choose
to command, rather than obey. I might be a tyrant, and
lead you a wretched life.
Pshaw! the law is nothing. If the husband is strong
enough to make the wife do as he pleases, I suppose he
will govern her. But you couldn't do it if I had you. I
would be the master. I am the strongest. I can beat
you running, riding, wrestling, or at anything else you can
name;and she squared herself as if willing to put me
to the test.
Don't take a banterdon't take a banter, Luke! cried
several of the company.
But I did take a banter, and from a woman. Yet it
availed me nothing. Miss Polly was determined to make
an exhibition of her prowess. Embracing an opportunity
when I was standing with my face towards the shelves, she
placed her hands under my arms, and absolutely lifted me
over the counter.
Now! said she, I could tie you, like a turkey
gobbler
,
and take you home with me. But I won't do it. I'll
let you off this time, as I'm
bound
to have you for my
husband
,
some of these days.
Well, said I, beginning to grow tired of the scene,
as the laugh was altogether on her side, if you will let
me go, and wait till I get strong enough to manage you,
I'll marry you, just to have my revenge.
If I had you, I'd feed you well, and make a man of
you. But I'll take your promise, before all these witnesses.
Now go; bring our horses. We've had enough fun for one
day.
I took her at her word; and when I brought her horse
before the door, she pushed aside the chair I had taken
out, and placing her hand on the animal's neck, leaped
from the ground into the saddle. As she rode away, she
turned her impudent face round, and said,
I'll have you
yet!
I remember her strange look to this day. It seemed
to express a mixture of real chagrin and disappointment.
Nor was my disquietude allayed on learning that she
was a kind of Helen M'Gregor, in her neighborhood; that
she was a great reader of novels of that class, and was
famous
for her bold eccentricities. For months afterwards,
in my peregrinations, I knew not which I dreaded most to
confront me in my solitary paths, the desperate Irishman,
or that bold girl. Her father sometimes plagued me by
terming me his son-in-law. She was continually sending me
messages. Once she wrote me a note by one of her father's
negroes, who had been sent to the store for some sugar and
tea. It began with Dear husband, and ended with,
you will soon be called for by your true and lawful .
It had a P. S., stating that one word more from Mr. 's
lips, would have made me hersand that she intended to
bring him soon to pronounce it.
It was now midsummer, and had become excruciatingly
dull. As the mercury rose, my brother Joseph's spirits
fell. His was an active mind, and was rarely occupied
with more than one of two subjects, business and love,
alternatelyand indeed he paid his addresses to his lady
like a man of business, rather than a romantic Orlando.
For hours, each day and night, after the expiration of the
first two months, which was in effect the expiration of the
business season, Joseph was employed in laborious
mathematical
calculations, endeavoring to solve the problem in
advance, viz., the net profits of the first year's business.
Every loose scrap of foolscap lying about the desk or
counter, was covered with figures. More than once, he
had succeeded in demonstrating a most desirable result,
when, unfortunately, the discovery of an error in his
additions
or multiplications, plunged him into a fit of vexation
and despondency. In vain I suggested the futility of all
such mere abstractions, and contended that the amount
of gains figured up, whether great or small, must yield to
the tangible inexorable result, to be ascertained at the
expiration
of the year. He could not sit with folded hands
and await the time of reckoning. His vigorous and
restless
mind had to be kept in constant exercise. Once or
twice, it is true, he made an effort to dismiss his business
anxieties from his teeming head, and sat down to play drafts
with me. I could always beat him. I could concentrate
all my faculties on the game; while his thoughts ever and
anon wandered back to his business. This mortified him
exceedingly, and was a source of fretfulness to his
impatient
temper. He was ambitious, and liked to excel in
everything he undertook. At times, he would toss the
board aside, and seize a book from the shelf, (western
merchants always keep a limited assortment of books, as
Messrs. G. E. & Co. can testify,) and for the space of
fifteen
minutes, would seem to be perfectly oblivious of
everything around him. One day my idle curiosity led me
to watch the direction of his eyes, as he held a book
before
his face. They were perfectly stationary. Thus he
remained several minutes, when he took a pencil from his
pocket and began to cover the margin with his figures.
Joseph, said I, interrupting him, you'll spoil that
book; here's a bit of paper, if you wish to make more
calculations
.
True, Lukesee if you can get these figures out with
a bit of India rubber. I cannot read or do anything else
in these dull times. To pass along agreeably, I must have
employmentbusiness employment, or I am miserable.
Nothing can divert my mind, but matters connected with
the store, orsomebody I left behind, at Franklin.
Then, Joseph, why don't you go and pass your leisure
time with her? I can easily manage here, in such dull
times as these. But I hope you won't make a match of it
for some months yet, when your prospects, will, perhaps,
be better defined.
No, said he; I am resolved not to marry before the
end of the yearand as it will depend in a great measure
upon the success of this establishment, whether it can take
place even then, you see at once the cause of my anxiety,
and the reason why I am `always figuring,' as you term it.
I am racking my brains for a fortune and a wife at the
same time.
I see it all, now, I replied. And I presume you
are just as fidgety in Miss C.'s presence, as you are
here. A year is a long time to wait, when both parties
are willing; but it cannot be shortened. It might be as
well to keep out of sight of the ripe grapes, until you have
constructed the ladder which will enable you to reach
them.
I am not quite sure of that, said he, musing.
Somebody
else might be tempted to take advantage of my long
absence, and succeed in robbing me of the prize. I don't
know what misrepresentations might be made. In fact,
some scoundrel has already been wicked enough to report
that I have been smitten with some one here. But I
cannot
make up my mind to go, without taking along some
certain information in regard to the amount of profits; and
I have come to the conclusion that all my calculations
amount to nothing more than mere `guess-work.' There
is only one way to get at the true result thus far
You know, Joseph, said I, interrupting him, for I
anticipated the onerous undertaking he was about to
propose
,
and wished to avert itthe amount we have sold
fifteen hundred dollars on credit, and twelve hundred
dollars
cashtwenty-seven hundred dollars altogether.
Won't it be sufficient to state these facts, at the same time
putting down the average profits at about seventy-five per
cent., which will not be over the mark?
We might, in that way, arrive nigh the true result,
said he; but still it would be guessing. I want to take
with me a true statement of factsfacts which will be
incontrovertible
.
I know it will be a laborious undertaking
to take an account of stock. But it is the only proper way
to do business. We have nothing else to do, and that
kind of employment will be much better than sheer
idleness
.
It will have the effect to make you more familiar
with the qualify and the value of the goods, and you can't
fail to derive advantage from such knowledge.
I urged one or two more arguments to avoid the
threatened
laborand I must confess I had an aversion to
anything
like unnecessary exertion, and was too apt to argue
on the side of my inclinationsbut it was useless; the
thing had to be done; and so we set about it at once.
Joseph
was now busy again, and his features were once more
animated and cheerful.
At the end of the third day we had finished the job
and the result showed a profit, so far, of twelve hundred
dollars. This was satisfactory to Joseph. The only thing
wanting to make the result absolutely certain, was a
knowledge
of the amount of the debts that would ultimately
prove to be bad. This knowledge could not be supplied.
The debts were not due, or Joseph would have sent me
out to demand payment. This he could not do, and so I
defied his restless mind and inventive genius to devise
any more unnecessary labor for me.
There was nothing left for Joseph to do, now, but to
visit his lady-love, which he did. The dull time continued,
the sales averaging not more than one hundred dollars per
week. A steamboat arrived only about once every
fort-night
,
which served but little to relieve the monotony of
the scene. There were but three boats running on the
river. Now there are forty, and there are daily arrivals
and departures.
I amused myself by exploring the primeval wilds of the
vicinity. Early in the morning, before any one came to
town, (it was always called a town,) and in the evening,
when all had departed, I was in the habit of locking the
door, and making solitary rambles with my rifle on my
shoulder. In the immediate vicinity of the river, there
was a succession of hills and valleys. But on going a mile
back in the interior, the country became level. The plain
was beautifully interspersed with groves and small prairies
between; but was occasionally marred by small lakes or
ponds, covered near the margin with the broad-leaved
water-lily, and in the centre, with an ominous green
scum. Nevertheless, I loved to linger in the
neighborhood
of these bodies of water, and gaze upon the rank
vegetation and rich flowers that fringed them. Unlike
Joseph
,
it required no painful effort for me to dismiss the
cares of business from my mind. On the other hand, I
was too often absorbed with the visionary creations of the
brain. Instead of merely seeking relief from the dull
routine
of the store, by indulging romantic fancies, I too
frequently
felt a reluctance and disgust on being called upon
to step aside from my cherished ideal regions, to sell a pair
of coarse shoes to a big negro fellow! But even that was
not repugnant to the eyes of any fashionable society in
those regions; and when I reflected, as I was often under
the necessity of doing, that I was utterly destitute of
fortune
,
and was pursuing an honest means of making a
support
,
I made a shift to grin and bear it. I alone was
to blame for permitting my ideas to make such exalted
flights, and richly merited the mortification I felt on having
them rudely thrust down to earth again.
7
Joseph protracted his visit several weeks, and in the
meantime I managed to amuse myself during his absence.
The comparative suspension of business had no horrors for
me, aside from the thoughts of ultimate success, which
depended
upon the realization of good profits and a liberal
amount of sales. But such thoughts did not trouble my
mind a great deal. On the contrary, without reflecting on
the expense, I consumed nearly a keg of Dupont's best
powder, to say nothing of the lead, during my brother's
absence, in firing my rifle at a target. I became an
excellent
marksman, and took pleasure in exhibiting my skill
to the old deer hunters. I also fished in the muddy river,
where nothing could be caught but huge catfish. One,
that I succeeded in bringing to the shore, weighed more
than a hundred pounds. I have related this fact to eastern
men who doubted its correctness. But any western
merchant
will be my witness of its truth. I have heard of
some being caught that weighed two hundred pounds.
But I had other enjoyments. Fruits and melons grew
in great abundance, and were delicious. No country
produces
them in greater perfection. Of course they were
brought me every day, even without the trouble of asking
for them. As I have said, the merchant in a new country
is a kind of lord, and everything that is good and desirable
is at his service. I did not spare these luxuriesnor did
they spare me. What with my early and late rambles to
the putrescent lakes, in the heavy dews, and the immense
consumption of melons, peaches, plums, &c., in which I
indulged, I soon found myself a victim to the prevailing
disease of the country.
The western merchants are pretty generally conversant
with all the symptoms of the ague and fever; but there
may be others, designing to emigrate, who would like to
learn something specific about them in advance. I do not
know that I am capable of giving an intelligible diagnosis
to the uninitiated reader; but he will doubtless be enabled
fully to recognize my description, when his time shall
come to have a shake or two himself.
It was a cool cloudy morning. I remember
that
distinctly
.
I rose with a dull, languid feeling, lazily opening
the door and window-shutter. I reluctantly swept the floor,
with a feeling of weariness and disgust of life. I ate but
little that morning, and returned gaping, and stretching my
arms, to the store. There was a dull pain in my head,
and along my back-bone. My shoulder-blades every few
minutes seemed inclined to flap together, like a pigeon's
wings. I tried to read; but could not succeed. Presently
Mr. White came in.
Why, Luke, said he, it's coming on sooner than I
thought it would. When you left the breakfast table this
morning, I said to the girls, he's going to have a touch of
the ague, and I'll go over to the store to witness the sport.
But I did not suppose it would come on for an hour or so.
I described my feelings to him, and he said they were
the invariable precursors of the shakes.
But, said I, surely
this
kind of illness is not
regarded
as a matter of
sport
, in this country!
It is, in a measure, said he. When I had it, they
laughed at me, instead of sympathizing with me. Almost
every one has it the first season of his abode here; but it
is easily cured. Everybody has a prescription for it.
Mine is calomel, antimonial wine, and Peruvian bark.
Every one that comes to the store will prescribe a remedy,
and no two of them will be alike. Mine, I know, is
infallible
,
provided you take care of yourself afterwards.
You must discontinue your lonely rambles about the green
ponds, particularly when there are dews or fogs. You
must quit eating melons; and you must not indulge your
appetite to the full extent on the intermediate days
between
the chills. You must
Ah! said I, yawning dreadfully, I am quivering all
over now. My teeth clapped together somewhat like the
vibrations produced by a dray, running over a rough
pavement
!
I am shivering in every limb. Look at my hands!
My fingers were purple under the nails, and my hands
were as unsteady as those of an octogenarian stricken with
palsy. Mr. White arranged me a pallet of blankets on the
counter, and I laid down. It now seemed to me that I
could feel, and almost hear, my bones grating each other
at the joints.
Please put more blankets on me, Mr. White! I
exclaimed
,
in tones nearly inarticulate from internal agitation.
He continued to heap them on me, until the whole stock
in trade was brought in requisition. There were twenty
odd pairs of heavy Mackinaw blankets piled up on me;
but still my earthquake of an ague made that mountain of
wool shake from one end to the other. I was in great
agony!
Bear it like a man, Luke, said Mr. White; the
first fit is the worst. After one or two shakes you'll get
used to it, and not mind it much.
IIll never get used to anything like
this! I replied, with difficulty, my teeth chattering
violently.
Yes you will, continued Mr. White. If I had
known that the ague was coming on so soon, I would
have brought with me the antimonial wine. It should be
taken before the spasm seizes you. Day after to-morrow
you will have another fit of it, and then you will take time
by the forelock. But you must take calomel to-morrow.
The reader may, perhaps, form some slight idea of my
feelings as I lay there, the victim of that cruel disease,
compelled to listen to such cool remarks, and to behold
the quiet smile on the lips of my benevolent tormentor
for Mr. White was one of the kindest men in the world.
Mr. White continued: Nobody thinks of sending for
a doctor in this country, until they fear they are past
recovery
,
and such being the case, such patients rarely do
recover. Almost always when the doctor is sent for, he is
followed by the carpenter, to make the coffin. But this
does not often occur in simple cases of fever and ague,
like yours. You need not fear any serious consequences,
if you will only follow my advice. Every person will tell
you, you must take calomel, and there is a universal
measure
for the dose, which I must guard you against. When
I had my first ague, there being no apothecary's scales
convenient, I was informed that the custom of the country
was to
measure
the dose, not weigh it. They said one
must dip his pocket-knife in the mineral and swallow as
much as would lie on the end of it, and this they will tell
youbut you must not heed them. The only
pocket-knife
I carried at that time was one with a broad blade,
for the purpose of pruning fruit trees. I suppose it would
have held about an ounce and a half, which would have
physicked an elephant. And I have no doubt I have seen
seventy grains administered thus. I have seen hunters in
the woods take calomel from the end of their butcher knives,
which they used in cutting the throats of the deer they had
shot down. But so far from killing those hardy men, after
lying down among the dry leaves a few minutes, while the
ague was on them, they would rise again and continue
the hunt. But your constitution would not bear it, nor
mine. So when I went to the land office to enter the bit
7*
of ground over yonder, I got an apothecary to weigh me
twenty grains of calomel, and when I returned, I purchased
a knife having a blade just of the right size to hold the
proper dose. With this knife, which I will leave with
you, I have measured more than a hundred doses for the
neighbors. No doubt, if you can find any knives in your
stock of the same dimensions, you can sell them for any
price you please. I have been offered five dollars for this
one.
Give me a drink of water, if you please, Mr. White!
I exclaimed, and at the same time began to kick off the
blankets. The fever, which invariably succeeds the ague,
then came on, and I felt as one with hot lava injected into
his veins. In vain Mr. White expostulated with me,
and warned me that the more water I drank, the more
violent would be the fever. I emptied the pitcher into
my stomach, and implored him to fetch me more. This
he would not do; and my fever increasing, I talked
incessantly
of cool shades and clear brooks.
When I get out, said I, I'll show you whether or
not I'll have water. I'll strip myself, and plunge into the
pool at the spring. I'll lie for an hour with my mouth
open, and drink the cold fresh water as it gurgles from the
rock.
If you do, said he, the very next hour the
neighbors
will be holding an inquest over your body.
Pshaw! I replied, half conscious of my raging
nonsense
,
you know I will do no such foolish thing. But it
is refreshing to think and talk about the cold water at the
spring.
Mr. White remained with me about three hours. At
the expiration of that time, he made the joyful discovery
of a slight moisture in the palms of my hands. It was not
long before the fever subsided, and I got up, very giddy
and very weak, but very cheerful. I had once expressed
a silly desire to have a touch of the ague, and now
recollected
having joined the merriment at the expense of
those who were troubled with the disease. Indeed I had
become so much accustomed to hear the ague spoken
of lightly and contemptuously, that I really fancied there
was nothing in it to be seriously dreaded. I had now
found out my mistake; but notwithstanding, as it seemed
to be the custom of the country, I, too, affected to regard
it indifferently.
Towards evening, to show my hardihood, I walked out
as usual with my gun on my shoulder, and killed a young
rabbit for food for a young wolf which had been given
me, and which I foolishly thought could be domesticated,
and taught to follow his master like a dog.
On the day that had been appointed by Mr. W., I felt
the premonitory symptoms, sure enough. The calomel
had been taken on the intermediate day, and the
antimonial
wine was in readiness. I had never taken any
medicine
before, save, perhaps, oil and paregoric in the nursery;
and as the dreaded calomel had not proved so bad to
take, nor so violent in its effects, as I anticipated, I rather
increased than diminished the dose of antimony, as it was
made pleasant to the taste, always excepting the
farewell
twang. I was wholly ignorant of the mode of its
operation; and Mr. W. had not deemed it proper to
inform
me. I had incidentally remarked in his presence that I
could bear any fits but vomiting fits, which always came
nigh killing me. After that information I could not but
wonder why he should insist on administering the
antimony
.
But he deemed it necessary; and he was present,
and saw me take it. He was silent when I intimated that
it had done me good, and made me feel rather better. He
awaited the timeand it shortly came. Presently I
complained
of a sick stomach, and grew alarmed, as this
was a new symptom. Mr. W. said nothing. At length
his assistance was required, and was promptly given, in
silence.
Oh! I exclaimed, during a short breathing spell,
this is what I have always dreaded most! It will kill
me, I fear. Give me any other kind of illness but this!
You will be better, presently, remarked Mr. W., with
great confidence. This is no new thing. It is always
so with me when I have the ague.
I hope I shall not burst a blood-vessel! said, I during
another brief interval. I have long ago made up my
mind never to permit a physician to give me an emetic
and if one ever does, it will be good policy in him not to
let me survive it!
Mr. White said not a word. I had but a slight chill
that day, and not much fever afterwards. Mr. White
informed
me at the tea-table that the charm was broken;
and that I would have no return of the ague, if I followed
his advice. It was true. There was no return of the
malady on the regular day, nor until I disregarded the
injunctions
of my friend.
CHAPTER V.
At
the beginning of autumn, business revived, and the
success of the establishment was placed beyond a doubt.
The emigrants from the slave-holding states came out in
large numbers in the fall. All of them brought more or
less money with them, upon which to subsist until they
could make a support for themselves. They had to buy
all the food and clothing they consumed the first months of
their abode in the country. Those who had preceded
them furnished the articles. Thus a constant trade was
kept up among themselves. There were no exports. But
as there were ten thousand things, in the way of
merchandize
,
not brought with the emigrants, and yet
indispensable
to their convenience, it followed that the merchant did
a flourishing business. At the present day, I presume the
state of Missouri, and the neighboring states, export as
much in value as they import. Their supplies of tobacco,
hemp, wheat, corn, live-stock, meat, &c., seem now to
be inexhaustibleto say nothing of their minerals. But
the cash finds its way into the desk of the merchant, as it
did formerly.
Joseph was delighted with his success; but his restless
mind was ever on the wing. Although his ambition
impelled
him to resolve to be the pioneer, the leader, the
most successful member of the family, yet he was desirous
that the rest of us should follow in his footsteps, at a
respectful
distance behind. One night, when we were sitting
as usual at the door, enjoying the fine breeze which swept
gently up the river, he said:
Luke, how would you like to commence doing business
for yourself? Our family is numerous, and all of us poor.
Those of us who are old enough, should embrace every
opportunity to make all the money we can, in an honest
way. Nothing but energy, honesty and perseverance is
required to succeed in a new country. Our parents are
getting old, and several of the children are yet too young
to assist them. We must strain every fibre to be enabled
to help them along. You see the necessity of dropping all
ideas except those of business.
I like the idea very well, I replied; but I don't see
how it can be accomplished. I have no capital, and you
are about to increase your expenses.
You are mistaken, Luke. By marrying I will rather
diminish my expenses. My wife's fortune will be equal
to my own. Neither of them is much, but the little we
have being united, will enable us to get along without
additional expense. Besides, when I am settled down
permanently
,
my credit and standing will be better established.
My business qualifications are known to the merchants
in this regionand I have no fears for myself. If I
continue
to have health, I will soon achieve a fortune. I have
had propositions from a half dozen men of capital already,
to enter into partnership with them at the expiration of my
present engagement. It will be the same with you, if you
prove capable. A young man of good character, and of
business capacity, will not long want for capital in a new
country. But he must be steadfast, energetic, and never
ashamed
of small beginnings.
I felt Joseph's rebuke, and assented to its justness. He
had more than once detected my reluctance to attend to
some of the minor details of the business.
But, said I, curious to know how I might begin
operations on my own account, in what way do you
propose
that I shall commence business for myself?
In a very small way, said he; but if you think it
too small, you can let it alone. It would be a beginning,
without much risk; and it might put a few hundred dollars
in your pocket. It would at all events test your capacity
for business, and exercise your genius in that line, if you
have any. But I'm afraid your notions are too high for
such small matters. You have too much pride, Luke, I'm
afraid, to succeed in business. A young man in your
destitute
condition, if he means to rise in the world, should
hesitate at no honest undertaking to make a living.
But tell me what it is you propose, said I, growing
impatient; there is but one thing that I would object to
embarking in; and if it be that, I must refuse.
What is it you allude to? he asked.
Selling liquorkeeping a tippling shop, said I, with
some emphasis.
It is not that, Luke, said he; I have too much pride
myselfno, not pride, if such a thing were necessary and
not morally wrongbut sense of propriety, to propose that.
This is what I mean. You get a salary of one hundred
and twenty dollars, and your board. You have been
tolerably economical in the way of clothing, and only
shown a little extravagance in the purchase of a gun, and
some pets; (I had, besides my wolf, a squirrel and a fawn;)
and I find there are now about fifty dollars to your credit.
Instead of taking that sum in return for the money I loaned
you in Kentucky, I will just charge you the interest at
present
,
and permit you to have the principal to speculate on
in racoon skins, and other peltry. No doubt if you write
advertisements, stating that you will purchase such articles,
you will make a considerable trade.
The
coon
trade! ejaculated I, laughing.
Oh, if you don't like the idea, you need have nothing
to do with it.
I
will engage in it myself, he continued,
as he perceived something like a sneer in my manner.
I haven't said I don't like it, I replied. I was only
amused at the idea. Indeed I do like it very well,
and hope to make something out of it. But I can't expect
to make much on a capital of fifty dollars. However, if
the profits be ever so small, still the sum realized will be
better than nothing; and it will be a beginning, as you say.
But what if I lose?
You
can't
lose, replied he, firmly. If you only
determine
to make money, you will succeedthat is my motto.
But I will make by it, too. You must pay for your peltry in
goods, and charge yourself with the amount. If this
over-runs
the sum due you on the books, more will be still
accruing
to your credit from your salary. It will teach you
habits of economy and calculation, which will be of
infinite
benefit. If you should run up the account to several
hundred dollars,
I
will make no objection; and presume
my partners will make none, as the debt will be liquidated
when you get returns from your shipments to St. Louis.
I now caught at the idea with eagerness, and began to
calculate rather too fast for Joseph. It had been originally
agreed, that any merchandise charged to my account, should
be put at the rate of only twenty-five per cent. profit, and
I suggested that I should have the advantage of a deduction
on the goods I sold in exchange for furs, at the usual
prices, to that extent. Joseph was pleased at this evidence
of my penetration, but objected positively to the
arrangement
,
reminding me that in truth, the capital I was to
operate on, was not my own, as I owed it all to himand
furthermore, that the moderate profit alluded to, was only
intended to be applied to articles for my own use.
With a sigh at the disadvantages under which
circumstances
compelled me to operate, I was, nevertheless,
pleased with the novelty of the undertaking, and so I
entered
with a degree of cheerfulness and hope upon my
new career. It was a kind of by-play in the scenea sort
of
imperium in imperio
, as the great politicians at
Washington
would sayand afforded a new diversion for the
mind. It led me to read again many tales of great
results
growing out of small beginnings, and was a useful
lesson in lessening my pride, which had been engendered
in great part from the incredible number of fashionable
romances I had read.
In a few weeks, I had the lumber room and two lofts
pretty well filled with coon skins, otter, muskrat, &c. The
store smelt like a hatter's shop, and Joseph sometimes
evinced his displeasure at the odor. I had gone the full
extent of his limits, and in the event of my failure in
business
,
he began to see that the firm of J. Shortfield & Co.
might be involved in my fall. So he put a veto upon any
farther proceedings, until I had made a shipment and got
my returns. He said my liabilities were already too far
extended, and it was time to begin to realize. But he
had perforce to permit me to extend them a little farther.
I bought of him all the empty casks and barrels about the
concern, to pack my skins in. It was a tedious process.
To say nothing of the oleaginous particles on the flesh
side of the skins, I discovered with alarm that the moths
had begun to play havoc with the other sideand Joseph
feared that they might play havoc with the cloths. I spread
them all out in the sun, and gave them a good beating
before
packing them. We then overhauled the woolen
goods in the house, and found that no material damage
had been done.
At length the day of shipment came. The old Globe
was puffing and straining to round to at the landing. It
was a tedious and difficult operation. The old merchants
of Missouri, all remember the Globe. She could run
only about twenty-five miles a day up stream, barring the
narrow places and short bends, where the current was
unusually
rapid. At one of such places, I have seen her
8
make three ineffectual attempts to turn a point, and
have to fall back and wood at the same yard as many
times. Then she made only five miles a day. She was
commanded by Captain Clarke and his wife; but the wife
was more of a man than the husband, and commanded
him, as well as the crew, on many occasions. Still, they
made money. They charged two dollars a hundred for
freight up to the same places to which goods are now
brought for twelve and a half cents. Having first agreed
to pay so much per hundred pounds, I rolled my furs down
to the natural wharf, which consisted of a bluff bank and
a tree to make fast to. When the old lady saw the
casks beginning to bounce and hop about, indicating their
lightness, she began to demur to the agreement. But it
was too lateI carried the day, got my bills of lading
signed, and saw my first lot of produce leave the harbor.
During the succeeding two weeks, my thoughts were
pretty much occupied with speculations on the probable
result of my venture. I dreamed of most astonishing
profits
at night; and was eager, on the succeeding day, to
continue
my purchases. But Joseph positively forbade it.
I had no remedy but to tell the trappers and hunters to
await the result of my shipment. I ran no risk of losing
the business. I had a complete monopoly of the coon
trade.
At the expiration of three weeks, a letter came to hand
from the commission merchant to whom the consignment
had been made. It was brought up by the Otto, a new
boat, and the fastest one that had been hitherto on the
river. The letter was dated only four days back. Joseph
received it, he having gone down to the landing while I
remained at the store waiting on some customers. When
he returned, I saw that his eyes sparkled, and knew that
he had good news for me.
Luke, what will you take for your profits? said he,
holding the open letter in his hand.
One hundred dollars, at a venture, said I.
You have done better than that, said he, placing the
letter in my hand.
And, sure enough, I had done better. The whole
consignment
had cost me, including the barrels, just four
hundred
and sixty dollars, six and a quarter cents. The net
proceeds of sales were eight hundred and twenty-nine
dollars
,
ninety-three and three quarter cents! And that
amount remained in the hands of Messrs. Tracy & Co.,
subject to my order. I had cleared by the operation three
hundred and sixty-nine dollars, eighty-seven and a half
cents! It was with difficulty I could comprehend the
extent
of my good fortune, at first. The amount appeared so
large, that I feared there might be some mistake. I was so
imprudent as to read the letter over and over again, aloud,
disregardful of my brother's prudential hints to be silent.
Finally, I became convinced of the reality of my
acquisition
,
and determined to lose no time in resuming my
operations
in the coon trade. My next thought was to write
a letter to Blanche, apprising her of my prospects, which I
did in glowing terms.
But I found, to my dismay, that the coon trade was
over. The prices in St. Louis were soon known all over
the country, and there were dozens of speculators in the
field. I could not afford to give the prices the people now
asked; and Joseph did not suggest any other speculation
for me. In truth, it was ascertained that my speculations
on my own hook were occupying too much of my
attention
,
and threatened to be detrimental to the interest of
my employers; and so Joseph did not exhibit much
sorrow
in my behalf on account of this disappointment.
The time was now arrived for us to begin to make
collections
for the first goods sold on credit, and I was likely
to have employment enough. After making out the bills,
which I found to be a most tedious labor, Joseph mounted
me on a horse and started me into the interior. He urged
me to be diligent, stating that upon my success depended
in a great measure his future welfare and mine. He said
that if the establishment could realize the amount of money
that the first importation of goods had cost in Philadelphia,
his partners would permit him to go east in the winter, and
purchase his next stock himself. I was fully impressed
with the importance of my mission, and resolved to do my
best. But by way of securing my personal safety, as I
alleged
,
though in reality to promote my amusement, by
mingling
sport with business, I insisted on carrying my rifle
with me, which Joseph reluctantly permitted.
An hour's ride sufficed to place me in the beautiful
prairienot an unrelieved, cheerless plain of interminable
extent, as many suppose the prairies of Missouri to be; but
a series of gentle slopes bounded by parallel ravines. On
either side of these ravines were beautiful groves of
oak, spreading a half mile in width, and extending miles
in length. Thus only about two-thirds of the land
consisted
of prairie, and a fair proportion of the travel was
under the grateful branches of umbrageous trees. Here
nature seemed to invite the industrious man to partake of
her richest bounties. He had only to till the virgin soil,
laid off in fields and hedges ready for him, and then to
reap an abundant harvest. Every portion of the country
that I saw in cultivation, brought forth at least fifty-fold.
The reader may be assured that I am not describing
the mere creations of the imagination. My object is to
convey accurate information. Even my incidents are not
falsely colored. I state the bad as well as the good of a
new countryand I trust that I shall be believed; and
farther, if the good shall be thought to preponderate, and
if a portion of those whose circumstances may require
a change of location, shall be induced by a perusal of
these pages to take up their abode in the lovely clime
of the west, I will be conscious of having done a service
to some of my fellow-creatures. Missouri is one of the
largest states in the Union; and there are portions of it,
far up the river, now being settled, which afford all the
inducements that the central region presented eighteen
years ago. There is one false idea especially in regard to
the first inhabitants of the western states, which should
be corrected. The belief is quite prevalent that because
the habitations of the emigrants are rude, and the
comforts
and conveniences of civilization necessarily much
restricted, the intelligence and morals of the people must
correspond. This is the reverse of the truth. With the
exception of the few desperate and abandoned creatures
who always flee from justice to the verge of civilization,
the population of those new settlements is composed, for
the most part, of people of great natural energy of
character
who
have, besides, more than a moderate share of
wise penetration. These people foresee the benefits that
will ultimately be realized by their children as the country
grows older, and as property, both real and personal,
augments in value, and they have the courage and
perseverance
to contend for the prize. Besides, they bring
with them a variety of useful information from the
respective
states and localities they have abandoned, and by their
unrestrained intercourse with each other, by their
interchange
8*
of sentiment, they acquire an amount of varied
intelligence, on all subjects of moment, which may be
vainly looked for in the more secluded portions of the
comparatively densely populated states of the north and east.
And in regard to genuine piety, and the true charities of life,
an equal proportion of them fall not a whit behind their
brethren in the old states. It is true that occasionally
some characters are found, such as I have hinted at, who
put all the precepts of religion at defiance, and disregard
all the proprieties and decencies of good neighborhood;
but such vicious persons are speedily rooted out by the
good sense of the well disposed portion of the
community
as soon as their numbers grow sufficiently ample for
the purpose. It was so with the representative of the
county, Mr. Beckel. So soon as he ascertained that a
majority of the voters were disposed to evince at the polls
their condemnation of his loose morals, he sold his property
and took up his abode in Texas.
At the point where the smooth prairie road which I was
traversing, entered a dense grove, through the centre of
which ran a large rivulet of cool transparent water, I
espied, some fifty paces ahead, my enemy, the desperate
Irishman. He was seated quietly on his horse, which was
standing in the water, with his mouth thrust in the brook,
and his tail switching violently at the flies, which are
generally
a great annoyance in all new countries. The
Irishman had his rifle on his shoulder. A cold chill ran
up my back as he raised his head and recognized me.
His brow was dark, and he gazed steadfastly at me. I
was now within twenty paces of him. It would not do to
turn and flee away. I frankly confess I had the disposition
to do so, and would certainly have avoided him, if he had
not seen me. But now it was too late. I had to brave it
out, although every fibre in me tingled with fear. I was
a famous shot. Every body for twenty, yes, forty miles
round, had heard of my extraordinary skill with the rifle;
and fortunately my rifle was in my hand. Having made
up my mind that there was no alternative but to meet my
deadly foe in that narrow road, (it was just wide enough
for a wagon to pass, and on either side there was a dense,
impenetrable undergrowth of briers, bushes, and tangled
grape vines,) my subsequent conduct was the result of
an unerring instinct which had more than once extricated
me in moments of sudden peril. I checked my horse
and dismounted, and pretended to adjust my girth. But
I so arranged the animal(apparently by accident, though
in reality altogether by design)that while there should
be ample room for my adversary to pass, his body
should at the same time be interposed between us. I
kept my eye fixed on the Irishman, and my rifle at rest
on my left arm, while I held the breech and lock in my
right hand. My foe did not seem to have any inclination,
on his part, to turn and fly. But he
hesitated
, when his
horse was done drinking. He had once received a blow
from my hand which had well nigh sufficed him.
Perhaps
he was speculating about the chances of receiving
farther injury, rather than meditating vengeance. This idea
occurred to me, and caused me to act with more decision.
I would have been justified had I killed him, for it was
notorious that he still threatened to take my life. But I
had no such intention. My purpose was only to escape
with an unperforated skin. Assuming as much
fierceness
as possible, I compressed my lips, and kept my
eye fixed upon his. At length he touched his horse
with the spur, and advanced very slowly. His gun was
still on his shoulder, but his hand was on the lock and guard.
When he was within five steps of me, he heard the click
of my lock as I set the trigger. He paused an instant.
His gaze became unsteady, and his head hung down a
little, so that his broadbrimmed palm leaf hat almost
obscured his eyes. I saw that he was pale, and that the
hand which held the reins trembled. I was convinced he
was as much of a coward as myself; but I knew he was
a dangerous man, and would shoot me in the back if he
should get the opportunity.
What are you going to do? he finally asked, in a
squeaking, tremulous tone. I was afraid to speak myself.
I
felt
that I could not do it without betraying great
agitation
and alarm. So I merely responded by a motion of
the head for him to pass on his way.
Do you intend to shoot? continued he. Again I
made a motion for him to pass, and this time with more
energy and impatience. He now looked me imploringly
in the face. It did not require language to express more
audibly his hope that I would not shoot him in the back
when he had passed. He was capable of doing such a
thing himself, but had sufficient knowledge of human
nature to suppose that I would be incapable of perpetrating
so base an act. So he rode on, very slowly, with his face
turned towards me. As he rubbed by, I turned too, by
degrees, so as to watch all his motions. He still did not
dare to shift the rifle from his shoulder, knowing that such
a movement would be the signal for me to fire, and I was
in the best attitude to fire first, and with the most precision.
Now I had resolved not to fire at all. I had no intention
of taking his life. And I was satisfied that if I once
discharged
my gun, without fatal effect, I would have no
chance of escape. Hence I had determined, the instant
I perceived his purpose to precipitate a strife, to plunge
into the bushes and hide myself, convinced that he would
abandon the ground the moment I was concealed from his
view, as I would then have it in my power to fire upon
him from a covert. I thought, besides, I would have
a better chance to escape his aim in the bushes. The
woodman will never follow the rattlesnake into a thicket.
But I was no serpent, and there was no necessity for me
to put my project into execution. He passed on, and as he
advanced, he mended his gait. When he was fifty yards off,
he spurred his horse into a brisk trot. I was not yet quite
out of danger, knowing well the capabilities of the rifle;
and so I maintained my position until he was one hundred
and fifty yards distant, and hidden from view by a turn
in the road. Then, for the first time, I recollected that
my rifle was not loaded! I was almost prostrated with
the sudden shock produced by this consciousness. It is
true I had not pictured to my mind the contingency
which would have induced me to fire. But there
was
such
a contingency, and I knew it, although I would not think
of it. The little bit of lead, which I had supposed
was in my rifle, was my only reliance in a final struggle.
And now I remembered that my gun was empty.
I sprang upon my horse, dashed through the brook at
a gallop, and never paused until I was a quarter of a mile out
in the prairie on the opposite side. Then I dismounted,
trembling like an aspen leaf, and too feeble and unsteady
to stand. My fears brought on a slight fit of the ague;
and after I had, with great difficulty, succeeded in charging
my rifle, I lay down on my saddle blanket until the fever
which followed the chill had in a measure subsided.
I was roused by the sound of a horse's tramp
approaching
.
I looked up, and perceived a female riding towards
me at a rapid rate.
What's the matter with you there? Why, is it you,
dear Luke? exclaimed she, checking her panting horse
suddenly, and leaping to the ground. The horse began to
graze about with mine (most of the horses were trained
never to leave their riders when suffered to go loose in the
prairie, and even to follow, should their masters wander
away), while the girl stood at my side. It was Polly
Beckel, whom I dreaded to meet almost as much as the
Irishman. But she had no rifle, and she did not look
revengeful. Nevertheless, she knew how to use fire-arms;
so I instinctively threw out the priming from my lock.
What's the matter, Luke? she continued, seating
herself beside me on the grass.
I had a slight chillthat's all, said I.
Let me see, said she, feeling my pulse. You have
a little feverthough not much.
But I have pretty much of a headache, said I, and
must get out of this hot sun, or it will get worse.
Well, come along with me, Luke; we have some
`bitters' at our house that will cure you.
No, said I, firmly. I am riding on business which
must be attended to.
Pshaw, Luke! don't be afraid of meI won't hurt
you. You mustn't mind my nonsense at the store. I was
in a kind of girlish spree then, and determined to do
something
that would be talked about, and laughed at.
I hope you don't think it could be possible for me to
be afraid of you, or any woman? said I, coolly and
deliberately
.
No, not actually afraid of me, said she, with a very
commendable seriousnessfor indeed her tone and
manner
were more subdued than I had witnessed them before
but
shy
, or backward to participate in my fun and frolic,
when I am in the humor. If you had romped boldly with
me, of course you would have triumphed. I never go
beyond a certain extent with the men, and have more than
once been under the necessity of repulsing their rudeness.
My father has brought me up badlybut my mother
fortunately
succeeded in counteracting his bad breeding in some
degree. You never hear anything said about me worse
than what you have seen. I thought that bad enough.
But it was true there were no other imputations on her
character, and she had given the right version of her
qualities
.
Remembering that I had a bill against her father, I told
her I would visit her house the next day, but that now
I must insist on parting from her, as I had to stop at a
dwelling not so far off, where I had business, and where
I would be able to get relief.
That dwelling was Mr. Middletown's. Mr. M.,
contrary
to his usual custom, had been induced to run up a
liberal account with us, and had recently intimated that he
would be ready with the money whenever I might see
proper
to call for it.
Oh yes! cried she, laughing, as she sprang with
immense agility on her horse. I understand; you are
going down there to be nursed by Miss Maria. I heard
the other day that she says you made the tender of your hand
to her first, and that she has neither accepted nor declined
it yet, but still keeps the proposition under consideration.
You are going, perhaps, to hear her decision?
No, indeed, said I; I feel like anything else than a
lover, now; and besides, to tell you the plain truth, I left
my sweetheart behind me, when I came to Missouri.
Hum, that's not an unusual case. You left her behind,
and so far behind, that the poor thing will never catch up
with you. But what kind of a looking girl is she?
Beautiful, of course, said I. She is tall, with gray
eyes, long black hair, rather dark skin, and good teeth.
Ha, ha, ha! Then she is left behind for good. But
remember, if you think to marry Maria, I give you
warning
that I will have you proceeded against for bigamy. It
would be best for you to get a divorce from meyou know
it is easily done in Missouri.
Ha, ha! But now, in solemn earnestness, said I,
laughing in my turn, will you really take me for better,
for worse, &c.?
Do you mean that as a serious proposition? said she,
looking archly over her shoulder, as her horse moved slowly
away.
I said nothing, but watched the mischievous expression
of her countenance.
If you do, she continued, I tell you plainly that I
will; and if you don't, I sha'n't care a fig. I can enjoy
myself in my own way, as I have always done, free as the
air, without being yoked with a husband. But this is all
folly. I know I wouldn't suit you; and if we were to be
married (as we came very nigh being once), you would be
getting a divorce in a year or two. Good-by.
And so we parted. I rode on to Mr. Middletown's,
where I had a hearty welcome, and every attention that
could be devised to alleviate my aching head. When
the sun went down, the pain subsided, and then I related
the particulars of my encounter with the Irishman. They
all listened with concern, and more especially Miss Maria.
It is so with the young and innocent; they take a more
lively interest in the dangers and woes of others than those
grown callous with age. I could see the color come and
go in her fair face, as I told my story; and when the
danger
was past, she made no effort to conceal her satisfaction.
But when I proceeded to narrate the particulars of the
succeeding
encounter, she did not evince by her looks or
speech any pleasure. On the contrary, Miss Polly received
on that occasion a most unmerciful castigation from the
tongue of the modest and pretty Miss Middletown, and her
parents united with her in censuring the wild girl.
Mr. Middletown not only paid me the amount of his
account in money, but he entertained me like a lord. He
was one of the earliest settlers in the country, and had by
this time every comfort about him that he had enjoyed in
Virginia. He had built a commodious brick house, (one
of his negro men being a mason and another a carpenter,)
without having to expend any money in its erection, except
for window glass, nails, locks, and such small articles.
He had a good horse-mill erected in the same manner, to
say nothing of his ample barn, stables, cider-press, &c.
His farm, consisting of about a thousand acres, and which
had cost him originally only $1250 ($1 25 per acre), was
nearly equally divided between prairie and timber land.
The former was now well enclosed and in a high state of
cultivation. It was laid off in beautiful square fields of
corn, wheat, oats, hemp, tobacco, flax, &c., and each yielded
an abundant crop, for the soil and climate of Missouri are
eminently adapted to the growth of them all. He had
extensive orchards, apple, peach, and cherry, besides pear
and plum trees, and grape vines, distributed in profusion in
the ample garden, in the yard, and along the fence rows.
Then beyond the fields, in the prairie, there were nigh a
hundred head of fat cattle grazing, all in full view; beyond
these were some fifteen or twenty mares and colts, the latter
9
frisking and prancing about. Sheep there were none in
the prairie, and only a few dozen in the immediate
neighborhood
of the house, and even there the wolves would
sometimes assail them. But the swine were literally
innumerable
,
for they had increased so rapidly, as he said, that
he could not keep a correct account of their number. Then
the immense congregation of poultry! This was the
peculiar
property of Mrs. M. and Maria. Such flocks of turkeys,
geese, ducks, and chickens, I had never beheld anywhere
else. The old lady told me that her negroes had chickens
and eggs, fresh butter and milk, and the best of bacon in
abundance, to say nothing of an endless amount of honey,
every day of the year, and they seemed to be truly
contented
with their lot. I have dwelt more particularly on
the condition of this well-conducted farm, inasmuch as I
have learned that the produce sent from it to market
annually
,
at a subsequent period, after retaining sufficient for
the subsistence of the family, amounted, when turned into
hard money, to $1500. And this was only one among ten
thousand. Yet there are twenty thousand others, destined
to run the same glorious career of transformation from a
state of unproductive wilderness to a blooming Eden. But
two days' travel in one of the fine steamers now plying those
waters, will bring one to other lands of equal value and
beauty, and which may be had for one dollar and a quarter
per acre. And yet they are settled but slowly. The
acquisition
of Texas, California and Oregon has tended to
retard the progress of civilization nearer home. Men
are running mad with ideas of wealth and happiness,
inconsiderately
promised them in those distant and almost
inaccessible regions, which are never to be realized. Long
trains of emigrant wagons, with women and helpless
children
,
may now be seen every year toiling their weary way
through the rich and inviting unoccupied lands of Missouri,
to seek an abode in those distant provinces. Should they
be so fortunate as to arrive at the point of their destination,
there are no means, or very inadequate ones, of sending their
products to market. Whereas, on the Missouri river, the
farmer is about as nigh to New Orleans as the growers of
Kentucky, Ohio, Tennessee, and Indiana. From the farthest
settlements up the river, steamers run down in three or four
days to St. Louis, and in about as many more to New
Orleans
.
The lands on the Ohio river are worth from forty to
sixty dollars per acrein Missouri,
improved
lands can be
bought for five dollars. An active competition must
inevitably
graduate this enormous disparity in value, like
spreading water, to an equable and natural level.
When about to set out the next morning, after a rich
warm breakfast, and entirely relieved of all the effects of
my excitement and illness of the previous day, one of
Mr. Middletown's sons, a youth of ten years, seeing my
rifle, told me that he had seen a fine buck, about half a
mile distant, grazing in the prairie within fifty yards of the
timber. Maria, from whom I had already taken leave,
but who was now sitting at an upper window, cried out,
Yonder's the deer; I can see him distinctly from this
window. I will watch him while you creep up and shoot
him.
I determined to exhibit to Miss Maria a specimen of my
skill as a marksman, and set off in a cautious manner in
the direction of the deer, accompanied by Mr. M. and his
son. When we had followed a narrow path through the
bushes which grew out some fifty paces beyond the
timber
to within two hundred paces of the deer, I dismounted,
and Mr. M. held my horse, while his son proposed to guide
me through the dense undergrowth to the spot from which
I was to fire. This was a tuft of high grass detached a few
feet from the bushes, where Mr. M. could see me and the
deer at the same time, and participate in the sport. Master
Peyton preceded me, and we commenced our approach on
our hands and knees. When we got within fifty paces of the
spot from which I was to fire, I became entangled in the
vines, and had to use my knife to cut myself loose.
Master
Peyton grew very impatient, fearing the buck would
scent us, and run away. He, being smaller than I, had
got through without difficulty, and did not seem to take
my superior dimensions into consideration. He was only
intent on seeing the buck bite the dust, for the occasional
glimpses we had of him showed he was still biting the
grass very unsuspectingly. At length I became extricated,
and continued to follow Master Peyton's lead. Finally
we arrived at the edge of the thicket. Here Master Peyton
paused, without removing his gaze from the deer, while I
crept out to the appointed tuft of high grass. I viewed the
noble buck with admiration, resting on my knees and hands.
I turned and saw that Master Peyton's eyes grew larger
and larger, and were fixed immovably on the buck. I
looked beyond, and saw Mr. Middletown stamping with
impatience, and making gestures for me to fire. The buck
lifted his head and snuffed the breeze. He pricked up his
ears and distended his nostrils, as if fearful of some lurking
danger.
Shoot, Luke, or give up the gun!
shouted Mr.
Middletown
.
I had no gun. I had left it among the grape
vines, where I had put it down to get the knife out of my
pocket, and in my intense anxiety to reach the tuft of high
grass, had forgotten to bring it along. I felt mortified
beyond
description. The eyes of all, even the beautiful blue
ones of Miss Maria, were on the scene.
Shoot, Luke, or give up the gun to Peyton! again
shouted Mr. Middletown. His first cry had attracted the
attention of the buck in that direction. But this time he
heard a sound not so distant.
He's going to run, Mr. Shortfield! Shoot quick!
said Master Peyton. He did run. I walked out in the
open space and looked at him bound away, without the
ability to send a leaden messenger after him.
Why did you not shoot? asked Mr. Middletown, who
galloped up on my horse.
I won't tell you, said I, without you promise never
to tell it to any one else.
Well, I'll promise, said he, smiling, and vainly looking
about for my rifle.
Ha! ha! ha! He left it in the busheshe left his
gun behind! exclaimed Master Peytonand crept all
the way out here without it!
You have promised, said I, very deprecatingly, not
to tell on me. You may say I was in love, sick, forgetful
of the proximity of the buck, anything by way of excuse;
but if this thing were known in the county, all the old
hunters would plague me about it forever after.
I have promised, said Mr. Middletown, smiling, as
we returned slowly in the direction of the house. But
Master Peyton had vanished. I caught a brief glimpse of
his cap, as he ran across one of the openings in the orchard.
In vain we screamed for him to come back; the only
response
we had was a prolonged shout of laughter from the
house, which was repeated from the kitchen as the negroes
learned the fact.
I did not go by the house, preferring to make a shorter
cut across the prairie, to the main road leading up the
country. I parted from my sympathizing host with my
9*
chin on my breast, but had not gone twenty paces before
he called me back.
Luke, said he, never mind it. All new deer
hunters
must put up with similar mortifications. You will
have more of them before the fall is over, if you hunt any.
You will have to endure a fit of
buck ague
before you can
kill one. But you must come backyou have forgotten
your gun
again
. It was true. I was riding away, leaving
my rifle in the bushes. I grew angry with myself, as I
turned my horse's head. Mr. Middletown soothed me all
he could, saying this forgetfulness only grew out of the
confusion of the first. I got my gun, and bidding a hasty
good-by to my host, rode off at a gallop.
When I was passing a corner of the most distant field
belonging to Mr. Middletown, and still in view of the
house, I heard the same buck leaping through the corn.
It came towards the corner of the fence. Quickly I sprang
from my horse, (which had once been shot through the ear
by an unskillful hunter, and would not suffer me to fire
from his back,) and throwing the rifle up to my shoulder,
waited for the buck to leap over into the prairie. I was
now buoyant with hope, and confident of success. It
would be a glorious triumph over Master Peyton, to
bring down the noble fellow, at the time that he was
making game of me for permitting him to escape. I did
not wait long. On it came, and springing majestically
over the high fence, stopped stock still, in full view, not
twenty paces distant, with his broad blue side exposed to
my aim. I leveled deliberately, and
snapped
. We used
flint guns then. He turned his head and looked me in the
face. I trembled, but drew back the cock andsnapped
again. The buck leaped on in graceful undulations across
the level plain. I snapped at him a third time as he ran,
but to no effect. Then, once more to my utter confusion,
I recollected having thrown out the priming on the
previous
day, to prevent Miss Beckel from doing any
mischief
,
and that I had not replenished it! But now there
was no witness to my confusionat least I hoped no
one observed me from the house. And my confusion was
only the worse confounded, when I reflected that my
disappointment
would have been certain in the first instance,
even if I had not forgotten my gun in the bushes.
I now strove to banish my mishaps from my mind,
(having first primed my gun,) with thoughts of business.
I looked over my accounts, and shaped my course for the
nighest debtor. That day I dispatched business at a rapid
rate, and by the evening, when I approached the house of
Mr. Beckel, my pockets were well filled with bank notes
and hard dollars.
As I rode up to the fence, I saw more than a dozen
young ladies and gentlemen about the premises. Of course
I knew them all, and felt at home among them. It
appeared
that Polly, in anticipation of my arrival, had invited
the company thither, to have a jollification that night.
We had an abundant supper, and afterwards a dance to a
three-stringed violincards, bitters, and all sorts of
country games. That night, for the first time in my life,
I had to kiss some of the girls, and my backwardness and
awkwardness caused no little merriment. But the
amusement
was not altogether to my fancy; and, besides, I was
weary from my incessant riding that day. The rest of the
folks determined to keep up the fun until broad daylight
the next morning; but I stole away to rest before midnight.
Mrs. Beckel took pity on me, and prepared me a couch on
the floor of one of the rooms. The house was one of the
second class, made of hewn logs, and consisting of two
rooms, separated by a wide hall, in which the sports were
carried on. This hall was twenty feet long, and fifteen
wide, having neither door nor other means of enclosure at
the ends. The floor of the hall, as well as of both rooms,
was composed of flat hewn timber, several inches thick.
The room in which I lay was divided into several small
compartments, by temporary partitions, made of quilts
suspended
from the joists above. I was too drowsy to be
particular
about the construction of my chamber; and so, after
pulling off my boots, coat, and vest, I threw myself down
on the pallet, and was perfectly oblivious of everything
around me in a few minutes.
I had not slept twenty minutes, perhaps, before I was
roused by the indomitable Polly, who placed her hand on
my shoulder, and shook me gently. She held a wax
candle
in the other hand, (bees-wax was frequently used by
the inhabitants,) which threw a brilliant glare in my face.
I had been dreaming of robbers, and the first movement I
made was to place my hand on my rifle, which stood
against the wall near my head.
Don't shoot
me
, said she, with a mischievous smile.
I am no robber. But I'll relieve you of your money, if
you please. Give it to me; I'll be answerable that it is
forthcoming in the morning. I have an old stocking will
hold it, specie, bank notes and all. So saying, she turned
to an old oak chest, which was secured by a thick iron
clasp and ponderous padlock, from which she brought the
article named, the common purse of the country, and very
deliberately took the treasure from under my pillow, and
deposited it in its ample pocket. Then, instead of placing
it in the chest, she ran up a small ladder a few rounds, and
carelessly threw it on a board lying loosely on the joists.
There! said she, it's safe now. Nobody, even if
there were any here so disposed, would ever think of
looking in such a place for money. The old chest might
be carried off and split open with an axe. Now, come!
They have sent after you, and are waiting for me. You
must
dance once more, or they will not let you sleep a
wink to-night. Some of the men have gone home, and
some are playing cards, and there are not enough to make
up the set without you. I want you to be my partner.
After this set, I will break up the dance, and then you can
slip back to your snug bed. You
must
come. The whole
frolic was got up in honor of you. Never mind your coat
and neck-clothbut you had better put on your boots, or
else a splinter may run into your foot. She literally pulled
me to my feet, and so there was no remedy. I was
compelled
very reluctantly to join the company again. It was
the longest reel I ever witnessed. The same figures were
repeated over and over again, until each couple became
entirely exhausted. At length Polly gave me a significant
squeeze of the hand, and at the same time, gave the
wink to the old black fellow that played the violin. He
tossed his head on his left shoulder, and scraped away
with tremendous violence. In a moment, snap! snap! went
the remaining strings.
Thar! said Cesarwe's done for dis night, 'cept
some gentleum goes to de store at Pike Bluff, for more
strings; dese's all worn out, and is too short to be mended
agin. And so he laid down the violin, while the party
were just in the middle of a most animated figure.
Here we are, all brought up standing! said a very
corpulent Miss, whose violent panting made her look as
though she was galloping instead of standing.
Cuss the old nigger! exclaimed another.
It's not his fault, said Polly. The strings were
worn out. It's late, any how; and some of the folks are
tired. But we can sing ballads, now, and enjoy
ourselves
.
Once more I stole away, and was soon fast asleep, not
again to be molested. I rose very early in the morning,
and lifting the curtains, groped my way out. I was
startled
on my way, however, to see the near proximity of my
couch to that occupied by the females, four or five of whom
were sleeping soundly on a broad pallet, and no male but
myself having been placed in that room. Such scenes
afforded
me no pleasure; nor do I derive any from the
description
of them. But such is a true account of the
manners
and customs of new countries.
Although the dim twilight of morning was becoming
visible in the hall, yet the candles still burned on the table
in the next room, and the card-players were still at their
work. My appearance was the signal for them to rise.
They had not been playing for large stakes, and so no one
had sustained any material loss. In fact, the young men
were poor, and Mr. Beckel, who had more than once, on
former occasions, been known to stake and win a negro,
had no opportunity of increasing his store of ill-gotten
gains. He paid me the amount of my bill; and after
adding
to it a hearty breakfast, I took my leave of him, with
my ponderous stocking, which had been safely delivered
into my hand by Polly.
My road lay along a narrow strip of level
heavily-timbered
bottom land, while a steep hill, likewise covered
with trees, rose on my right hand. I had not gone more
than a quarter of a mile before I roused a very large buck
from its lair near the road-side. I stopped my horse to
survey its enormous antlers, as it bounded over the
under-growth
towards the hill. It run up the steep ascent some
forty yards, and paused, turning its head over its back, and
gazing down at me very deliberately. We looked at each
other a considerable length of time, and neither of us
seemed disposed to move off first. At length, it occurred
to me that he was not beyond the reach of my rifle, and I
determined to give the matter a trial, if he should continue
thus to banter me until I could dismount and take a
deliberate
aim at him. I was indifferent about success, and
hence I was perfectly cool and self-possesseda feeling
which must be attained by all successful hunters. So I
got down, drew up my gun, and fired with the same
nonchalance
that I would have done at a target. At the
crack of my rifle, Sir Antler fell sprawling in his tracks.
But the instant I perceived that he was really shot, I was
seized with an uncontrollable fit of trembling. In vain I
called my philosophy and reason to my aid. They would
not come at my bidding. The idea that I had so
unexpectedly
brought down so noble a prize, completely
unnerved
me. It may have been joy and exultation; but it
was certainly a very unmanly and disagreeable sensation.
I ran up the hill, however, for the purpose of cutting
the buck's throat, an operation invariably performed by
hunters, so that the blood may be cast out while it is
warm. When I approached quite nigh my fallen
victim
,
he raised his head and looked fiercely at me. His
eyes were green with rage, and his hair was all standing
out forward, instead of inclining backwards in its natural
position. I paused; I saw that the ball had taken effect
just where the shoulder-blades come together on the back;
he was disabled in both fore legs, and could not possibly
escape, although the wound was not sufficient to cause his
death immediately. I saw him gradually turn round,
until
his head was pointed towards me. Then by degrees he
drew his hind legs under him. I perceived his object,
when it was almost too late. I was only some ten feet
below him. On my left, about four feet distant, stood an
oak tree somewhat thicker than my body. My gun was
empty, and the fury of the animal's stare sent a cold chill
along my spine, similar to the sensation the Irishman had
produced. At first I attempted to approach the tree very
gently, hoping my soft movement would not be noticed
by the buck. But I was mistaken. I saw him in the act
of springing down on me. I made a desperate leap for
the tree as he sprang at me. A protruding root saved me.
His horns rattled upon the bark, covering me with
fragments
.
The sound resembled in my ear the lunge of
crossed bayonets. He fell on the upper side of the tree,
and gathered his legs up for another spring, should I
attempt to escape. I peeped round the tree, and met
his eye of deadly defiance. He was ready for a renewal
of the conflict, but had to wait until I exposed a sufficient
mark for him to assail. With trembling hands I hastily
charged my gun, spilling more than half the powder on
the ground, and running down a naked ball. With this
I fired at his broad forehead, not three feet distant. The
lead was only mashed flat against the thick bone, like a
sixpence, and fell to the ground between his feet; he did
nothing more than shake his head contemptuously, and
prepare
to make another dash at me. I stepped back a few
inches, so as to be hidden from his view by the intervening
tree. But I felt that I was not safe. There was a larger
tree some twenty feet below me. I sprang towards it, and
when I reached it, the sharp prongs of my adversary's
horns were buried in the earth but a few inches from my
feet. Again I loaded my gun and firedbut so great was
my trepidation that the bullet only grazed the skin on the
top of his head, without hurting him. Finding a better
refuge in my new tree, I resolved to suspend active
operations
for a time, in the endeavor to recover a degree of
self-possession, and in the hope that the animal might
grow weaker from loss of blood, which flowed profusely
from his wound, and ran down to my feet. Both of my
objects were realized. I soon saw that the lips and tongue
of the buck grew very pale; and as he became weaker, I
got stronger. I then found no difficulty in charging my
gun in a proper manner. The foe was still game. When
I exposed myself a little too far on one side of the tree, so
as to be enabled to take a sure aim, he immediately
assumed
the attitude of assault, and I was under the necessity
of drawing back again. The next time I looked,
however
,
I saw that he was very faint, and sinking; but he
still maintained an aspect of defiance and an aggressive
attitude. His eyes became glazed and inanimate a few
moments after, and then I gave him the contents of my
gun with unerring precision. He did not move. He was
deadand I believe he was dead when I fired. I then
felt some sorrow for what I had done, mingled with
admiration
of the brave conduct of the noble animal.
By this time the repeated reports of my rifle had attracted
the attention of the family I had recently parted from, and
the old fiddler was sent out to see what I was doing. I
showed him my prize, and told him to go back and get
a horse, and then to present the buck in my name to Miss
Polly.
I rode on my way, now remembering distinctly the
advice
that had more than once been given me by old
huntersnever to approach a deer, or bear, or even a fox
or turkey, which I had shot down, without first reloading
my rifle. The game might not be dead, and might require
10
a prompt repetition of the shot to prevent its escape; there
might be others in the vicinity; and I might catch a
tartar, in going hastily and unprepared to meet a wounded
buckoften the fiercest and most dangerous animal that
runs in the woods.
When I reached the high prairie, I met Mr. White, who
was going to town, and by him I sent all the money I
had collected. He had heard all about my buck scrape
at Mr. Middletown's, and laughed heartily at my absence of
mind, attributing it of course to a dear of another
description
.
Some had me in love with Miss M., some with
one of the Misses W., and all said that Miss Polly was in
love with me. It was a jest all round, and I began to enjoy
the joke as much as any of them. I related to Mr. W.
all the particulars of my last adventure, and made him
confess that I had retrieved my character as a hunter. He
said he would tell this exploit whenever he heard the other
mentioned.
I rode on in quest of more money, and had more or less
success wherever I went. There had been several severe
frosts recently, and the leaves on the trees and bushes
were beginning to turn yellow, and red, and to drop off.
The tall grass became dry, but there was always a green
undergrowth sufficient for the stock until late in
December
;
and the scene near the settlements was still animated
and beautified with flocks, and herds browsing on the
extended plains.
However, as I departed farther from the river, the
settlements
became more scarce, and the groves so few in
number and so small in extent, that the scene before me
was that of an almost undiversified plain. The road I
traveled
was reduced to a very slightly-marked track through
the mottled grass. After having called at several houses,
situated six or eight miles apart, at all of which I transacted
business much in the way that satisfied me most, I was
informed that the next neighbor I designed seeing lived
some fifteen miles distant, and that there was no house on
my way. It was then pretty late in the afternoon of a
short day, and I felt a little uneasy about the chances of
missing my way, should the night overtake me. But
resolving to take my chance, I pushed on.
When the sun was darting his last golden rays across
the horizon before me, I began to grow weary, and still
the house I sought was not in view. I could only see
some patches of scrubby timber six or eight miles a head,
and others as far distant on either hand. When it grew
dark, the wolves set up a frightful howling on every side
of me. I did not apprehend any danger of being attacked
by them; but still no one in my situation would have felt
altogether comfortable in mind. The scene around me
was a dreary wastea deep solitudeenlivened by no
sounds but the fierce howls of carnivorous beasts. Should
any accident befall me, so as to render me incapable
of riding, or of defending myself, it was by no means
improbable
that these animals might take a fancy to pick
my ribs. They grew bolder and bolder, and galloped
along the road before me, every now and then stopping,
two or three abreast, with their noses towards me, until
I trotted up to within twenty paces of them. Then they
would gallop off a few hundred yards, always keeping
precisely a head of me, and again turn and howl until I
approached close to them. The moon was now rising,
and I determined to give them a shot or two, when it
became a little lighter. The light did not seem to make
them more circumspect, and so I ventured to slip down
from my horse and blaze away at them. The scream and
whine which succeeded the report convinced me that I
had wounded one of them. After the smoke cleared away,
and after I was satisfied that none were coming towards
me, I reloaded my gun, and mounting my horse, rode
forward
to see what had become of the party. The howling
was hushed, at all events, and so I had rid myself of one
annoyance. I soon beheld by the moonlight, several pools
of blood in the path where the wolves had been standing;
and then I heard a kicking kind of noise, or rustling, in
some low hazel bushes a little distance on my right hand.
I rode thither, expecting to find the wolf in his last agonies.
But all was quiet. I was convinced that he was done
for, and searched about a considerable length of time in
quest of him. I met with no success, and reluctantly
abandoned the hunt. But now I was in a sad quandary.
I had twisted and turned about so much in my search
that I had lost my direction, and could not, for the life of me,
indicate to a certainty the course I had been pursuing. I
found the path, after making several circuits; but I could not
decide which end of it to take, as the whole firmament had
been suddenly overcast with clouds, which began to let
fall some pattering drops of rain, and completely obscured
the half-filled moon. Like the serpent, it was impossible
to tell whether I was going forward or coming back. I
hesitated in this dilemma for many minutes. At last,
another adage of the hunter occurred to me, and was the
means of my extrication. I threw the reins on my horse's
neck, trusting to his instinct to find out the nearest
corncrib
.
At first he was content with the food nearer at hand,
so he thrust down his head, and began very leisurely to
pluck the short tender grass that grew near the roots of
the older growth, now in a state of decay. This did not
satisfy me, and I touched him pretty sharply with the spur.
He then lifted his head, and finding I did not guide him,
turned short about and pursued briskly a contrary direction
to the one I had come nigh adopting.
My faithful white horse, equal to Old Whitey himself
in sagacity, pursued his course with confidence, and
increased
his pace when he found that I still did not attempt
to guide him. He had not gone more than three or four
miles, when I distinctly heard a watch-dog's bark, an
unerring
sign that we were approaching a house. The sky was
still overcast, and it was impossible for me to descry any
house or other object in the distance, until my horse paused
abruptly, when I discovered that he had his head over
the fence which enclosed the little yard surrounding the
house I was seeking. There were no lights in the house,
the family having retired to rest, or rather thrown
themselves
down to sleep, as there was but one room in the
dwelling. My horse neighed, and aroused the inmates
before I had time to call them up. The first response
was the deep bay of the watch-dog, which was now in the house.
Who's that? cried a voice from the partially opened
door.
It is I, Luke Shortfield. Is that you, Mr. Swissel?
Yes. Hop downgive me your naggo inyou'll
find the old woman there in bed, said he, coming
forward
,
and taking the bridle of my steed.
It looks like rain, said I.
Yes, and it
roars
like it, out yonder in the prairie,
he replied. If you hadn't found us out as soon as you
did, you'd have got your shirt washed in the saddle.
You've just escaped a
scouring
, I tell you!
There was, indeed, a mighty roar now distinctly heard
in the direction whence I had come! I walked into the
10*
house, while Mr. Swissel led my horse into a kind of stable,
or pen, built of small poles. The old lady was up and
stirring by this time; and holding a small iron lamp in her
hand, which threw a faint light around, she tendered me
a hearty welcome. She wore her night-gown and cap,
not deeming it necessary to dress for the reception of
company.
Take a seat, sir, and rest yourself, said she, handing
me a hickory-bottomed chair, on which I fairly sunk,
feeling thankful that I had at last found a resting-place.
I'll have you something to eat, in a few minutes, she
continued, removing the ashes from an ample bed of red
coals in the broad fire-place. I have coffee, she
continued
,
but no sugar; can you drink honey in your coffee?
Just give me a cup of milk, Mrs. Swissel; I always
prefer it for supper, said I. This she had in abundance,
and in an unadulterated, or at least in an undiluted state.
And by the time Mr. Swissel entered, the room was filled
with savory odors from rich slices of venison ham coiling
about on the large live coals. The next minute, I was
devouring
with wolfish voracity the contents of a capacious
pewter platter. The rich bread made of Indian corn, the
richer milk, and still richer butter, honey, and venison ham,
were more grateful to the palate and stomach than any
hasty collation I have since partaken of. When I had
finished my repast, the faithful dog, seeing I was an
acquaintance
of his master, came forward and gave me a
welcome too. He wagged his tail, sneezed, rubbed his
head against my legs, and employed all the usual devices
of the sensible canine race to attract my attention, and
manifest his friendly disposition. I gave him what he
wanted, the fragments left in the platter, which I thought
was the kind of notice he most desired from me. The rain
now poured in fitful torrents, and between the heavy
showers, I could easily hear my faithful steed grinding his
ample supply of corn. The stable adjoined the house, and
neither of the buildings was constructed with a view to a
total exclusion of healthful ventilation. Some half dozen
children lay upon the floor, their only beds a few
long-haired
deer skins. They merely raised their heads to gaze
at me a moment, then sank back, and resumed their
slumbers
.
A couch of deer skins (Swissel was a great hunter, and
indeed a kind of Jack-of-all-trades), was prepared for me.
Over this was spread a sheet, as well as a quilt for
covering
;
and throwing myself down, I was soon fast asleep.
Once during the night I was awakened by the dog. He
had laid himself down on the unoccupied portion of my
soft pillow, and his nose was resting in too close
proximity
to my neck. I could feel his breath on my cheek,
and felt indignant at his audacious presumption. To my
get away, sir! he paid no attention. I then placed my
hand on his head, and endeavored to thrust him away. To
this he responded with a deep angry growl, which made
me relinquish my hold and beat a retreat. He took
advantage
of my retrograde movement, and pushed himself
farther on the pillow, now almost entirely abandoned to
him. I determined not to submit to this impertinence. I
kept a huge watch-dog myself at the store, and knew
something
of the habits and repugnances of the animal.
Tobacco
is their abomination. I got up gently, and lighting
a cigar, resumed my recumbent posture on the disputed
territory. I commenced operations cautiously, fearing my
opponent might resent my offensive measure, by becoming
still more an aggressor. I kept at a respectful distance at
first, puffing in the direction of his nose; once or twice he
shook his head violently, making his ears flap loudly
against his head, but again resuming his position. I
ventured
closer to him, and completely enveloped his head in
a cloud of smoke. This time he sneezed, and coughed,
and opened his eyes. I grew bolder, and ventured to
touch his nose with the fire on the end of the cigar. He
then abandoned the ground, with a whining yelp, and ran
to the farthest corner of the room. I threw the cigar in
the fire, and met with no other molestation during the
night.
We were all up at dawn. The storm had blown over,
and the sky was bright again. I mentioned the
conduct
of the dog to my host, who said I ought to have shot
him. He said, however, that he was under the necessity
of shutting up the dog in the house every night, to prevent
the wolves from killing him. They had killed several for
him in the yard, and in the stable, and would penetrate his
house if there was an opening in it of sufficient size to
admit them.
You've come, said Swissel, as we rose from the
breakfast-table, which was a large pine box turned bottom
upwards, at the time I appointed to pay you, but I have
only twenty-five cents in the house; still you shall have the
money before we part. I have a carry-all load of good
trunks, covered with deer skins, made by myself, and made
well, too, which I am just going to sell. I will go along
with you, and as I sell them I will hand over the money
to you.
He did accompany me, much to my satisfaction, for he
was one of the best guides in the country, and some of the
houses I had to visit were difficult to find. For more
than a week we traveled together, during which time he
met with purchasers for all his trunks, and paid me the
entire amount of my demand against him. Swissel was
one of nature's own pioneers; he was perfectly happy in
a state of semi-civilization, and in no other state.
Subsequently
,
when his neighbors encroached too much on his
primitive hunting-grounds, he went to Oregon.
At the end of a few weeks I had completed my circuit,
without any incidents or adventures materially differing
from those related. My brother Joseph was much pleased
with the result of my collections, which amounted to a
considerable
sum. This amount, added to what he had taken
in the store during my absence, would suffice to discharge
all his liabilities in the east.
When winter set in, my brother departed on his journey
to Philadelphia, every mile of which had to be traversed by
land, as the rivers were closed with ice. At a later day, as
the jobbers became familiar with the kind of goods sold in
those distant regions; and as mutual confidence was
established
,
most of the western merchants adopted the
preferable
plan of ordering their early supplies by letter,
instead
of encountering the fatigues of travel in an inclement
season. This practice is still continued, and they await
the opening of navigation, when a journey to the east
is altogether an agreeable recreation.
I had the sole charge of the store. But it could not
be supposed there would be much business transacted in
the winter. The stock was reduced to about the amount
of the profits of the concern; and all I was expected to do
was to be able to realize enough cash by spring to pay the
charges (then enormously highthe freight from
Philadelphia
to Pittsburgh alone being sometimes as much as
four dollars per hundred pounds), on the new goods.
When left alone in the cold dreary snows of that
memorable
winter, I often experienced a deep and painful
despondency hitherto unknown to me. The bleak winds
howled through the trees around the building, and the
hooting owl perched upon the chimney. My encounter
with the Irishman, and the fame of my skill with the rifle,
together with my large yellow lion-breasted house-dog,
contributed
to produce to some extent, a feeling of security
during the long solitary nights. By day, I had frequently
the company of Lieutenant A., once a meritorious officer in
the army, but, from misfortune and injustice, then in
thraldom
to habits of intemperance. He had sought an
obscure
asylum, to die unlamented, and now occupied an
apartment at the ferry house. He was very intelligent,
and very polished in his manners, when sober. When his
sensibilities were drowned in potations, he was inoffensive,
for even then a sense of propriety kept him away from the
store. Many a weary hour we whiled away over the
chess-board, in the narration of adventures, and in various
entertaining discussions. Peace to his ashesnow the
only remains of a noble spirit crushed to earth!
CHAPTER VI.
I HAD
now no means of pleasantly passing the long
winter
evenings, but such as books afforded. That winter I
went through every volume in the storethe school books,
Bible, and alland no months of my life were ever spent
more profitably. Mine was not an isolated case,
hypothetically
speaking. Most of the merchants in the far west, and
merchants' clerks having charge of establishments, were,
and still are, during those dreary seasons, confined within
their houses, without business to transact, and forced
either to take to their books, or to sit down for weeks
and months in unmitigated idiotic idleness. Many of them
become, in consequence, the best read and most thoroughly
informed men in the Union. Works of history, of science,
of poetryin short, of whatsoever nature they can lay their
hands onare devoured with insatiable avidity. And
what they read they remember, for their attention is
uninterrupted
while they read. Their object is to shut out
from vision, and to banish from the mind, the cheerless
prospect around, and the unpleasant consciousness that the
means of acquiring profits are suspended. To do this
effectually
,
it becomes necessary for them to be profoundly
absorbed
in the contents of the page before them. They
are completely shut out from the ephemeral society of the
living; but they can commune deeply and closely with the
illustrious dead, whose ideas are indestructible. The
thoughts, incidents and lessons of the past are better
learned in the obscurity of unbroken solitude, than amid
the din of universities, or distractions of cities; and the
unprecedented multiplication of books in this country, has
scattered the works of all ages and of all countries into
the most obscure recesses of our confederation, so that no
one who has the disposition, need want the opportunity,
to peruse them. I found dozens of volumes in every
family I applied to, which had been brought with them
from the old states. Thus, even in the newest of the
western settlements, no one can be at a loss for the means
of intellectual culture. And this is why the western
merchant
,
so often apparently rude in manners and coarse and
unfashionable in attire, exhibits a quality and capacity of
mind which not unfrequently put his fashionable interlocutor
to the blush. As a class, and they certainly have their
distinctive
characteristics, the western merchants need not yield
to any other class in most of the great essentials which
constitute
the citizen, of which America may justly boast. They
are generally brave, honorable, generous, intelligent,
sensitive
,
and setting aside the habit of profane swearing (which
too much prevails among them), conscientiously moral.
Occasionally
,
it is true, a merchant in the west makes a
fraudulent
failure, and swindles his creditors; but I have never
known such to be western bred. He is an interloper, a
Shylock, and not unfrequently an impostor, whom the
eastern jobbers, in their eagerness to outstrip competition
in their sales, have inconsiderately trusted without any
well-authenticated information in regard to his solvency or
honesty, to the prejudice of their established and punctual
customers. An honest merchant, in a new country, cannot
fail to succeed, if he has any business qualifications; for
his expenses are the merest trifle, and it is his own fault if
he does not realize a profit from his sales. He pays from
fifty-two to seventy-five dollars per annum for board, and the
remainder of his personal expenses need not amount to a
larger sum. He can travel for weeks among his customers,
making his collections, without expense either for himself
or his horse, and will find a blazing hearth, a bounteous
board, and a hearty welcome, wherever he goes.
About the middle of winter, I received a letter from
Joseph, dated at Philadelphia, informing me that he had
made a proposition to his partners to purchase their interest
in the store at Pike Bluff, and had just received their
reply
,
accepting his offer. As the goods had all been
bought in the first place on credit, and had paid for
themselves
under his management, of course his partners (who
were men of means, and deservedly enjoyed good credit),
had not been under the necessity of employing any actual
capital in the concern; and consequently the only real
interest
they now had in it was their share of the profits,
some fifteen hundred or two thousand dollars. This amount
Joseph stipulated to pay them in one or two years; and
henceforward he was the sole proprietor of the
establishment
.
He made a full and candid statement of his affairs
to the jobbers in Philadelphia, which was corroborated in
every particular by letters from his late partners. The
Philadelphia merchants were quick to perceive his
remarkable
qualifications for business. They were pleased with
his address, and frankness of expression. They were
assured of his honestyand were satisfied. Without the
slightest hesitation, or symptoms of reluctance, (which the
true western merchant is always acute at discerning,) the
houses of whom his stock had been purchased in the
first instance, without any exception, offered to sell him as
many goods as he wanted, on the usual timesix months,
payable in twelve, charging six per cent. interest after six
months.
Joseph's new stock amounted to about seven thousand
dollars; it was well selected, and the goods were all bought
at the lowest time prices. He made his bills principally
in houses of long standing, of established character, and
ample capital, so that no impositions had been practiced
on him.
By the fifteenth of April, Joseph arrived at home with
his goods. The business, it was true, had been dull during
his absence; nevertheless, I had accumulated more means,
from collections and cash sales, than he anticipated.
He expressed his satisfaction at my conduct, and hinted
something about giving me an opportunity of doing better
for myself than the mere realization of an inconsiderable
11
salary. From my speculations and savings, I already
possessed
five hundred dollars, which was more than he had
when he commenced business twelve months before.
But his first business on hand to be transacted, was his
marriage; no farther obstacles now stood in the way, and
he was not the one, in his present circumstances, to ask
an extension of time. Mr. White made arrangements to
board and lodge him and his bride; and so we set off late
one afternoon to the wedding. It was a two hours' ride,
and we made haste to be there at the appointed time
Mr. White's son stipulating to stay at the store until my
return the next morning. It was not a trip of pleasure to
me
. I was mounted on a horse that could not, or would
not, canter or gallop, and trotted miserably hard when
urged out of his usual slow gait. My complaints and
expostulations
had no effect on Joseph; nothing could
restrain
him. He saw me hammered almost to death, but
only mocked at my calamity. On he spurred, and I had
to keep up with him. At length he came to a brook, which
had overflowed its banks by reason of the recent heavy
rains, and his horse manifested much reluctance to plunge
into the current. He feared the horse, a borrowed one,
(Old Whitey having been disabled by an accident,) could
not swim well, if at all, and he did not wish to wet his
fine clothes.
Luke, said he, your horse I know to be a good
swimmer, for I have heard his owner say so; you must let
me have him to cross this water.
But
your
horse, perhaps, I replied, drawing a long
breath, and wishing to prolong the parley until I could
become
rested in some measure, is one of the splashing,
plunging kind, that swim with nothing but their noses
above water; and for that reason does it follow that I
must have him to cross over?
Come, come, dismount, said he, alighting. If I
were to get wet, I might have a chill, and then there would
be no kind of a wedding.
But, I replied, I am subject to fits of the ague, and
you are not. However, you are the oldest, and have a
right to command. But, remember, we are not to
exchange
back again as soon as we get over.
I mounted his horse, and he mine. He then plunged
into the whirling stream without difficulty, and I flounced
after him, by dint of much spurring and other means of
coercion. His horse swam as smoothly as a boat, with
his back above water. Joseph placed his knees on the
saddle, and went through without wetting a thread of his
garments. My horse went up and down. When his hind
feet touched the bottom, I embraced his neck with my
knees; but when he made a plunge forward, I had to
spring back a few feet. It was by means of this rocking,
hobby-horse process that we got through; and when he
made his last spring, I came off behind, holding on to his
tail, and standing up to my knees in the water, for we had
then reached the opposite side. Joseph had turned round,
and was laughing at me. That was the unkindest cut of
all!
Luke, said he, where did you learn that fore and
aft kind of riding?
I invented it, said I; necessity is the mother of
invention
,
you know. Now I suppose you would like to
have your horse again, but you won't get him, unless you
are willing to sit on a wet saddle.
No, you may keep him, said he, as he perceived the
seat of the saddle had been thoroughly immersed. The
balance of my ride was tolerably smooth, and this was
truly a comfort. But Joseph did not bear his infliction
without pronouncing a few hasty anathemas.
We arrived in time, and the nuptials transpired in the
usual way. There was much company, wine, cakes, &c.
Instead of a chill, I had a severe fit of the tooth-ache, and
was forced to have a tooth extracted before morning. The
doctor being only about half awake, and but half sober,
pulled the wrong tooth. It sufficed, however, to ease the
one next to it in a slight degree, and then I determined
it should remain. I groaned through a sleepless night, and
returned with a swelled jaw to Pike Bluff, the next
morning
,
inwardly resolving never to go to another wedding
unless it should be my own; and that I would be in no
hurry about itas if I could tell then what would happen!
Joseph and his bride were soon quietly settled at Mr.
White's. The spring business commenced under very
favorable auspices, but did not terminate so fortunately as
was anticipated. The fact that we had realized a
handsome
profit, became pretty generally known, (as such facts
are always sure to be,) and the amount was enormously
magnified, (for the reports of good fortune are ever
exaggerated
,)
so that Joseph was doomed to have competition.
At that time business operations were under the propitious
control of the U. S. Bank, and credit was universal.
Almost
any man from the west could obtain credit in those
days. It was therefore no difficult matter for another
adventurer
to set up an opposition establishment at Pike Bluff.
So another store-house was soon in course of erection, and
another stock of goods was on the way thither. This made
Joseph uneasy. His restless, monopolizing spirit could ill
brook a disappointment. But there was no possible way
to prevent other men from selling goods in his vicinity, if
they saw proper to do so, and he had to suppress his rather
unreasonable dissatisfaction and displeasure. A hostile
course would beget sympathy in favor of his competitor,
and he considered every dollar's worth sold by his rival
as so much abstracted from his sales. He had to bear it.
But he determined to realize the means of paying his debts,
from his sales; and he was resolved that a portion of his
goods should be sold where there was no rival
establishment
.
So he packed up a small assortment, consisting of
about fifteen hundred dollars' worth, and sent me off with
it to found a city higher up the river, on the opposite
side. I put in my five hundred dollars, and was to
have half the profits. He wrote to Kentucky for another
brother, who was now old enough to assist him, (there
were more of the same crop growing up,) and I made my
arrangements to open my little stock at a flat place on the
north side of the river, some thirty miles farther up, where
there were a horse mill and a farm house. I had my boxes
marked
Hanover
, in honor of a German that lived there.
It is now a city of that name.
When I reached Hanover, I found to my surprise that the
house Mr. Grund had written about as being large enough
to hold the goods, had been originally used as a
hen house
.
It had been built, it was true, with some care, to exclude
the varmints; yet it did not come quite up to my idea of
a store room. But there was no other, and I was compelled
to take it. The door, which had been square, and was
some five feet from the ground, (the chickens being taught
to ascend on a pole,) had to be cut down to the usual form;
shelves and counters had to be constructed and placed in
the room; and finally, the whole building had to undergo
a process of thorough renovation, after my arrival with
the goods, which subjected me to a delay of several days.
11*
These were all accomplished, however, in the shortest time
possible, and then I began business in the way we had
commenced at Pike Bluff. I had a good run. The
novelty of the thing brought everybody in the parts
adjacent
,
to
town
. The mill helped me, and I helped it
amazingly. Between us we had a monopoly. The
proprietor
of the soil was much delighted with the idea of
realizing a fortune from the sale of lots, and, as the sequel
will show, was not altogether disappointed.
The fame of my store spread far and near, and my sales
being out of all proportion to the amount of the stock on
hand, I was soon under the necessity of ordering a farther
supply from Joseph; and at the same time I was enabled
to make him a handsome remittance. He was pleased to
see the goods converted into ready money, at fair profits;
but he was a little jealous, and in a letter protested against
my enticing his customers up the country across the river.
He claimed the south side as his exclusive dominions. I
had used some exertion to get a few of them over, who
happened to be cash buyers, and felt the justice of his
expostulations
;
nevertheless, I do not remember to have
relaxed
my efforts. There was one of his customers,
however
,
whom I did not seek to entice away from him. This
was Miss Polly Beckel, who came without being invited,
and annoyed me once more. There was no ferry at
Hanover
;
but we kept a canoe near the store, which was sent
across for those who wished to come over. I could not
paddle my own canoe, but made arrangements with a
son of Mr. Grund (some fourteen years old) to do it for me.
One morning, I perceived a female on the opposite shore
beckoning for the canoe, and as there happened to be no one
in town to occupy my attention behind the counter, I got
into the boat with the boy and crossed over. Before we had
arrived within one hundred yards of the shore, I discovered
that it was the veritable wild Polly herself whom I had gone
to meet. About the same time, Wilhelm, the boy-rower,
recognized her also, and began to smile mischievously.
What are you smiling about, Wilhelm? I inquired.
Why, that's that dare-devil gal, Polly Beckel, and
she'll be dead sure to cut up some capers in the boat. I
hope you can swim? said he, looking round at me.
Oh yes, said I, but you don't suppose she will
throw me overboard, do you?
She
mought
do it, said he, with a sinister shake of
the head, if she should get into one of her high ways.
We struck the shore a moment after this ominous
intimation
,
and Polly, having tied her steed to a tree, came
prancing down to us in high spirits.
Hurrah for you, Luke! cried she, springing into the
boat, and wringing my reluctantly proffered hand. This
is right. Who but the groom should come to row the
bride over the ferry?
But I didn't come to row you over, said I, nor did
I know who you were; besides, I don't know how to paddle
a canoe.
I'll learn you, said she, seizing the paddles in the
hands of Wilhelm, who relinquished them instantly, and
without a word of remonstrance. He knew her skill.
The canoe sped out into the current under the impulsion
of her vigorous strokes. When we were about half way
over, she ceased rowing, and moved near to where I was
sitting. She assumed a fierce look, in which, however,
I could perceive harmless sport strikingly blended.
Now you want some fun, I suppose, said I, returning
her steady gaze.
Noit is a serious matter, she replied. I have
got you in my power, and I have a right to make use of
my advantage. Will you promise before this witness to
marry me in thirty days?
I
would
promise, said I, if I did not wish to see what
you will do when I refusetherefore I
won't
promise.
Then sink! cried she. In an instant, and before I
could be aware of her purpose, she stooped down and
pulled a cork from an auger hole which had been bored
through the bottom of the canoe, and the water gushed up
in a stream about an inch in diameter. This was
somewhat
alarming; and perceiving my surprise, she held the
cork aloft in her hand, and said in a tone of triumph:
Promise, or sink! If you attempt to snatch the cork,
I will throw it overboard. And she drew back her arm,
in the attitude of hurling it away. I stepped forward,
and placed my foot on the hole.
Now, said I, as I saw her cast one or two fearful
glances at the water, which began to spread over the bottom
of the frail boat, I will give you one minute to replace
the cork. If you do not put it back within that time, I
will leap overboard and swim to the shore, leaving you to
get out of the difficulty of your own raising the best way
you can.
Oh, if you can swim, that's an end of the joke, said
she, stopping the leak.
But it was not one of your
dry
jokes, Miss Polly,
said I; and now it is about time for you to cease your
nonsense with me. I begin to understand the game
myself
,
and two can play at it. You may provoke me to
retaliate
.
No; I'll make a child's bargain with youlet you alone
if you let me aloneprovided you really don't want a wife.
If you want me, you can have me before any magistrate or
parson. But you must speak quick, even before next
Thursday. On that day I am to be married to one who has
chosen me, provided I can't get one of my own choosing
before that time. And I have come to-day to buy a white
dress for the wedding.
This was true. I sold her the dress, and she was
married
at the time namedand to the man who happened to
be present when I had my first encounter with her.
Mr. Grund was not idle while I was doing such a
flourishing business. He had got the county surveyor to
lay out the town in lots, and had appointed a day of sale,
when a fourth of them (about one hundred) were to be
knocked down to the highest bidder.
On the day appointed for the sale, I did an immense
business. I sold two hundred dollars' worth of goods,
which had cost me only one hundred and twenty. Men,
women and children came from every direction in the
vicinity, to see the beginning of a new town, and many
made investments in lots. They brought from five to thirty
dollars a piecedimensions, fifty by one hundred and fifty
feet. Thus Mr. Grund got, for a few acres of ground, more
money than he had paid a few years before for his whole
farm of three hundred and twenty acres. And the
portion
sold was flat, and subject to inundation.
There was a stranger among the company at the sale, of
whom no one knew anything. He came on foot, but from
what place no one knew. He was a young man
somewhat
older than myself, with a prominent nose, high cheek
bones, and small sparkling eyes. Before the day was over,
I began to suspect he might be one of those venders of
tender
goods, a cunning Jew, in quest of a location to cheat
his neighbors, and spoil the regular trader's business. He
staid about the store, and observed with glistening eyes
every dollar I received. He bought nothing of me himself,
but inquired the prices of a vast number of articles. At
length, when the sale commenced, and the lot I occupied was
put up, he was the only one who bid against me. It had
been previously arranged that I was to have the property
at my own price, as I was instrumental in getting up the
town. But the mysterious stranger had not been a party to
the arrangement; and so he ran up the housenow
dignified
by the term store-houseto fifty dollars. Upon this I
quit bidding, and hinted something about selecting another
location a few miles farther up the river, where the ground
was not so low, and not so likely to be washed away by
the June floods. This alarmed Mr. Grund, and he whispered
the auctioneer to withdraw that lot from his list, at the
same time assuring me that if I would pay for the deed, he
would make me a present of the property. They then put
up the lot adjoining mine, and the Jew bid for that also.
I now turned the tables on him. He grew very animated
as I bid against him, and then, for the first time, threw out
a hint of his purpose there. When the lot was knocked
down to him, he mounted a stump on it, and addressed
the company as follows:
Genlemen, I am a merchant. My goots are on te way
up te river, and vill pe here in a veek. I vant to get a
house puilded along side of Mr. Shortfield's as soon as
possibleand I tink it can pe done by te time te goots
come. I vant to make a contrack for te puilding of it
te one who pids te lowest, shall have it; but he must
take his bay in goots. I vill help puild it myselfmy
labor vill be thrown in. Give me a pid, genlemen.
It was knocked down, or rather to be knocked up, for forty
dollars, the Jew's assistance thrown in.
This announcement came upon me like a thunder-clap in
a clear sky. Already the Jew was surrounded with
encouraging
friends, who predicted that Hanover would soon
be a great business place, and that he would be equally
as successful as I had been. Even Mr. Grund himself
ventured slyly to whisper a word of encouragement in his
ear. Moses told them all that I was charging too high for
my goods, and that he intended to sell his much cheaper.
This was gall and wormwood to me, and at once made me
his enemy. I could now appreciate my brother Joseph's
feelings when a competitor interfered with his
prospects
.
There were no means of keeping competition
away; yet I had the consolation to know that goods in St.
Louis, where the Jew had purchased, were generally from
fifteen to twenty per cent. higher than in Philadelphia,
where mine came from.
I wrote to Joseph for advice, informing him of what had
occurred. He wrote back, stating that his competitor did
not interfere with him much, as his stock had been
purchased
in St. Louis. He said I had only to make it known
to the people that my rival's goods did not come directly
from the east, and then they would give mine the preference.
But Joseph did not take it into consideration that my
competitor
was a
Jew
peddlera dealer in
tender
goods, (such
as had been damaged, and sold at auction,) and that the
purchasers were men more familiar with quantities than
qualities.
Before the new store was in operation, a
communication
came on from Washington, in reply to an
application
that had been made when the lots were advertised,
establishing a post-office at Hanover, with a weekly mail,
and appointing Mr. Grund, who was on the right side in
politics, post-master. The first mail brought an
anonymous
letter from St. Louis to Mr. Grund, which he handed
me to read. It ran as follows:Sirthere is a certain
Moses Tubal, a Jew peddler, from Indiana, gone up to your
parts to engage a house to sell goods in. Beware of him.
He will sell his goods low enough, no doubt; but it is
strongly suspected here that they are stolen goods, which
the robbers have employed him to sell. You will make
these facts known to all the people round your place.
That is a very curious epistle, said I.
That it is, said he.
Here we both paused a considerable length of time,
while our thoughts ran in quite different channels. I was
for having Moses arrested at once, and by this means
summarily disposed of. But then, as I knew of no one who
had been robbed, and as the letter only dealt in hints,
there would be no sufficient grounds to go upon. And then
it occurred to me that, as the letter was an anonymous one,
some of the Jew's friends might suppose I had got it
written
to get him out of my way.
It is my opinion, said Mr. Grund, that the Jew
wrote it himself. I know something of their tricks. They
are good judges of human nature. If the impression
should get abroad that the goods are stolen, a majority of
the people would prefer to buy them, for that very reason.
They will think they can be had for less money than goods
got in an honest way. Now, suppose we try the Jew. I
will give him the letter, to do with it as he pleases; and
you and I will agree not to mention the circumstance for
two weeks. If Moses suppresses the contents of the
letter
,
I shall think the goods have been stolen, sure enough;
if he makes them known, I shall be convinced that it was
all a trick of his own invention.
This was so reasonable a proposition, that I readily agreed
to it. Moses was at that moment standing on his lot,
superintending
the erection of his building. I observed his actions
when Mr. Grund called him aside, and placed the letter in
his hands. He threw up his arms, and stamped, and
cursed the writerbut did not once declare he was
innocent
.
On the contrary, he counterfeited to the life the looks
and manners of a guilty man. He begged Mr. G., with
much apparent earnestness, not to say anything about the
letter, promising to clear it all up to his satisfaction in
a few weeks. Mr. Grund promptly agreed not to mention
it. This was more than the Jew hoped for, and he became
really embarrassed. Then his pretended rage increased,
and Mr. Grund left him.
My sales at Hanover had so far exceeded our
calculations
,
that the amount of business already done had left
both Joseph and myself with greatly reduced stocks.
Indeed
,
our joint sales made up a sum total equal to a year's
business at Pike Bluffand the money already realized,
together with a very moderate amount which we could
safely rely upon deriving from collections in the fall, would
be an ample fund with which to pay all the eastern debts.
A generous confidence had been reposed in Joseph by the
Philadelphia merchants, and he resolved to embrace every
opportunity to convince them that it had not been
misplaced
.
Although it was agreed that he should have twelve
months' time, yet Joseph had contrived to remit two-thirds
of the amount of his indebtedness before the expiration of
six months; and all the letters he received, acknowledging
the safe arrival of his remittances, contained encouraging
expressions which greatly cheered him, and gave a new
impetus to his exertions.
Joseph and I both now began to feel like men,
independent
menand men of some substance. He was worth,
at this time, some $4000, and I about $1000. But it was
12
not our money which made us feel independent; it was our
conscious capacity for business, our confirmed success, our
established credit in Philadelphia, our good health, and
our confidence in the future. We were independent,
because
we no longer needed the recommendations of men
of capital to obtain any reasonable amount of goods on
the usual time.
Such being our condition, there was in reality no serious
cause to apprehend any immediate detriment to our
interests
from the encroachments of rival traders. In fact,
Joseph's competitor was already meditating a retreat, being
convinced of his inability to cope with so energetic and
enterprising a rival, who, besides, possessed superior
facilities in the procurement of his goods. It was quite
different, however, with my rival, the Jew. His stock
was equal to mine in amount; and he had the advantage of
me in the existence of a very prevalent belief that his goods
had cost him less than mine had cost me. It was
whispered
over the country that he was a rogue, and had stolen
his goods; and the very natural inference was that he could
afford to undersell me. Mr. Grund now concurred in the
belief that he had written the anonymous letter himself,
and that it was a paltry trick to take away a portion of my
customers. It was characteristic of the peddling Jews.
Success is their motto, and they pursue it with indomitable
perseverance, and with a total indifference to reputation.
They have no credit themselves, and they credit nobody.
They trade upon the productions of others (they never
create or produce anything), and cheat the Christians with
their own wares. Such was the opinion I conceived of the
peculiar class to which my rival belonged. It may not
have been altogether unmixed with unfounded prejudice;
nevertheless, it has not been quite removed by the
experience
of subsequent years.
Moses, in despite of my undisguised repulsive attitude,
now resolved to be sociable with me. He came into my
establishment every day when there were no country
people
in town, and sat down to talk about matters and things
in general. And while his tongue wagged, his eyes were
not idle. They wandered from shelf to shelf, beginning
at the bottom and going up, then down again, and so on
through the entire stock, as if he were taking an inventory.
This he repeated until he had fixed in his memory the
quantities, qualities and styles of my whole assortment.
I did not, for some time, suspect his motive; but his
operations
soon convinced me of the unworthy advantage he
had taken of my passive indulgence.
I ascertained from some of my customers, and from Mr.
Grund in particular, that the Jew was selling certain kinds
of goods, similar to mine on the shelves, at greatly
reduced
prices; while he was selling other kinds of which I
had but few or none, at enormously high rates. This
opened my eyes to the real object of Moses in paying me
so many visits. My assortment was much broken, and it
would be a month before I could expect to receive the few
goods ordered from the east. In the mean time, Moses,
who was a new broom, swept clean. He caught nearly
all the cash that was passing. He continued to watch my
shelves, and I ascertained that immediately after any
particular
style of my goods disappeared, a similar kind in
his establishment always rose in value; for he was
conscious
of his monopoly; and when such articles were called
for, he knew they could not be had of me at any price.
Thus affairs progressed for some time, and Moses grew
bolder and more impudent, for impudence is a fixed
characteristic
of the peddling Jew. But I conceived a plan
to frustrate his arrangements, and which promised me some
amusement. I began to return his visits. It is said that
the most expert strategist is never so liable to be frustrated
by an opposing scheme, as when he is absorbed in his own
secret plans. It was so with Moses. He never suspected
that I had the capacity of conceiving and executing a
counter-stratagem. Always when I returned to my own
store, I noted down on paper the result of my observations.
I also kept a memorandum of the kinds of goods he sold
at high prices. And when the list was completed, his
game was reduced to a demonstration. He sold the kinds
of goods I had the most of at about cost, and those which
I had not, at an enormous profit. The consequence was
that I was rapidly going out of business; and my rival had
circulated a report that I intended to move away in the fall.
That was the result he was aiming at, and it would very
probably have been consummated, had I not fortunately
frustrated his mode of reducing me to such an extremity.
My list being completed, I sent it off to Joseph,
requesting
him to send me the articles named immediately, and
explaining my purpose to him. He responded promptly,
for it happened that he had an abundance of the goods
I needed, while he was deficient in the kind I had on
hand, and which the Jew had rendered worthless to me.
So I resolved to send him a box in exchange. When my
box arrived, Moses was all curiosity, and his entire
faculties
seemed to be concentrated in his little, piercing eyes.
He was at the landing when the box was put on shore,
and slyly looked over my shoulder at the bill of lading,
hoping to ascertain what the box contained by the
description
;
but he was disappointedit merely stated one box,
weighing 300 pounds. He then peered at every side of
the box, as it was rolled over and over up the bank. He
found nothing on it except my address. An examination
of the ends was attended with the same unsatisfactory
result. But he did not despair, while I enjoyed keenly
his fruitless efforts, and my anticipated triumphs.
Vat kint of goots are you getting, Luke? he inquired,
in a most familiar manner, and at the same time with an
affected air of indifference.
I don't know, exactly, said I, carelessly, for I have
not seen them yet. But I have too many goods on hand
now, for the small amount of business I am doing. They
are, perhaps, the same kind I have been selling.
This made the eyes of Moses sparkle with delight. He
had not the slightest idea that I was meditating, or capable
of meditating, an enterprise against his establishment. So
I had no hesitation in concealing the fact from him; and
perhaps violated a principle of morals in stating directly,
or leading him to infer from my remarks, what was not
exactly the truth. To this habit I was sometimes, in
common
with most merchants, eastern as well as western, too
much addicted. I condemn it now, because it is wrong,
and because it is never really necessary.
It was nearly night when I got my box in the store,
where I suffered it to lie unopened till after supper. In
the mean time the Jew's curiosity had frequently brought
him in to see the precise nature of its contentsbut to no
avail. I seemed to be indifferent about opening it at all, as
though it contained nothing that would be of benefit to
my declining business.
After supper, I complained of a headache, and shut
myself up in the store to sleep it off, as I alleged. But
when I was alone I worked manfully. I opened the box by
a noiseless process, so as not to be heard by Moses, who
12*
was my close neighbor, and who was always on the alert
to pry into my secrets. I took the goods out and marked
them at very low prices, perhaps only some twenty-five per
cent. on the cost and carriage. I then hid them under the
counter, and in other places out of sight. I next repacked
the box with goods with which I was overstocked, leaving
only a few pieces of those kinds on the shelves, which I
also reduced in price; and then, towards midnight, when
I supposed the Jew was asleep, I nailed up the box again,
and left it in the place where it stood the previous evening.
Finally, after arranging the shelves so as to make it appear
that no material alterations had taken place in the nature
of their contents, I lay down on my simple couch, and
dreamed exultingly of the success I anticipated the next
day, which was Saturday, when many people, as usual,
would doubtless be in town.
Bright and early the next morning, the aquiline nose of
Moses appeared in my door, while his eyes ran rapidly
over the establishment. He had heard the hammer, and
did not doubt that I had opened the box.
Dere's te pox, said he; I tought I heard you knock
it open in te night.
You must have been dreaming about that box, said
I; there it stands just as it stood last night, and as it will
stand until the boat comes down, and then I'll send it
back to Joseph. He can sell its contents sooner than I.
Moses, well contented with the result of his exploration,
withdrew to his own premises, no doubt with a feeling of
contempt for the stupidity of a rival who suffered him to
monopolize all the business of the place. And I must do
Moses the justice to say that he had managed his affairs
very skillfully, barring his convictions of my continued
obtuseness
.
In the most quiet manner imaginable, and always
maintaining a show of profound respect for me, he had
contrived, for many weeks, to sell my old customers all the
goods they wanted, and placed me in the predicament of
holding the empty bag. When they desired to purchase
such articles as I had on hand, Moses was sure to
undersell
me; and when they called for such goods as I was out
of, Moses invariably, and very complaisantly too, sent them
to me to satisfy themselves that they could not be had on
better terms than he offered. Now I was prepared to avail
myself of this extreme condescension of friend Moses.
Moses was a wise man, but he had not penetrated all the
hidden things of the hen-house.
The first persons who came to town that day, were a
substantial farmer, his wife and daughter, with a well-filled
stockingsuch being the kind of purse in which they
generally
brought their hard dollars. They looked through the
Jew's establishment first, pricing all the articles they
intended
to buy, and then came to price mine. This is the
invariable custom of such plain cautious purchasers in the
west. They look at everything, and ask the price of
everything
,
at every store in town, before they make up their
minds where to leave their hard earnings. Those only
buy carelessly, who buy on credit, and without a
comparison
of qualities and prices. And this class, whether it
be in the city or country, ultimately pay some twenty-five
per cent. more, for the same amount of merchandize, than
those who pay as they go.
After sitting in silence some minutes, and quietly
surveying
the goods, as the country folks are in the habit of
doing, the old lady spoke first.
I see you've got some blue calico, said she; but
they say you sell it higher than the Jew does.
Now this was one of the kinds of staple goods of which I
had hitherto kept a large quantity, and the price of which
the Jew had put down. At that time, (eighteen years ago,)
its cost in Philadelphia was fourteen cents per yard, and
my price had been twenty-five cents. The Jew put it
down to eighteen and three quarter cents. But I had
packed up all I had of it, excepting a few pieces precisely
similar to the styles kept by the Jew, for Joseph.
Who says so? was my response, as I took down the
articles and displayed them on the counter, so that she
might see they were exactly like the Jew's goods which
she had been examining.
He told us so himself, she replied, while she put on
her spectacles and looked at the goods.
What does he ask for his blue calico? I inquired,
when I perceived she was satisfied that the goods before
her were similar to the kind she had been looking at in
my rival's store.
He sells his'n at eighteen and three quarter cents, and
he says you ask twenty-five cents for your'n.
Then, said I, he has been slandering me. My
price is only sixteen and two-third cents, which is under
the Jew's.
Oh, did you ever! exclaimed the old lady's daughter,
a fat, blooming girl of sixteen. What a shame it is for
people to tell such lies! Buy your calico of Mr.
Shortfield
,
mammait's better, and cheaper, and prettier than
Mr. Tubal's.
The old man lost no time in giving the hint to the old
lady, and she was not slow in taking it. The goods were
soon cut off, wrapped up, and paid for.
Now, said the old man, we want to buy two solid
gingham dresses; but one of our neighbors told us you
were out of that kind of goods. I think the Jew asks
too high for hisbut he told us to see if you could sell it
any lower. Perhaps he knew you had none on hand.
Your neighbor was mistaken, said I, taking an
armful
from under the counter. I have a very handsom
little assortment of it. What did the Jew ask for his?
He asked sixty-eight and three quarter cents a yard
for this kind of goods, replied the old man.
Yes, this is the kind, added both the old lady and
the daughter. Now, this kind of goods (at that time) cost
thirty cents, and the usual retail price was fifty-six and a
quarter cents. So it was plain that the Jew was playing a
very unfair game with me. I felt justified in departing
from my regular course, to pay him back in the same
way that he had been operating against me.
Then, responded I, with much assumed indignation,
the Jew intended to cheat you. He asks more for his
goods than they are worth. I will sell you this gingham
for thirty-seven and a half cents a yard.
My gracious! exclaimed the daughter. Why
mamma, don't let's go back to the Jew's store again.
Let's buy all our goods here.
If Mr. Shortfield will sell us what we want as low as
the Jew, we'd as lief buy of him as anybody else,
observed
the old man, dryly, who was desirous of bringing
me down on all the rest of the articles he wanted. And
the more effectually to accomplish his object, he displayed
his well-filled stocking, and counted me out the money for
the two gingham dresses.
They then mentioned article after article which they had
examined at the Jew's, and for which Moses, supposing
they could not be had of me, had asked them enormous
prices, and then referred them to me to see if I could sell
them any cheaper. Contrary to his belief, I had them all,
and sold them at greatly reduced prices. The party made
all their purchases of me, and paid me some forty dollars
in old Spanish milled coin.
When the old man went after the horses, which had
been tied to the rack before the door of Moses, the Jew
watched his motions very closely. The move was
incomprehensible
to him. But when he saw the whole party
depart from my door, with their saddle-bags and
meal-bags
filled with bundles of goods, he looked daggers.
His lips were perfectly livid, and his cheeks were swollen
with rage and disappointment. That was a happy
moment
for me. Every western merchant who has had to
compete with a Jew rival, will be at no loss to appreciate
my feelings of joy and triumph. But my success did not
end here. Party after party followed the first, all departing
in the same way from my door, fully supplied with the
articles
they wanted. Every one purchased from me on better
terms than had been offered by Moses. That day my sales
amounted to one hundred and fifty dollars, mostly cash,
while Moses had not sold more than ten dollars' worth!
This was a mystery he could not comprehend. Towards
night Moses could restrain his eagerness to penetrate the
cause of so unexpected a turn in my favor, no longer. He
came in avowedly to get a note changed, but really to see
if I had not been getting some new goods. I asked him
to sit down, which he did, while his eyes ranged over the
shelves in quest of my new stock. But it was no go.
Everything had again assumed the old appearance. He
could perceive no change in my assortment, and I was
resolved
to make no voluntary or forced revelations. In
vain he sought to find out the kinds of goods I had been
selling, and the prices.
You had a pusy day, I peliefe, said he.
Why, yes, said I, lying on my back on the counter,
manifesting signs of weariness. A breeze sprung up in my
favor, some how or other, to-day. It has been dull enough
for some weeks with me, while the wind seemed to set
altogether in your favor. Time about is fair play. But
still it is rather curious that I should have such a brisk
day, with such a broken assortment. When my new goods
arrive from Philadelphia, I hope I shall get a fair share of
the businessif not, I'll pull up stakes and be off in the
spring.
My new goots vill come next month, too. But I
vouldn't keep dem here till next spring, if I couldn't sell
dem. But my stock is goot, now, and I ought to pe
selling
dem priskly.
You have been doing all the business until to-day, and
no doubt you will keep the run to yourself till my goods
get here. Then we'll see what I can do. I've got my
invoices, and find there has been a material decline in
the east. What do you have to pay for blue and pink
solid ginghams, in St. Louis?
Oh, apout tirty-five cents, said he.
I find mine are invoiced at twenty-eight cents, this
time, said I, carelessly, while Moses evinced much
vexation
.
He had a large amount of them on hand, and I was
satisfied they had cost him thirty-seven and a half cents a
yard.
The Jew returned to his own premises without solving
the problem which disturbed his mind. And as he went
out I contrived to open my drawer and cause a
considerable
gingling of specie.
During the ensuing week, I did all the business. But
the Jew at length ascertained the reason. One of my
customers, who had been asked a much higher price by the
Jew than he had given me for the same goods, unrolled his
bundle and exhibited to the staring eyes of Moses a
variety of articles which he supposed he alone possessed.
He could not deny that they were lower than his own goods;
and he had the mortification to reflect that he had been
sending his customers to me under the conviction that I
could not supply their wants; whereas I had been
accommodating
them in every instance. Then he learned to his
dismay
that I had been selling blue calico below the unfair
reduction he had made himself! And now winter was
approaching, and most of his stock would be out of season.
Besides, it depended upon his success in the sale of the
goods on hand, whether he would be able to replenish for
the winter. I had the run, and determined not to lose it.
I deemed it better to sell even at cost and carriage, than to
hold the goods, that were soon to be unseasonable, over to
the next year. So I continued the game, and poor Moses
felt at last that he had been outdone by a Christian
competitor
.
To make matters still worse with him, many of
the articles which he had bought at auction proved to be
very
tender, and otherwise defective, which caused a
perfect
storm about his ears. But he had explanations,
apologies
,
and promises to pacify them all; and he determined
to be revenged on me. The western Jews are exceedingly
vindictive, and most pertinacious in their efforts to cripple
their Christian competitors.
CHAPTER VII.
During
the early part of the winter, I had a visit from
Joseph. He still did most of the business at Pike Bluff,
as I continued to do at Hanover. We had now sufficient
funds in hand to pay the balance on the spring purchases,
and also for the goods ordered in the fall. Our joint sales
this year amounted to more than sixteen thousand dollars,
and the net profits could not have been less than five
thousand
dollars. Joseph proposed that I should go east for our
spring goodsa proposition which I joyfully accepted.
So it was arranged that our younger brother Isaac, who
had been with Joseph, should take charge of the
establishment
at Hanover during my absence.
Just about the time appointed for me to commence the
journey to Philadelphia, I received a letter from Blanche,
whom I had determined to see on my way eastward. But
this epistle was dated at Norfolk, Va. Here it is, in full,
copied from the original which now lies before me:
Norfolk, Va.
,
Dec. 1st, 183-.
Dear Luke
:I cannot restrain myself any longer from
writing to you. Your last letter, informing me of your good
prospects, and of your intention to commence business for
yourself at Hanover, was directed to
me
, and not in an
envelope to a third personso it fell into the hands of
my guardian-uncle, and excited his wrath and indignation
to a frightful extent. But the worst of it was that he did
not tell me what it was all about, but kept the letter
himself
.
Now, I am my own mistress, and have some fortune
here in old Virginia in my own right. I might at any time
13
relieve myself of his supervision, and his eccentric
solicitude
.
Yet as my uncles are the nearest of kin that I have,
I hope to be able to avoid a rupture with them. But to
my narration. A few days after your letter fell into his
hands, he announced his intention to take me to Virginia,
and leave me under the protection of his brother, my uncle
Edgar Beaufort. Not being aware of the cause which
induced
this step on his part, I was delighted with the idea
of going back to old Virginia, and so I readily agreed to
his proposition, without paying any particular attention to
his remarks about the opportunity the change would afford
me of marrying some one of my own station, equal in birth
and fortune.
We set out at the time appointed, and I had a very
pleasant trip of it. My uncle became very indulgent as we
progressed eastward, and seemed disposed to gratify all my
wishes. We visited Philadelphia, New York, the Saratoga
Springs, and even the Falls of Niagara, before we turned
southward. He took me to balls, theatres, concerts, &c.,
and really seemed to be anxious for me to contract an
`eligible match,' as he termed it. But I fell in love with
nobodyand if any one fell in love with me, I never
heard of it. And as for the places of amusement, you
know I have no partiality for them. I always enjoyed
myself much better on Sundays at church. You have no
idea, Luke, how I was charmed to find myself within the
walls of a real church again. I was baptized and reared
in this (the Episcopal) church, and have an
inextinguishable
affection for it.
At last we reached Virginia, and as I was never partial
to the country, I obtained the consent of my uncle to board
in this pleasant city. I had not been located here more
than a month before I ascertained, for the first time, the
cause of my removal to the east. One of my servant
women, living with uncle Edgar, who is the laundress of
his family, and whom I had taught to read, discovered your
letter to me in the pocket of my uncle's vest. She saw it
was addressed to me, and determined I should have it. So
when she came to town on the ensuing Saturday to bring
my clothes, she handed it to me. Of course it explained
everythingthe reason of my removal, my uncle's anxiety
for me to make an `eligible match,' my pleasant tour, and
all. I am really obliged to you for all this kindness, and
you have my sincere thanks.
But why should your innocent epistle produce such a
commotion with my uncle? You have never made a
declaration of love to me, nor have I ever breathed or
written a word which might lead any one to suppose that I
had a passion for you. We have merely corresponded as
friends. We have been associates, it is true, and have
esteemed each other. Because I did not drop your
acquaintance
,
like some others, when misfortune reduced your
family from affluence, I don't see why they should suppose
I intended to marry you. I have some pride of family,
as well as my uncles; but I cannot perceive anything
derogatory
in reciprocating the friendship of a schoolmate
who happens to be poor, so long as he aspires to rise in
the world by industry, and rectitude of moral conduct.
Your letter to me did not demand a reply, and perhaps
it would have been forgotten by both of us by this time,
if my uncle had given it to me and said nothing about it.
Perhaps by this time we might have forgotten one another,
and you would have ultimately married (as you probably
will), that brazen Miss Polly something, whom your brother
has written about to Kentucky, and I might have formed
an `eligible match,' some of these days, to the entire `
contentation
,'
as Queen Elizabeth would say, of my very
particular
brace of uncles. But I do not like to be watched,
suspected, and kept in leading-strings, as if I were
incapable
of conducting myself with propriety; and so I have
a disposition to give my uncles a taste of my qualityby
refusing every match they make for me, and finally to
choose for myself, provided I should ever marry.
Now I do not propose to marry
you
understand that.
But you are good-looking enough to be a
beau
, and your
studies, incessantly pursued, have made you an intelligent
correspondent. Now if you were only, through conviction,
a member of
the church
, I could hold free converse with
youand if you were so disposed,
I would do so
, in spite
of my uncles. I will do so, as it is, to a limited extent,
provided you will read the works I enjoin. And what is
more, without farther preface, I
tender
you my promise
not to consent to any `eligible match,' before I see you
not meaning that there is any probability of ever making a
bargain `for better, for worse' with you. But I like the
idea of a correspondence, and it will afford me great
pleasure to hear of your success in everything you
undertake
.
And rest assured that, notwithstanding I have some
of the `high notions' of my uncles in regard to families,
I shall never consider any honorable pursuit, by which
you may acquire wealth, as disgraceful, or as rendering
you unworthy of my esteem. Be industrious, be honorable,
and, if possible, be religious, is the counsel of your old
friend,
Blanche
.
I lost no time in replying to this epistle. No doubt I
went far beyond the limits of a formal, friendly
correspondence
,
for I believed myself pretty deeply in love with
Blanche. I informed her of my continued success in
business
,
and of my purpose to visit Philadelphia that winter.
I requested her to address her next letter to the care of
Messrs. Y. S. & K., importers of hardware, Philadelphia,
and upon its reception, provided she approved it, I
proposed
to pay her a visit at Norfolk.
I took especial care to instruct Isaac in the mode of
competing with Moses during my absence; and he was
not difficult to teach, for he, too, had already resolved to
become a successful merchant. All his thoughts, all his
aspirations, centered in the one objectand of course there
was no such word as failure in his vocabulary. The Jew
was not long in perceiving his aptitude for business, his
acumen in discovering and frustrating stratagems, which
dispelled his hopes of again acquiring the lead while
I was away.
The winter that year was as remarkably warm as the one
preceding it had been remarkably cold, and my departure
was delayed in consequence until about the first of
February
,
as it was probable I should then be enabled to
go most of the distance by water, which would be the
most speedy, economical and pleasant mode of travel. At
length I set out on horseback for St. Louis, in company
with several merchants from the neighboring counties. I
was young, full of hope, and ought to have been perfectly
happy. But I was not. My spirit was too much imbued
with the romantic notions and artificial distinctions
imparted
by the mass of pernicious works I had read in the
clerk's office in Kentucky. I had a lingering contempt for
the means I was under the necessity of employing to acquire
wealth. I foolishly made a distinction between laboring for
money in my present vocation, and bartering one's services
to rogues for fees in a learned profession. The aristocratic
Beauforts considered the one not quite respectable, and
13*
the other altogether honorable; and, at times, my restless
fancy was too much disposed to concur with them. But
Blanche did not accord with her family in opinion; at least
she had never been known to make any such distinctions.
I say I ought to have been happyas perfectly happy as it
is possible for one to be on earth. I had with me sufficient
money to discharge every debt we owed in Philadelphia.
I had made money, and my prospect was good for making
a speedy competence. I was respected in the community
where I dwelt, and associated on terms of perfect equality
with the highest and best of the population. Then why
should I call up in imagination other societies, other classes,
of more refined manners and more luxurious habits, and
endure voluntary unhappiness because fortune had denied
me access to them? It was simply because there had not
always been a proper Mentor at my side to place in my
hands the right kind of books. It demonstrated the fact
that an immense amount of injury is perpetrated by the
indiscriminate dissemination of works of pure fiction.
Such works may serve to amuse, and some written by
authors of common sense, may impart instruction; but
a majority of them are very apt to plant an immedicable
thorn in the breast of the young reader, to rankle and
plague him during the remainder of his life. It matters
not how exalted may be one's origin, or affluent his
circumstances
;
he must be doomed to tumble down, on many
occasions, from his fancied eminence, and grovel on the
earth with the rest of the worms of creation; and if his
nerves are destined to be shocked on viewing the ordinary
pursuits of life, he is quite likely to suffer a larger quantity
of misery, attributable to his fallacious notions of lofty
gentility, than the humblest laborer who toils for his daily
wages. That there arethat there must be distinctions
in society, cannot be denied, and ought not to be
deprecated
.
The superior gifts and acquirements of mind, the
undeviating adherence to the principles of honor and
morality, must always, and should ever, exalt certain
individuals
above the common herd that may be found
destitute
of such qualities. But to suppose that a man should
be assigned a low degree in the scale of respectability,
solely because he is under the necessity of prosecuting an
honest pursuit to secure a maintenance, is altogether absurd
and ridiculous. That such groundless supposition does
prevail in certain communities, is well known to all.
But it is an evil that might be corrected by example. It
is true the accomplished and refined could obtain no
reciprocity
of enjoyment in the society of the honest ignorant;
nor can such an association be required. But they could
recognize the claims to respectability of those who become
as intelligent as themselves, and as subservient to correct
principle, notwithstanding their occupations, of whatsoever
kind they may be. They should disdain to reproach any
one for his business pursuits, provided they be lawful and
not injurious to public morals. There is a distinction
without much difference, between acquiring a fortune by
honest industry one's self, and subsisting on a fortune so
acquired by one's father or grandfather. There are but
fewvery few, indeedfamilies of wealth and
pretension
in this country, which have not produced their
mechanics
and men of business. Therefore, the man who
denounces as disreputable any of the useful occupations,
is very apt to be casting a stigma upon some member of
his own family, and perhaps the very one to whom he is
indebted for everything he possesses.
When we arrived at St. Louis, the river was open, and
in fine navigable order. A large number of merchants
met there on their way to the east; and western merchants,
wherever they meet, are acquaintances and friends; so
we were all perfectly at home together. We met on
board the splendid new steamer, Princess Victoria, which
was to start the next morning at seven o'clock. There
was one merchant, however, disappointed in his
expectations
of going along with us. This was a gentleman of
experience, and wherever he was, always had business
to attend to up to the last moment. We all regretted
that he was left behind, which occurred in the following
manner. After coming on board, paying for his passage,
and depositing his trunk in his state room (they had just
begun to construct state rooms), he turned to Captain Swan,
and addressed him as follows:
Captain, you start at seven o'clock, A. M. to-morrow?
At seven o'clock
precisely
, replied the captain.
You mean seven o'clock, P. M.,
as usual
, I suppose,
captain, which will allow me to do all my running about.
I mean what I say, stranger, said the captain, very
coolly. It is not usual with
me
to speak
positively
, when
I don't intend to act up to my words. Captain Swan is not
like some other captains you may have met with. I say
seven o'clock, A. M. At that hour I advise you to have
your corpse on board ready to start. Saying this, the
captain
hobbled (he was lame) on shore, and gave some
directions
to the hands that were rolling in freight.
I never knew a single captain in my life, said friend
F., as the master of the boat turned away, to push off at
the time namedand if this one starts at the hour appointed,
he will be very apt to leave `my corpse' behind.
And so he did. By six o'clock the next morning the
Princess had her steam up, and black columns of smoke
rose from her gigantic chimneys, while the engineers
below
kept up such an incessant hissing and fizzing of
steam, that no one could hear himself speak on the boiler
deck, where we were all seated.
Precisely
at the time
appointed
,
Captain Swan gave the word to let go, which
was promptly obeyed, and a few licks back extricated
us from the crowd of steamers lining the busy wharfbusy
even then, but an illimitable beehive now.
But instead of steering down the stream, the pilot turned
her bow up, and we ran about a mile above the city, and
then turned round and went past under a full head of steam,
to show the good people who stared at us the capabilities
of the glorious Princess. The spray flew up six feet high
from our cut-water, and a terrible commotion was kicked
up behind us, almost throwing some of the smaller craft
out on the shore. When we got just opposite the wharf
we had left, a couple of small cannons were fired off, the
flags were run up, and a band of music on the hurricane
deck struck up The Star Spangled Banner. We now
beheld our friend F. running down the broad quay, waving
a white handkerchief for us to stop. He called aloud, no
doubt, but we could not hear himhe beckoned, in every
variety of attitude; and we saw him very plainlybut we
could nowhere find the captain. Wethe western
merchants
being
of one mind, and of one will, would have
caused the captain to stop and send ashore for him; but,
as I have said, that functionary had disappeared, and could
nowhere be found. At length, when we had gone some
six miles, we perceived the captain coming up from below,
with an air of perfect ignorance of what had transpired.
He was sorry we had not found him; and even then said he
would go back if we insisted upon itsuch being the
potential
influence of our classbut this was rather much
to require at his hands, and so we continued on our career,
hoping our friend would overtake us on another boat at
Louisville.
Among the passengers on board, I may be pardoned for
giving the true initials of some of them, as it has been a
long time ago, and they were all creditable pioneers in their
line, and deserve, from a career of usefulness and merited
success, to be held in remembrance by those who have
succeeded them, and subsequently built upon the broad
and substantial foundations laid down by them. First, there
was Mr. G. C., the gentleman in manners, the genius in
financial and business operations, and the benefactor of
honest, enterprising young men. His features were regular
and handsomebarring a nose somewhat longhis eyes
were the very orbs of intelligence, and his lips expressed
his marked characteristics of benevolence and generosity.
But even then the pallor of feeble health rested upon his
face, and the locks about his temples were beginning to be
salted and peppered by the hand of unsparing time. His
physical system was too weak for his vigorous intellect,
and the wear and tear of the thousand horse power of the
machinery of his mind threatened to shatter his hull to
pieces. By forcible restraints on his genius, and by
confining
his enterprises in business channels to prudent
limitations
,
he has fortunately been able to keep his corpse
erect even until this day. That he acquired a
fortune
,
as it was, is known to all the banks of any
magnitude
in the Union, where his autograph is quite familiar,
and respected as it deserves to be; but if his body had
only been equal to his mind, there is but little doubt that
his acquisitionshonest and honorable ones in every
instance
would
have sounded his fame to every quarter of
the globe. There was Mr. L., self-possessed, amiable,
quiet and easy in his manners, and always meditating
something
new for the benefit of the state, as well as for his
own profit. Unfortunately, his mind ran in advance of the
necessities of the time; and, as is generally the case with
those who introduce novel objects of usefulness, this
projector
was destined to share the fate of many illustrious
predecessors. But still he accomplished much good in his
days of prosperity. So long as he confined his energies
to mercantile pursuits, he continued to reap a rich reward;
and he had the gratification of successfully establishing in
business a great number of enterprising young men in that
new country. Next, there was Mr. M. P., a gentleman of
portly form, and undoubted geniusas pioneers generally
arebut who possessed the invaluable faculty of confining
all his thoughts and operations to a single, uniform line of
business, and of course he
had
to grow rich. There was
Mr. St**ly, of calm, mild, but thoughtful aspect. He was
meditating expeditions beyond the borders of civilization,
which were afterwards triumphantly accomplished, and he
is now enjoying the fruits of his active life in peaceful
retirement
with an independent fortune. There was Col. O.,
who was to become the associate of the last named, and to
acquire a still larger fortune, and finally to fall a victim on
the field of battle. There was Col. M., of unusual vivacity
and extraordinary conversational powers, who subsequently
retired in independence, after pursuing a uniform course
of business. He became chief magistrate of the state.
There was Mr. C. F. J., the happy lover of humor in
others, and affording a constant fund of it himself, but at
the same time a most enlightened man of business, and
the most accomplished chirographer I ever met with. Tall,
handsome, and extremely affable, it is no wonder that
when he retired with an ample fortune, an unusual degree
of popularity should keep him constantly in the councils
of the state, and elevate him to the chair of the Assembly.
There were E. M. S., H. R., Mr. H***es (subsequently an
M. C.), Col. T., besides quite a number of others, most of
whom became men of fortune, and achieved other enviable
distinctions. There were those, of course, who formed
exceptions to this listmen who were not adapted to their
business, and failed in it; and others, who were qualified,
but lacked the perseverance, to pursue any line of policy long
enough to arrive at a desirable result. But every one of
them, so far as I am informed, who pursued the legitimate
business of a merchant, without being enticed aside into
other channels of ill-considered speculation, met with
certain
success, and reaped a rich reward for all their toils
and privations. And so it is to this day. The western
merchant who perseveres in the single appropriate line of his
business, is absolutely sure of succeeding in his object. It
is the manand pretty much that man alonewho deviates
from his legitimate career, and in his eagerness to amass
wealth before he has earned it, and before he is entitled to
it, embarks in wild speculations which promise splendid
returns
on paper
, but which are rarely to be realized on the
counter
, that becomes bankrupt. These facts (let no one
consider
them fictions) should be well considered by the young
merchants of the west. They are applicable now, and will
be applicable in all time to come; and if the admonition be
kindly received, and the hint be acted upon, the experience
of the past will unquestionably produce its benefits in the
future.
During our passage, various means were resorted to to
pass the time pleasantly. The nights were spent by too many
of us at the card table. Even the oldest and the gravest
of the company did not hesitate to take a turn at brag or
poker; and none, I believe, were exempted from eucher,
whist, backgammon and checkers. Such, at that time, was
the universal practiceand so long as none but men of
character and honor participated, there was not much injury
done to the purses of the unskillful; for amusement, not
gain, was the object. But when gamblers by
profession
made the cabins of the steamers the scenes of their
depredations, it was quite different with those who ventured
to indulge in sports of such questionable morality. Many
a young merchant was doomed to pay the penalty of his
rash gratifications, by finding himself completely relieved
of the funds destined to discharge his debts in the east.
But any one who travels on the western waters at this day,
needs not to be informed by me that this evil practice has
been, if not quite altogether, at least to a very great
extent
,
reformed.
But our days were spent differently. We were in the
habit of assembling on the boiler deck, for the purpose of
conversing on matters of amusement and information. We
resolved ourselves into a kind of Western Congress, Mr. C.,
of St. Charles, by spontaneous request, always in the chair.
Here the experienced merchants met to discuss matters of
expediency for the future, deduced from incidents of the
past, the relation of which was often mingled with
diverting
anecdotes. The young merchants, who were making
their first visit to the east, kept in the back ground, as mere
listeners (when not especially desired to speak), to the
lessons
of instruction calculated for our edification.
I recollect distinctly the first morning we assembled in
this manner; there were perhaps twenty of us seated,
forming
a half circle, with the president in the centre, at the
apex, like the leader of a flock of wild geese. Each had
a cigar in his mouth, and his heels on the railing in front.
There was no sunbut the weather was mild and
refreshing
,
as we were fanned by the early spring breezes coming
14
up the broad father of rivers, from the soft clime of the
orange and lemon, the magnolia and myrtle. There was
no fog; but a slight curling mist rose from the placid
surface
of the stream, and vanished in thin air before it reached
to any considerable height.
The subject first discussed was the best policy of
purchasing
goods in the east. Some contended that it was
best to purchase of a succession of new houses, while
others maintained that the proper mode was to confine
one's dealing to a few well selected firms, whose
character
for regularity and fairness was established. This was
edifying to such of us as were making our first visit. A
representative from Palmyra (the appellation of
representative
was borne by each of us), maintained the first
proposition
.
There was a new house established, said he, last
year, with which I made a bill that pleased me; and in proof
that I did a little better with it than I did, or than any one
could do, with the old established firms, I have only to say
that they sold me the apple 3 brown cottons a quarter
of a cent below the usual price. It is true the amount
saved by the purchase, was no great thing; but it
demonstrates
the fact that a new house is willing to put up with
smaller profits, at first, until it has obtained a regular set
of customers.
Will the gentleman from Palmyra, said the member
from Lexington, who took the other side, permit me to
ask him a question?
It is strictly in order, said the chairman.
Certainly, said the Palmyra delegate.
Then the gentleman will be good enough to state
whether he bought any other goods from the new house;
and if so, what they were, and the prices.
I did make a general bill with it, replied the
Palmyrian, and I was pleased with every article I
purchased
.
For one thing, I remember that I purchased
a few pieces of a new article, just introduced, called
`Grecianade,' for gentlemen's wear. I gave twenty-five
cts. per yard for it, and sold it readily for fifty cts. I did
not ask the price of it at the old housesperhaps the
gentleman can inform me what they asked for it?
I can, said the gentleman from Lexington,
triumphantly
.
They asked only twenty-three cts. for the same
goods! This was followed by a round of applause. But
this is not all: I, too, was induced to make a small bill
with the new house. I did very well, I must confess,
with the articles selected. But I selected none of their
`Grecianade,' nor anything else that I was not quite
familiar with. They
attempted
to sell me cloths and other
goods ten per cent. higher than I paid for them
elsewhere
.
It takes quite a good judge of goods, and a better
one than I profess to be, to detect an excess of a few cents
or a few shillings in the yard, on goods of value. The
`tallest' merchant will frequently get beyond his depth in
Market St., or Pearl St., and then it is better to depend upon
an old friend, who has never been known to deceive, than
a new man, and an entire stranger. By taking considerable
pains, examining the tickets, &c., I found out that the cloths
of the new firm for which I was asked $5 00 per yard, were a
portion of the same invoice they asked only $4 50 for at R.'s,
S. P. & Co.'s, G., C. & Co.'s, B.'s, M. N.'s, J. N. & L. D.'s,
O. & T.'s, &c. &c. So when I wandered from the old
beaten track, I made sure of having my foot on firm bottom.
I never buy goods of strangers, unless I am familiar with
their quality and value. Then I run no risk.
That's all very well, said a member from Columbia;
but still something may be said against confining one's
self too long to certain old houses. If they become too
confident
of selling you all the goods you want, it is natural
for them to adhere to their tip top prices. It is with them
as it is with us. When certain descriptions of goods
decline
in the market, they are very apt to exact the old
figures, if they suppose there is no probability of their
customers
getting information of the reduction. Competition is
fair with them, as it is with us. Our customers always
derive advantage from the competition we have in our
towns. They are under no obligation to give us more for
our goods than they can be had for of our neighbors. And
so with the eastern merchant. It is true there is more
safety
in the old housesthey will not be likely to impose on a
customer, as strangers sometimes do, when they can get
a good chance. Nevertheless, a new firm will offer
inducements
not to be despised. To establish a business,
they are willing to put up with smaller profits than the
rich old houses; and it is our interest to avail ourselves of
all such advantages. I am done, now, and if no one else
desires to speak, I call for a decision.
The speaker decided every question; that was the rule:
and there was no appeal from his decision. In this case,
he decided thus: It is always best to look before you
leapthat is the old saying; and it is as applicable now
as when it was first uttered. I have no doubt the first
gentleman lost by his precipitate confidence about as
much as the second gained by his prudence; and that the
new house came off `more than even' by the operation. I
think the last gentleman who spoke, hit the mark. Where
one must depend upon the candor of the house he is
dealing
with, it is better to rely upon those whose
representations
have before been proved to be correct. But when
one is perfectly competent to judge for himself, it is well
to look about him, and buy of those who offer the best
bargains
.
But one thing I beg to impress upon the very
young gentlemen who have never been in the east. It is
this: every merchant there, as well as in the west, follows
his business for the purpose of making money. I have
never met with a merchant who sold goods exclusively for
the benefit of his customers. And when you are told that
certain houses are selling all kinds of goods lower than
anybody else can afford to sell them, don't believe a word
of itfor, upon inquiry, you will ascertain that such firms
possess no greater capital than their neighbors, and pay
equally as much for their goods. So if they are particularly
extravagant in their declarations that they can afford to
sell, and will sell, at cost, or lower than cost, beware of
them! Buy of them staple goods, that you know all about,
if they insist upon it; but never venture where you can't
touch bottom. Confidence in another is a plant of slow
growth. And until it is so grown and provedexamined
and checked off, in mercantile phraseit is best to be
reserved
and cautious. These merchants may talk about
friendship, and of an ardent disposition to subserve your
interests; but in business transactions, pretty generally,
the design of the parties, mutually, is to realize the most
they can from each other. Such is the motive, even when
excessive assurances of attachment, kind feeling, and all
that, are made.
The next topic was introduced by a member from
Fayette
.
Gentlemen, said he, no doubt you all have your
`brag' houses in Philadelphia, and I have mine. I have
tried all the houses you have alluded to; and without having
anything special to allege against any of them, I can bear
witness, particularly of the fairness and trust-worthiness
of my favorite firm  Messrs. Keen, Cunning & Co. I
14*
have bought goods of them for three years, and every time
I return, they give me new evidences of their rectitude and
liberality.
Here he paused a moment, being interrupted by a buzz
that went round the company. A majority of the merchants
present simultaneously uttered declarations of their
admiration
of the house alluded to, and I made a memorandum of
it, as one I was resolved to make a bill with.
I will tell, continued the gentleman, why it is my
`brag' house. All houses are liable to make mistakes in
the hurry of businessbut this one never hesitates to
correct
an error, and it is always done in a handsome manner.
Last year, when I went on, I carried with me my last
invoices
,
in which were two pieces of cloth chargedone
black, one blue, and each worth about fifty dollars. I told
them the blue never came to hand. That was enough.
My word was sufficient. They were satisfied. They
handed me fifty dollars, thanked me for giving them an
opportunity to correct the error, and protested that they
would always correct such errors with pleasure. And that
was not all. Upon farther inquiry, they said their young
man had by mistake put the cloth in the box of another
merchant, who had not yet informed them of it, but had
simply, and most dishonestly, paid only for the goods in
his bill. I asked them if they did not intend to make the
man pay them for the cloth. They said no; they could
afford to lose it, and they would do so rather than expose
the fellow.
To my surprise, this speech was followed by a profound
silence, instead of the applause I looked for. The chairman
smiled mysteriously, and called upon the rest to say what
they knew of the house in question, intimating that when
they were all done, he would have a few words to utter in
relation to it, as he was well acquainted with its character.
But they all seemed disposed to prolong the silence.
Come, gentlemen, said the chairman, I am very
anxious
to speak; but it is against the rule for me to do so
until you are all done. I call upon the gentleman from
Boonville to speak next.
Well, then, said the Boonville member, if I must
speak out, I shall have `to acknowledge the corn,' to make
use of a very vulgar expression too often repeated in polite
company. I have been `chiseled,' to use another refined
term in our vocabulary. The amount, I don't know, nor
do I care much about it; but the
fact
that I was so `green,'
another familiar wordis what stings me somewhat, I
must confess.
I'm in for it, too! said the gentleman from Fulton.
And I, exclaimed the most of them, one after another,
in quick succession. To my utter astonishment, the same
kind of a mistake had occurred with each of them at the
same house; and in every instance, it had been a piece of
blue cloth, or some other indispensable article in a western
assortment of goods at that day, and which each one
supposed
he had bought remarkably low. I will not, of course,
make any attempt to repeat even the simple anathemas that
were uttered. The compound ones, and the new ones
invented
for the occasion, would be altogether beyond my
powers of description. But still I was slow to comprehend
the cause of such a reversion of sentiment. The wonder with
me was why they did not rather sympathize with Messrs.
Keen, Cunning & Co. The money, in every instance, had
been quite promptly refunded; and, if I understood the
gentleman
,
the goods had been packed in the boxes belonging to
others, who were not so ready to correct the error. The loss
of Messrs. Keen, Cunning & Co., thought I, must have been
considerable.
Now, gentlemen, said the chairman, it is my time
to speak. Messrs. Keen, Cunning & Co. played off the
same game upon me several years ago. But I found them
out, and left them. Of course the plan was successful
with me, and would have been to this day, had not one of
their young men, who had been discharged, revealed the
secret. He said the mistake was designedly made. The
goods left out, were too valuable for their customers not to
miss them. And when his money was promptly and
cheerfully
refunded, it was natural for the customer to conceive
a high estimate of the honor and justice of the house, and to
deal more liberally and confidingly with it than ever. He
said the firm hardly ever lost a customer, as their
overcharges
were skillfully made on such descriptions of goods
as rendered discovery difficult, if not impossible.
I may here statethat no one shall suppose such a
house exists in Philadelphia at this daythat Messrs. Keen,
Cunning & Co.'s business was extremely light that
season
.
As they had made arrangements for a large
business
,
and as there was tightness in the money market
when their notes fell due, they failed.
The next topic was the relative merits of New York and
Philadelphia. But as only a few of our party had been in
the habit of visiting the first-named city, the subject was
soon referred to the chairman for his irrevocable decision.
I must give Philadelphia the preference, gentlemen,
until some reforms are introduced in New York. Prices
must necessarily be irregular in every citybut then there
is not quite as much regularity in the system of transacting
business, not the same uniformity of habits among the
jobbers
in New York, that we find in Philadelphia. There
are more sharpers, more Shylocks, more impostors in the
one than the other. Such is the general belief in Missouri,
at all events, founded upon experience. There are
doubtless
a vast number of houses in New York equal in every
respect to any we find in Philadelphia, and it would be
exceedingly
wrong to confound the good with the bad; but
how can strangers discriminate between them? When I
first made purchases in New York, as well as several of
my friends who began there at the same time, although
some of our bills gave us very great satisfaction, we
invariably
found that we had been imposed on in others.
Several years passed before we fell in with the right kind
of houses. A number of the jobbers there go upon the
principle that it is best to procure a constant succession of
new purchasers; and, never expecting to sell goods to the
same man twice, they resolve to make the most of him
while they have a chance. Of course he suffers `some;'
and he is very apt to confound the innocent with the guilty,
in his subsequent denunciations. Now, in Philadelphia,
the substantial fair-dealing firms form a kind of fraternity
to uphold one another; and by unanimity of action, having
in a measure the control of money matters, they are enabled
to keep out, or put out of the trade, most of the dishonest
and disqualified interlopers, who would perpetrate a stigma
on the fair name of the city. Besides, Philadelphia is
nigher to us, and the charges for transportation thence,
are not so high as they are from New York. While upon
this subject, I beg to caution my young friends against one
species of imposition constantly practised in New York on
strangers. No doubt some of you, gentlemen, will visit
that great city to gratify your curiosity, if nothing else. I
will illustrate by an anecdote, from which you will deduce
the warning. I have always been considered somewhat
cautious, and rarely have been taken in by impostors. For
years I have been in the habit of laughing at my young
friends, who will, in despite of all the cautions contained
in the newspapers, persist in buying false watches at the
auctions in New York. It was only last spring that I met
with three of my western friends in Broadway, who had
been cheated at one of these swindling concerns the year
before. I joined them in a stroll, and we searched for the
gentleman
of whom they had made their purchases. I
wanted to see the rascal made an example of. We found
the house, but there was a different name on the sign.
The present occupant could give us no information in
relation
to the retired auctioneer. But he would sell us
genuine
gold lever watches: and as there were some half dozen
men besides our party in the room, he held up one and
began to cry away at a tremendous rate. Some one started
it at fifteen dollars, and it was run up to forty dollars, when
the bidding ceased. `Take it, sir; examine it for
yourself
,'
said he, handing it to me. I thought I would look
at it, merely out of idle curiosity. Now, I profess to be a
tolerable judge of a watch. I opened it. It was a good
lever, extra jeweled. The case was eighteen carat gold.
The watch was a valuable one. I could not be mistaken.
It was altogether different from those in the pockets of my
friends. I bid forty-five dollars for it carelessly, still
holding
it in my hand. `It is yours, sir, and the cheapest
watch that ever was bought,' said the auctioneer, taking
it from my hand. `Here, boy, take this watch back to
the desk. Follow him, sir, and upon your paying the clerk
there, it will be delivered to you. I cannot take the money
for it, or I would deliver it here.' I followed the boy,
keeping my eye on the watch. But as we progressed
backwards
,
it grew darker, there being no window behind.
When I came to the man at the desk, he was writing by
the light of a candle. He presented a bill, received the
money, and delivered the watch. It seemed to be the
same one; and as I had watched its course pretty narrowly,
I put it in my pocket, satisfied it had not been changed for
another. But we had not walked away forty paces, before
I thought I would give it a cursory inspection by sun-light.
Bah! I perceived the cheat at once! It had been changed
in its progress to the desk, before my eyes, and I had now
a gilded thing not worth ten dollars. I paused, almost in
a passion. My first impulse was to go back and confront
the swindlers. But the laughter of my friends, whom I
had been quizzing for their obtuseness, in suffering
themselves
to become the victims of such sharpers, was so just
a retaliation, and my conduct had been so inconsiderate in
venturing to cast a bid at all for any article whatever in
an establishment of rogues, that I resolved to stand rebuked,
as the just penalty of my rashness. Thus, gentlemen, is
one more liable to be swindled in New York, than in
Philadelphia
.
The influential business men in the latter city
would not permit such establishments to exist two days in
any of their business thoroughfares. They give a whole
city a bad name, and inflict an incalculable injury upon it.
From what I have said, you may infer it is my opinion
that the young merchant, particularly, is safest in the hands
of the old-established and long tried houses of Philadelphia.
For my part, I am now in the habit of visiting New York
as well as Philadelphia, and derive advantage from it. I
buy there of men whom I know to be as conscientious as
any others elsewhere; and as I make it an invariable rule
to buy no article without first making myself pretty well
acquainted with its value, I do not often have reason to
complain of being over-reached. I perceive no material
difference in the prices between the two cities; but I am
sometimes enabled to obtain a greater variety of styles by
purchasing in both.
The next topic was drumming and boring. The
speakers were unanimous in their condemnation of the
practice; and many of them related instances of their harsh
treatment of the young men who pursued them for their
custom. The chairman being called upon for his decision,
paused, and with a smile turned to one of the company
who had not hitherto uttered a word, and demanded, as he
had a right to do by the rules, that he should first express
himself on the subject. This gentleman was from a place
in the southwestern part of the state, without a name. No
town had yet been christened in his section. He was located
at a mill, on some river, and had his store under the same
roof. But he supplied the people with goods for fifty miles
round, and was growing rich. This representative of that
wild region deserves to be particularly noticed. His
name was Elijah Sage. His form was slight, his face pale
with ill health; and although he was not thirty years of
age, his locks were quite gray. He was hardly ever known
to smilehe had never been seen to laugh. He was
repulsive
at first sight to a stranger; but all who knew him well
appreciated the genuine benevolence of his heart, which
was fated to be concealed under a sour and crabbed exterior.
Whether it was the result of disease and suffering, or that
he had discovered a philosophy of his ownfor he was
known to be a profound student of human nature, and
deeply versed in historywhich caused him to disapprove
of almost everything done by others, and to dissent from
almost every opinion expressed, both by public men and
private individuals, was a matter of conjecture; but, that
such was his habit, none who were in his society could
deny. Men were often vexed and annoyed by his
contradictions
when they succeeded in getting him to participate
in their debates; but when they reflected that he never
obtruded his opinions on them, they felt bound to tolerate
his eccentricities, as they were termed. Elijah not only
thought and spoke, but he likewise acted, differently from
other men. When other merchants were deterred by
financial panics from purchasing as extensively as they
had designed doing, he said nothing, and bought the more
extensively in consequence. When others were made
confident and bold by the favorable aspect of the times,
he became timid and cautious. Nevertheless, his
invariable
success
procured for him, and with no ill-founded reason,
the reputation of having the gift of penetration, and a more
than ordinary genius for business. He had a long nose,
as most men of genius have.
I differ from all of you, said he, responding to the call
reluctantly, in regard to the `borers and drummers.' Of
course, when they come about me at the hotel, I believe
just as much as I please of their professions and promises.
But still, I sometimes meet them the next day at their
employers'
establishments, and pick up good bargains among
them. I have done it often, and expect to do it again.
Besides, they display their activity in exhibiting every
description
of goods they have; and it often occurs that they
show me an article not in my memorandum, which I need,
and which I can make money on. So it is mere nonsense
to condemn them. They can't force any one to buy.
They do all the labor, showing you their goods; and it costs
you nothing merely to stand, or sit, as I generally do, and
look on. Then, where is the imposition or wrong they do?
For my part, I like to see them. I like their eagerness and
anxiety to supply my wants. It is my business to see that
15
they do not sell me anything I don't want, or at too high a
price. If I was compelled to believe everything they say, and
to purchase everything they insist on my taking, it would
be a different thing. The man who has not the resolution
to say
no
, when an article he does not want is offered him,
had better keep away from the city, and pay some one else
who can, to buy his goods for him. It is an easy thing for
me to listen to their speeches over their cases of goods,
and then simply reply that they are not the kind I want,
or that the prices don't suit me. That is an end of it.
They may return to the charge, and pour out a volley of
new arguments, a mere puff of wind, which can hurt
nobody
;
but still it is just as easy to remain unmoved as not.
If they should seem to be offended at my incredulity, that
is no matter of mine. They may get pleased again, if it
so please them; if not, there is no harm done to me. The
fact is, if they did not find poor weak fools at the hotels,
whom they can twist and turn as they please, their
importunity
would never be complained of; and in nine cases
out of ten, when you hear western men abusing or
ridiculing
them, you may safely suppose that they have on
some occasion been weak enough to become their worthy
dupes. Here there was a writhing among the company,
and a moment after, it was succeeded by a loud burst of
laughter. Elijah continued, without any perceptible change
in his rigid features: In regard to the employers of those
abused young men, and the conduct of the young men
themselves, I consider the practice altogether justifiable,
and, indeed, commendable. They seek to establish or to
extend a business. Who of us will hesitate to do the same
thing, in our little pitiful and contemptible spheres? Who
of us can cast the first stone? If they pulled you into
their stores and robbed you by main force, you could not
make a greater outcry against them; while at the same
time, if you would confess the truth, those among you who
abuse them the most, would acknowledge that their
attentions
never fail to flatter your vanity. Your abuse of them
is only a mode you have of boasting of your standing and
importance in the city. The practice is rather agreeable
than otherwise to the western man, inasmuch as it is better
to have a friendly recognition on entering an establishment
in quest of any article, however insignificant, than to
address
cold, formal strangers, who may not know that you
are a western merchant. Besides, men of the best
business
qualifications, of honor, and capital, when embarking
in business, employ these young men, as well as houses of
the reverse character; and I venture to assert that our
acquaintance with two of every three houses to which we
give preference, commenced through the very means we
are so apt to condemn. I am done. Decide, Mr.
Chairman
.
The chairman decided that, as he was unable to
determine
the matter, he would leave every one to the enjoyment
of his own opinion. Elijah nodded his assent, with
something
like an air of triumph.
The next subject was one which interested me much.
It was in relation to the social intercourse between the
western men and the city merchants.
Each one had something to say of the hospitable
attentions
he had received, or something to complain of in the
neglect of those who, while professing to be his friends
when selling him goods, had cast him off as soon as they
had pumped his pocket dry.
When they were all done, the chairman again demanded
an opinion from Mr. Sage.
My opinion is, said Elijah, that those who are
worthy
of social intercourse, and have anything really
attractive
about them, may, if they be so disposed, find admission
to the private circles of their acquaintances anywhere.
But we, who are in the habit of living in the woods or
wild prairies, seem to forget that habits and customs in
cities are essentially different from those of the people we
associate with; and hence our reproaches and sneers at what
we are pleased to denominate their aristocracy, when we
see a well-dressed company invited to a party, from which
we, in our coarse boots, huge blanket coats, foxy caps, and
long beards, are excluded. What kind of a figure would
we cut, if we were admitted? We may affect to despise
dress as much as we please; (Elijah was neatly dressed;)
but if we should find ourselves, in our coarse costumes, in
some magnificent saloon, surrounded by splendidly attired
ladies and gentlemen, there is not one of us but would feel
overwhelmed with shame and confusion. And why would we
have such painful feelings? Because the ladies were too
fair, and the gentlemen too effeminate or foppish? No;
but simply because we had neglected to make as genteel
an appearance as the rest of them. If the gratification of
being present on such occasions does not compensate for
the expenditure it would require to dress as well as the
rest of the company, it is our duty to stay away, even if
an invitation be tendered us. Most of our pleasures and
desires are merely creatures of the fancy. Our ordinary
clothing is the common apparel in the country we inhabit,
and attracts no particular attention; but it is offensive, and
naturally and justly offensive in places where a better
description
is universally worn. In my country, I once knew
an eastern gentleman to come nigh being mobbed for
wearing
a rich Spanish cloak, when everybody else wore blankets
and buckskins. He was hooted at and insulted by our
young men, partly, perhaps, because the girls smiled at
him very graciously. In the city, they do not go that far
they let you enjoy your peculiar fancy unmolested. It is
no aggression on their part, when they merely omit to
invite
your iron-nailed heels to cut their Brussels carpets, and
the black quid in your mouth to find a place of deposit
under their fine sofas. Here Elijah was interrupted by
the unrestrained merriment of the company. About half
of them were dressed in full Missouri costume, and
three-fourths
were tasting the weed.
You need not suppose, continued Elijah, that I can
plead an exemption from the error of western menI
mean of a portion of them; for it is only a portion of them
who persist in the error. I will give you an instance of
the awkward predicaments to which I have been liable.
The first time I went east, I determined to dress precisely
as I had done at homeindeed, I wore the identical clothes
I had been wearing for twelve months in the store. Well,
nobody objected to my clothes in the houses I transacted
business with. I bought a large stock of goods, and paid
away a considerable sum of money. The merchants all
treated me with marked respect, and complimented my
judgment, while I, on my part, was satisfied with my
purchases
.
As long as my ideas were confined to business, I
did very well, and had no reason to complain of a want of
politeness on the part of anybody. But when my business
was done, being a young man, and having one or two idle
days on my hands, I thought I would seek some innocent
amusement and recreation. Then I began, as I thought, to
discover some signs of this so much hated aristocracyfor
a deaf ear was turned to all my hints. They were ready
and anxious to sell me goods, while they had not a word to
say on any other topic whatever. I returned to the hotel,
15*
and abused that refinement and taste of the Philadelphians
which I could not comprehend and appreciate. My friends
joined me in maledictions, for most of them were in a
similar
predicament. In the evening I visited the theatre,
in company with several of my western associates. We
went early, to get good seats; and sure enough, when we
got in, we found the house empty, for it was not quite dark.
We cruised about, in quest of the best location, and finally
pounced upon a box, the third from the stage on the left
hand, and sat down on the front bench. We observed a
ticket pinned to the cushion, with the name of `Clear
Brook' written on it. Mr. Brook was the merchant who
had handled the largest portion of my money, and sold me
the most of my goodsand all my companions knew him.
So we thought ourselves fortunate in hitting upon his box,
and did not doubt that he would take pleasure in
entertaining
us between the acts.
The first scene passed off before Mr. Clear Brook and
his company arrived. Indeed, I observed that nearly all
the ticketed benches were unoccupied during the first scene;
and upon inquiry I was informed that the fashionables
never came early, and always retired after the first piece.
But my particular friend, Mr. Clear Brook, did come at
last; and he was accompanied by several fine gentlemen
and ladies. The gentlemen wore spotless white kid gloves,
and other finery to match. The ladies were decked in
satin, laces, brilliants, etc. It was a gorgeous bevy; and the
contrast between their glittering habiliments and our very
shabby appearance was so palpable that we hung down
our heads in shame. They paused at the door of the box,
evidently not recognizing us. We abandoned the front
bench for the ladies; but still there were hesitation and
consultation
among them. We looked for Mr. Brook to come
forward and speak to us, and to inform his gay company
that we were western men, and not a party of the rowdies
of the town. But he did no such thing. He merely gazed
at us a moment through a gold mounted glass, held in his
kid-covered hand, and then called for the box-keeper.
This is my box, sir, said he to that personage; I
have taken the
whole box
, sir, and I desire you to clear it
out for the exclusive use of my party. He spoke pretty
loudly, and attracted the attention of many people in the
vicinity, and especially in the pit, the latter looking up
with delight, expecting to have a scene not in the bills.
We became the centre of attraction for a brief space of
time, and our situation was becoming intolerably
uncomfortable
.
We stood up, turned round, and faced Mr.
Brook, that he might recognize us immediately, and put an
end to the embarrassment. We bowed. He remained stiff.
He would not recognize us. The box-keeper was required
to perform his duty, and we were unceremoniously thrust
out, and the door was closed against us. Of course we
came nigh bursting with rage and indignation; and when we
procured back seats on the opposite side of the house, our
mortification and anger were not diminished on perceiving
that Mr. Brook's party did not occupy more than half the
seats in the box we had been turned out of. We vowed
vengeance, and we had it. This circumstance was
narrated
by so many that it spread all over the west, and
seemed likely to cripple the concern in which Mr. Brook
was a partner. He was compelled finally to go out of the
concern, and was never able afterwards to get into another.
But
we
were wrongwhile his conduct was not so very
reprehensible. It was incumbent on us to conform to the
usages of the people among whom we thrust ourselves.
It was inexcusable presumption in us to suppose we might,
without offence, and a breach of manners and good breeding,
sit beside a party of fashionably dressed ladies and
gentlemen
in muddy boots, and nappy blanket coats, which had
been worn in the stage coaches, and been rubbed against all
sorts of travelers. None of us were altogether deficient in
that best kind of education, extensive reading and general
information. We knew more of history, of the classics, of
poets and plays, perhaps, than Mr. Clear Brook, or any
of his party; it is probable, that, if a just balance sheet
had been struck, we had quite as much money; and if we
had been properly dressedand there is a propriety of dress,
as well as of speech and mannersit is probable we would
have had a cheerful recognition, and a pleasant
conversation
with the young ladies. We were deprived of that
happiness by our own stupidity and folly, and should have
blamed no one but ourselves for the result.
When Mr. Sage was done speaking, the chairman, who
always dressed genteelly, decided without hesitation that
Elijah was right.
Such is my decision, gentlemen, said he; and I
feel inclined to substantiate it by a few additional remarks.
You have all observed, no doubt, that the well-dressed
gentleman receives the first attentions of the servants at
the hotels, and the best accommodations, without paying
any more for them. On the contrary, he frequently pays
less, as it is a greater satisfaction for a landlord, by good
treatment, to induce a man of genteel appearance to become
his regular customer, than one of shabby and disgusting
exterior
.
Indeed, he receives the latter with reluctance; and,
as he is indifferent about his returning, the probability is that
he will make him pay a few dollars more than he charges the
other, to deter him from coming back. So the shabby
gentleman who travels much, may pay, in the course of a
year, in the way of extortions, while he has to put up at the
same time with the meanest sort of accommodation, an extra
sum fully sufficient to purchase a genteel suit of clothes.
Besides, the eastern merchant will always feel a greater
pleasure
in waiting on a customer of genteel exterior, than one in
semi-barbarous costume. He will walk the streets with
the former himself, when it is necessary to conduct him to
other placeswhereas he will send his porter with the
latter. The one passes along pleasantly and
advantageously
,
commanding the respect and attention of those
with whom he may have business to transact; the other is
a mark for the assaults of the low and degraded, who
suppose
his intellects are on a par with his clothes, and
thus he is a thousand times more liable to impositions
and injuries than the first, besides the mortifications and
affronts he meets with from the servants up to the
proprietors
.
But I believe the western merchants are the best judges
of human nature, said the representative from 's
Mills, in my county.
I differ from you, said Elijah.
I know
you
differ from me, retorted the colonel, as
you differ from everybody, and in everything. But give
your reasons.
I have done so, replied Elijah, in the matter of dress.
It is human nature to make as fine an appearance as one's
purse will afford. This is one of the legitimate enjoyments
which wealth places in one's reach. How else can we
enjoy the benefits of money than in eating, drinking, and
wearing good clothes? If a man should keep a large pile
of dollars by him merely to look at, and to guard against its
diminution, his money would then become nothing more than
an expensive jewel, a trinket, and manifestly as ridiculous
an extravagance as is perpetrated by the rich belle who
wears a set of diamonds costing from one to fifty thousand
dollars. It is one of the leading traits of human nature for
a man to strive to excel his neighbor in
appearance;
and
this can be done only by artificial means. It is the
character
of human nature to employ art to attain its ends.
And we may boast as we will of our free and easy
independence
but
there is scarce one of us who does not feel a
conscious inferiority when addressing an eastern man who
is more genteel in his exterior than ourselves. Thus
they are the best judges of human nature in their own
spheres, as we may be in oursand it is nothing more
nor less than brute nature for us to suppose that the rough
garments we wear on the prairies, and behind our counters,
should escape without notice in the cities. No doubt the
shaggy bear they keep at the Zoological Institute, thinks
he cuts as fine a figure in Walnut Street as he did in the
Ozark mountains. It is the nature of the brute.
Then I propose that we are the best politicians, in the
west, said the colonel, smiling.
I differ from you, replied the imperturbable Elijah.
They have more papers, and are better posted in all kinds
of political information. At the same time, I am willing to
admit there is not much honesty or honor among the mere
politicians, anywhere.
Then, perhaps, you won't agree with me that ours is
the best system of government ever instituted on earth?
inquired the colonel, who was a decided politician in
inclination
.
No, I won't! and since you seem to urge it, I'll speak
my sentiments boldly, replied Elijah, with a somewhat
excited visage. The American continent is at present
a vast harvest field, in which there are but comparatively
few laborers. Each one sees the treasure scattered by a
bountiful Providence around him, and he is intent only on
seizing it for his own use. The majority know nothing,
and care less, about the government, at present. But
when the prizes are all appropriated, and the laborers shall
be increased; when the avenues to speedy wealth shall be
blocked up by dense masses, and few only be enabled to
succeed,then they will turn upon the government, and
cast upon it all the blame of their disappointments. They
will devise new governmental schemes to improve their
condition, instead of relying upon their own honest
exertions
for success; they will pull down and set up
institutions
,
and reforms, which can avail them nothing; and
ultimately
arrive at a glorious state of anarchy. If they
succeed
in enriching themselves at the expense of others, then
the veriest democratical demagogues will immediately
become
the most obnoxious aristocrats in the world. This is
human nature, too. But if they fail, which is quite likely,
they will finally get a
Master
.
Do you mean a king? interposed the colonel,
disdainfully
.
Ay, a king, emperor, autocrat, or any other term you
may prefer. He will be, and must be, eventually a
master
.
If the Union should become too unwieldy, it may fall
to piecesbut then they may have a half dozen supreme
potentates, instead of one.
He's joking with you, colonel, said the member from
Independence. If you were to say that a monarchy was
not the natural government for human beings, he would
still differ from you.
Yes, I would differ from him, responded Elijah, very
gravely, while the whole company, the chairman included,
uttered roars of laughter. Yes, I would differ from him,
continued Elijah; and I would produce arguments
deduced
from the history of the world, to prove I was
right. If you believe in scriptural testimony, you will,
upon investigation, find that kings or patriarchal
masters
existed on the earth as far back as you can
penetrate
into the past, and at a time when the great Creator's
direct interposition in the affairs of men was of frequent
occurrence. The long line of Asiatic kings reigned with
the concurrence of the Almighty. Whether in Persia
or Egypt, the calamities He wrought were for the
punishment
of the iniquities of the
men
, and not for the vices
inseparable
from
kings
. He gave kings to the people
himself
,
and they reigned with his express sanction; witness
Saul, Solomon, and David, from whom Jesus, the `king of
the Jews,' and our blessed Mediator and Saviour,
descended
.
If we explore profane history, we have the
same result, viz: the incapacity of dense masses to exist
long without a permanent supreme head or master. Much
is said of Greecebut it produced its Philip and its
Alexander
.
And where there were no kings in name, there
were potentates in reality. Lycurgus was a great man,
but he was uncle to the King of Sparta. The famous
Amphictyonic
confederacy was founded and conducted by
kings, princes, nobles, and military chieftains; and the
union was dissolved in consequence of `geographical
discriminations
,'
and all the tribes were subjugated by the
Macedonian kings. Pisistratus, Miltiades, Themistocles,
Aristides, Pericles, Alcibiades, &c. &c., who are supposed,
by the uninformed, to have been unadulterated Democrats,
hardly accomplished anything when not masters of the
people
,
and exercising almost supreme or sovereign authority.
It is true they had a democracy at Athens, for a brief
space; and then the demagogues and sycophants put
Socrates
to death, because he had the wisdom to detect and
the boldness to expose their corruptions. Then we had the
warfare of the poor against the rich, in great perfection.
Any demagogue who wanted his rich neighbor's property,
had only to fabricate charges against him, and the common
mass, who divided the plunder with the demagogue leaders,
speedily condemned and destroyed him. But the
demagogues
themselves, when they grew rich, intrigued with
monarchs, took their bribes, and betrayed their country, for
the purpose of securing the stability of existing affairs, and of
securing the enjoyment of their revenues, under the strong
protection of a master. It was the same with Rome, and
would have been the same in England. The renowned
Pyms, Hampdens and Sidneys, while so full of patriotism
and republicanism, were the pensioners of Louis XIV.
While Napoleon was a great republican, he did nothing
for France; when he was master, everything. But as he
dealt in blood, in either capacity he was a scourge and a
curseperhaps the instrument of the Almighty to punish
the people for cutting off the head of the good king Louis
XVI. And now they have driven off Charles X., and put
up Louis Philippeperhaps they will drive him off some
day, and try once more the experiment of a republic, again
to result in the ascendency of a military master. They would
have tried a republic the last time the mob was omnipotent,
if it had not been for the influence of La Fayette, the
associate
of our Washingtonwho knew they could not exist
without a masterand they cannot hereafter. If ever the
mob shall succeed in getting up a revolution in Great
Britain
,
it will be for the purpose of plunder, and they will
settle down again with a more absolute master than ever.
We must have a master, too, some of these times, to keep
us from cutting each other's throats, and plundering one
16
another. I think a permanent sovereign head or master
was the design of the great Creator for the regulation of
all communities. In every bee-hive there is a king-bee
and every flock of sheep has its bell-wether. I will relate
a circumstance which contributed to convince me that a
chief directing head would be necessary for our
convenience
and protection. I went with the promiscuous
multitude
once to witness an illumination of the old State House
in Philadelphia. The street was crammed and jammed,
and all who got within seeing distance, remained
immovably
there, while three-fourths of the people could see
nothing of it at allto say nothing of the bruises, black
eyes, torn dresses, and the other indispensable
accompaniments
of an inconsiderate mob. The people were like a
flock of buffaloes in the wild prairie; they gored and
trampled
upon each other to no purpose. Now if there had
been a master, we should have been compelled to act
differently
,
and the affair would have terminated much more
to our satisfaction. In Europe, on such occasions, the
master will have the masses to go up on one side and down
on the other: by such means a million can see a sight as
well as a thousand, and there can never occur any violent
collisions in the operation. And, say what you may about
royalty, it is an ineradicable trait of human nature to desire
gorgeous ceremonies and magnificent pageantries. We
will grow weary of our plain habits before the end comes.
Music and diamonds, crowns and sceptres, titles and
distinctions
,
will have their attractions for the multitude here,
as well as elsewhere. Even this boat bears the name of a
young princess, who will probably be a reigning monarch
in a few years. We have boats named Napoleon, Louis
Philippe, Lady Washington, Lady Jackson, &c. We are
progressing. `Progressive democracy' never pauses until
it completes the circle, and returns to monarchy.
The chairman, and of course every person present, not
excepting myself, pronounced against Elijah, this time.
Your
decision, gentlemen, said Sage, can amount
to nothing. I want the decision of your
grandchildren
.
CHAPTER VIII.
Thus
the time was passed during the voyage, without
any incident of special importance. I must not omit to
mention one circumstance, however, which surprised me.
When we reached Pittsburgh, I beheld, among the deck
passengers, with his deer-skin trunk on his own shoulder,
and in the act of stepping on shore, my Jew competitor,
Moses!
Is it possible you are here, Moses? said I, coming up
with him as he trudged along the wharf.
To pe sure it's me, said he.
What, have you removed your store from Hanover?
No inteet! exclaimed he, chuckling; I'm going on
for goots.
But whom have you left behind to sell those you have on
hand? I inquired, never having seen any partner or clerk
in his store, nor having had any intimation of his purpose
to go east.
I left a mana goot man in my blace. He is von of
my bartners, from down te river, said he, in a whisper.
Why he lowered his tone, I could not conjecture, for all
who were nigh us at that moment were strangers, and
besides
,
the drays vibrated about us like muttering thunder.
But you did not intend to go east until very recently,
did you?
Yes inteetI vanted to go a month sooner, put vanted
you to start first.
And why did you want me to start first?
Because ve never vant our combetitors to know anyting
apout our movementsve alvays ket te atvandage py tat
bolicy.
But you gained nothing by it this time? said I,
triumphantly
.
Yes I dit, said he, quickly. You pait dwenty
tollar
bassage to dis blaceI pait only vive. I prung Palogna
sassengers and grackers in my chest, and bait a voman
dwo shilling for all my coffee.
Do you always take a deck passage, Moses?
Oh, no. Sometimes I go in te capin, and dake my
chest of jewerly to beddle onput dis time I saw you dere,
and den dook teck bassage. But dere were more teckers
dan capin men, tis dime.
And did you make anything out of the deckers?
Te goots I solt on te bassage, (his jumble of Dutch
and Welsh increasing as he became more animated,) gost
me vorty tollardey prought me von huntret and tirty.
My pusiness is to pe alvays at pusiness, everyvere. On
te steampoats dey ton't make us bay licenze.
I turned away from Moses with rather unpleasant
fore-bodings
for the future. How was it possible for me to
contend with such a competitor? My only hope lay in
the fact that the Jews were proverbially a restless, roving
class, and that Moses might, perhaps, soon find a better
location than Hanover. If he should not go from Hanover,
I determined that I would remove to some point in the
interior
,
where Elijah had informed me the Jews rarely
intruded
.
The Shylocks prefer to be on the navigable streams,
where it is always convenient for them to take passage for
parts unknown, should their necessities or inclinations
render it expedient for them to do so.
In due course of travel, we reached Philadelphia, and
put up at the City Hotel, Third street above Market. Most
of the Missourians stopped there at that time. Moses was
not of our company. I had not seen him since parting
with him on the wharf at Pittsburgh. It was probable he
was peddling on foot on the highway to the east.
Now I was in a new sphere, and everything I beheld
was novel to my delighted eyes. It was true I was born
in a neighboring city; but, as I had left it when only six
years of age, I had lost all remembrance of it. There may
have been indistinct memories of long streets, church spires,
and ship masts; but they seemed like the dim visions of
early dreams. Now, all I beheld was reality, and I seemed
to gaze upon another worlda bright and happy one. And
even at this day, though I have grown familiar with all its
streets, places, and with hundreds of its people; and although
I have walked the streets of most of the cities of our Union,
and of the great cities of Europe, still, whenever chance or
business takes me back to Philadelphia, I always enjoy a
renewed realization of my first transports, and set it down,
without hesitation or reservation, as the most beautiful, the
most cleanly, and the most pleasant city in the universe.
I entered in the night, the last city I had seen being sombre
Pittsburgh. The next morning the sun had risen in splendor
in a clear sky. There was an exhilaration in the air, there
was a cheerful expression in the faces of the men, and
something like the freshness of angelic beauty in the
delicate
features of the women. Such were my impressions
16*
thenand these impressions have not been wholly dispelled
by the lapse of time.
I must not omit to state here a very interesting fact.
Although I could not remember anything I had seen at the
age of six years, I could distinctly remember what I had
tasted. The first plate of oysters I devoured,
notwithstanding
I had not even seen any since I was a child, had as
familiar a taste to me as though I had eaten them the day
before.
It was Saturday night when we arrived; and when the
church bells were rung the next morning, it seemed to me
that I recognized the sound. I went to St. Peter's. This
was the first time I ever heard the service of the Episcopal
Church. Whether it was the knowledge that Blanche
preferred
that church that inclined me to go thither, or mere
chance that directed my steps, is now a matter of no
consequence
whatever: but that the imposing solemnity of the
ceremonies, the beauty of the Litany, and the spiritual
expositions
of the minister, made impressions on my heart
and mind which have never since been removed, and
which I hope will never be eradicated, is a truth of more
importance to me. When the sermon was over, I mingled
with the retiring congregation as I returned up Third Street.
Then the debates we had on the steamer, as we descended
the broad Mississippi, occurred to me, and I felt a
considerable
degree of mortification, when I contrasted my
threadbare apparel with the very neat clothes of all the
young men around me. The next morning before
breakfast
,
acting upon the hints I had received, I set out in quest
of a new suit, ready made, not wishing to endure the delay
of being measured by a tailor. At that time, establishments
where ready made clothes could be purchased, were few
and far between, and I was reluctantly compelled at last
to deal with a Jew. At the present time we find clothing
houses as plenty as blackberries, with Christian proprietors.
And why not keep ready made coats, &c., as well as boots,
hats, bonnets, &c.?
After breakfast, I set out in company with Elijah Sage,
for whose sagacity I had conceived a profound respect,
although
I condemned his notions about royalty. We first
entered the hardware house of Y. S. & K., where, following
Elijah's example, I deposited my money, to guard against
the light-fingered gentry, as they are mildly termed.
I did not askmy timidity and bashfulness sealing my
tongueif there was a letter for me from Norfolk. One
was handed me from Joseph, post marked Pike Bluff, where
an office had been established; but I held it unopened in
my hand, while Mr. S. looked over the large number that
had arrived for the western merchants. On perceiving
the direction of my eyes, he announced that no other
letter
had come for me. No doubt I was pale. I was so
agitated by this disappointment, that my hand trembled
violently, and after making one or two awkward and
ineffectual
efforts to open Joseph's letter, I withdrew rather
precipitately and returned alone to my room at the hotel.
Joseph's letter contained a proposition, similar to the one
he had made his partners, when he had visited the city the
year before. His terms were reasonable, and I embraced
them. I then became sole proprietor of the store in
Hanover
.
Isaac was to remain with me, while Joseph was to
write to Kentucky for
another
brother. Poor brothers in
our family were not useless appendages. If there had
been twenty of us, it would have been all the better in the
end.
This letter I replied to without delay, and then set out
in the direction of the dry-goods houses, and left my letter
of reply in the counting room of R. & Co., a celebrated
establishment, whence it was sent with their own letters to
the post-office. I informed them of the nature of its
contents
,
and as they approved of my determination, and
readily proposed selling both myself and Joseph whatever
goods we wanted, I felt like one fully initiated into all the
privileges and immunities of a regularly established
western
merchant. The
imprimatur
of several of the leading
houses was sufficient. It was a common saying that the
man to whom they would sell at all, needed no special
recommendation to be enabled to get goods, on time, from
any of the other firms along the street. But it will be seen,
in the sequel, that some of these houses, in their eagerness
to follow in the wake of the old leading establishments, were
destined, in river parlance, to run against a snag.
Having, in the course of a fortnight, completed my
purchases
,
collected most of my bills, and distributed my
money, I began to make arrangements to set out on my
return
,
not without many pangs at the thought that I had no
intelligence from Norfolk. I was walking slowly down
Market street, on the north side, where the noon-day sun of
March imparted a warmth, almost as inspiriting as our
Missouri sun (which has not
quite
an equal anywhere in the
world), when Mr. S. called me into his counting-room and
placed a sealed epistle in my hand. Its wax was stamped
with the impression of a dove, holding an olive or some
other kind of leaf in its beak, and underneath was the motto
Hope on. The superscription was in the hand of Blanche.
How I felt it would be in vain for me to attempt to describe.
How I looked, no doubt Mr. S. could telland I believe he
did
tell.
That's from your brother, is it? he asked; perhaps
he sends some news from the west? I hesitated, and he
continued, I did not observe the post-markperhaps it's
not from him. I beg your pardon. I tried to make some
careless observation in reply, but could notthe
half-conceived
idea dying upon my tongue. I grew more and more
embarrassed, and putting the letter hastily in my pocket,
retreated
in confusion to my room. Even when I was alone,
with my door locked against intruders, my perturbation
was slow to abate. I seemed to be suspended in air, while
the tumult and commotion in my breast almost bereaved
me of my senses. At last I asked myself the question
what it all meant. Was I deliriously in love? Even with
all these symptoms about me, I was not fully aware of the
true depth of my passion. I was conscious of the deep
interest
inspired by Blanche, and of my affection for her;
but I did not know that it could subject me to such excesses.
Yet I remembered what a flurry all her letters had produced
in my head and veins; and hence it was some time before
I ventured to open her letter. If the mere sight of it had
thrown me into such spasms, perhaps its perusal might be
more than I could safely bear. So I spent several minutes
in conjecturing its contents, and determining in my mind
what I should do, provided she said this or that. Finally,
I broke it open, and here is every word it contained.
Norfolk
,
March 11th, 183-.
Luke
, if you come to see me, remember it is merely
the careless passing visit of a friend. There is a
Methodist
meeting house near the  hotel, in which they are
holding a protracted meeting. If you follow a merry little
old woman (you will know her by her shouting in the
meeting
house) to her broading-house, you will find me. My
uncle is here, and might be harsh if he met you. Should
you meet, you must not resent anything he may say, and
above all, have no hostile collision with him. You must
register a promise in heaven to do as I bid, before starting
hitherward; else you have not my permission to come.
Remember
Blanche
.
Upon reading this, the fire of my passion was somewhat
quenched. I did not float on a sea of bliss. In short, I
could not clearly define its exact import. Merely a
passing
visit! Why, Norfolk was some two hundred miles
out of my way! Such a visit, under such circumstances,
would be rather an unusual step for merely careless
friends. But still it was suggested at that time by Blanche.
I thought I understood the caution in regard to her uncle,
and I must own that I felt no disposition to have a hostile
collision with him. It was the last word of the epistle that
bothered me most. There was no mark of punctuation at
the end of Remember, which was followed immediately
by Blanche. The interpretations and readings of
Malvolio
occurred to me more than once as I strove to find her
meaning. It might be that she designed to impress more
forcibly her injunction in regard to her fiery uncle; or it
might relate to the promise she required me to record in
heaven: in this case it would be a strange expression, unless
it was to be considered in the category of lovers' vows,
for promises merely of friendship are generally supposed
to take a contrary direction; and then it might mean for
me to
remember Blanche
. That was the most congenial
interpretation; and to forget her was altogether out of the
question. Among a variety of conflicting conjectures the
latter meaning seemed to have preponderance, and so I
resolved
,
in obedience to the magnetic attraction which drew
me thitherward, to set out for the south the next morning.
During the passage, I formed a thousand romantic and
precautionary schemes to see Blanche without encountering
her terrible uncle. But they were all dispelled as we
rounded Old Point, and were assailed by a violent storm.
I became horribly ill, and it must be admitted that once
I wished myself back again in Philadelphia, whither I
had promised to return before departing for the west.
If the reader has ever been made ill by the motion of the
waves at sea, I need not apologize to him for
forgetting
,
during a brief interval, the attractions of Blanche.
This kind of illness is a most prompt and effectual cure of
love. Let any one who desires to be cured, or to cure
others, try the experiment; and if it does not prove to be
a perfect remedy, then I may be set down as never being
in love, and a mere impostor, instead of a
bon fide
victim
of Cupid's shafts. To those who have never ventured on
the realms of old Neptune, any farther explanation might
be incomprehensible.
The sun was declining low in the west when we entered the
mouth of the James river, and the vast expanse of troubled
waters was beautifully gilded with its last golden rays.
When we landed, it was not difficult for me to find the hotel
indicated in the letter, and thither I had my trunk (which
should have been left in Philadelphia), conveyed. My name
and place of residence were engraven on the plate of my
trunk, and so the barkeeper immediately transcribed it
literally
on the register, which lay open on the counter,
exposed
to the gaze of every one whose curiosity might lead
him to read it.
After tea I walked out in quest of the church that had
been named; and after some search succeeded in finding it.
There was no farther impediment to the realization of my
desires, excepting the services, which seemed to be
particularly
long drawn out, with scarcely a particle of
sweetness
to one of my impatience. But there was an end of this
suspense, as there must be of all things, and I followed my
unconscious guide to the place of her abode. I waited a few
moments, after the door closed behind her, before I rang the
bell. When I did ring, I was ushered in by a colored female
servant, whom I had never seen before of course, but who, to
my inexpressible surprise, exclaimed, Iz dis Massa
Short-field
?
I promptly told her it was, and she as promptly
conducted me to the parlor door; and with an expressive
smile, which disclosed two faultless rows of ivory, made a
motion for me to enter. I did so, and she closed the door
behind me and retreated. I stood in a flood of light,
emitted
by a capacious lamp on the centre-table. But the
spirit of light herself, (if it be not profanation so to express
myself,) the indubitable Blanche, stood before me. For a
moment we both might have seemed to be stricken blind,
and in our very awkward attempts to consummate a hearty
shake of the hand, we came nigh perpetrating a more
delicate
encounter. At length, when mutual consciousness
returned, we found ourselves standing face to face, and
speechless, like a brace of idiots. I held her by one hand,
and she held me by the other, while we gazed deeply in
each other's eyes. Finally, her cheeks, which had been
as white as her snowy dress, assumed the deepest dye that
a rush of blood could give it, and at the same instant mine
began to burn and tingle. We relaxed our grasps, and sat
down. Again, like simpletons, we did little more, for
many precious moments, than gaze at each other. When
we parted last, I was but a stripling, and Blanche a mere
girl, a few months my senior. She was now a graceful,
stately womanher form, of perfect symmetry, fully
developed
while
her dress, adapted to the fashion of the day,
was so contrived as to exhibit her faultless proportions
to the best advantage. I now felt an awe, an exceeding
reserve in her presence, that I had never before
experienced
.
She perceived my surprise and embarrassment, and
a lurking smile indicated the pleasure she felt on producing
such an effect. For my own part, I also had somewhat
changed. I had grown much taller, and now could pass
muster for a man. I had also paid especial attention to
my exterior accoutrements, and was dressed in the latest
style. My voice, too, had changed from the squeaking
notes of the goslin to the full intonation of the gander.
All this did not seem to be offensive to her
nevertheless
,
the free, unreserved manner of her girlhood was gone.
She did not term me simply Lukeit was now
Mr.
Shortfield
. Nor could I shape my tongue to utter simply
Blancheit was
Miss Blanche
, though not Miss
Beaufort.
I will not detail the conversation which passed between
us, simply for the reason that I do not remember a word that
was uttered. But the ideas that were conveyed, and the
sentiments expressed, as well by the tongue as those
unuttered
by the eyes, can never be obliterated from memory.
She was glad to see meto see that I had improved; and
hoped I would be successful in every undertaking, and that
we would continue to be friends, and meet againbut never
said a word about love. Nor did I, nor could I for worlds
have made a declaration in words. But no doubt every
look, every motion betrayed my passionwhile she
disclosed
enough to satisfy me that I was anything rather than
indifferent to her. When I told her I would travel to the
east again in about a year, she made no hesitation in
proposing
that I should again visit her, and promised that she
would direct a line to me in the same manner as the last,
17
informing me of the place of her abode. All this was a
dangerous procedure for merely passing friends, but
neither of us seemed to be aware of the consequences
likely to ensue. We were preparing a theme to occupy
our thoughts for a twelvemonth and a day, which would
grow more interesting the more it was dwelt upon.
It was eleven o'clock when I prepared to depart. When
I rose Blanche rose too, and extended her hand, which,
for want of sufficient confidence, I did not press. I
suppose
we stood nearly an hour. Both of us seemed to
have found our speech at parting, with a vengeance. But
still we did not talk of love by name; we only breathed
under its overwhelming influence. Knowing her
devotion
to the Church, I had bought her a beautiful
prayer-book
;
and when I presented it, she presented me with a
still more beautiful one. She was delighted to hear that I
had been pleased with the church servicesand I was
rejoiced
to hear her animated expressions of approval. At
last we parted, but not without an agreement that I should
take a final leave of her in the morning, before setting out
on my return to the north.
That night I dwelt among the cherubim and seraphim in
my dreams, with an occasional damper to my visions in
the interposing form of an evil geniusthe dreaded uncle,
whom I had really never seen. The next morning, when
I met Blanche according to appointment, there seemed to
be an expression of care, if not of sadness, visible on her
features. Certainly the red of the preceding evening had
succumbed to the prevailing white again. And when we
shook hands for the last time, I might have perceived a
lurking moisture in her eyes, had there not been too much
of a mist in my own.
I had not been long in my room at the hotel, before a
servant opened my door, and said a gentleman in the parlor
below wished to see me. I walked down, and beheld a
stranger walking backwards and forwards in the room
indicated
,
which I entered. I sat down on a sofa, waiting
for him to address me, if he was the one who desired to
see me. The servant had not announced my name, being
called away before we reached the door, and I began to
reflect whether the gentleman before me, who was very
composedly surveying my exterior at every turn he made,
was the individual who had desired my presence there, and
who he was, what he wanted, &c. I now began to gaze
at him. He was about fifty years of age, tall, straight,
neatly dressed, and every point and motion indicating the
high-bred gentleman. At last he paused and rang a bell,
the string of which hung down at the mantle-piece, near
which I was sitting. The servant I had just seen appeared,
bowing and apologizing. I did not hear the words that
passed; but when the servant retired, the gentleman
approached
the place where I sat, and after a renewed scrutiny
of a few moments, thus spoke:
You are Mr. Shortfield, I believe, whose arrival
yesterday
I find on the register of this hotel?
The same, sir, at your service, I replied, returning
his inquisitive gaze. He seemed to be somewhat astonished
at the promptitude of my reply, and the anticipatory
phraseology
of it. But it must have pleased him, as he relaxed
the severity of his expression, and assumed an air of polished
politeness and profound respect.
Who I am, and the nature of my business with you, sir,
will be expressed in a note, which a friend I have in the
next room will deliver to you.
Saying this, he bowed, and withdrew. He had not been
gone more than five minutes, before his friend came in,
holding the note specified in his hand.
I have the honor to deliver this note for my friend,
Mr. Beaufort!
said he, seating himself, in accordance
with my invitation, on the sofa.
I was stricken with the rigidity of a polar blast. I could
hardly close my fingers on the epistle he placed in my
hand. He marked my consternation; but not desiring, by
the sudden prostration of my nerves, to have any good sport
spoiled, he strove to encourage me when I had run my
eye over the contents of the note, which ran thus:
Sir
In violation of the expressed desire of my brother,
you have persisted in addressing letters to my niece; you
have not only done that, but you have had the
presumption
to seek and obtain a clandestine interview with her.
Being her next of kin, and natural protector, I deem it
incumbent
on me to demand, in this formal manner, the
satisfaction
which one gentleman has a right to require of another
(and which no gentleman can refuse), for such an intrusive
disregard of the wishes expressed by my brother, and
endorsed
by myself.
My friend, Col. S., will arrange the preliminaries with
the friend you may be pleased to select to officiate in your
behalf.
I am, sir, with all due consideration, your obedient
servant
,
E. Beaufort
.
It is a mere bagatelle, of frequent occurrence, said
Col. S.; very seldom is any harm done. Have you any
acquaintances in the city?
No, said I.
No matter, he continued; any gentleman will act
in your behalf, and with perfect honor. I have only to
hint at the circumstance among some high-toned
gentlemen
,
and either of them will tender his services.
This is a matter, said I, my thoughts being now
somewhat better collected, requiring grave consideration.
I must reflect upon it. I will give you my answer an hour
hence.
Very well, sir, said he, rising; I will be punctual.
He withdrew, and I retired to my room.
When alone, I was, very naturally, filled with
indescribable
emotions, and of course they are not to be described.
But it was necessary for me to make up my mind what
should be done in the premises. What I would
not
do,
was already resolved. I did not intend to fightthat was
certain. I now thought seriously of the region above, to
which I mentally appealed, as the depository of my sacred
promise. I felt that I could
die
for Blanche; but she had
considerately debarred me from
fighting
for herand I am
bold to say, that it did not enter into my meditations to
commit a breach of promise on that occasion. I wanted
an adviserbut I desired one specially to indicate the
means of avoiding the gentlemanly entertainment to which
I had been invited. I knew no one in Norfolk, at all
much less one in whose hands I could feel inclined to place
my life. So I determined to have it exclusively in my
own keeping. But still I felt an inclination to get out of
the scrape in a genteel manner, if that were possible. While
I was painfully engaged in trying to devise some means by
which this object might be accomplished, I was ever and
anon interrupted by the entrance of the grinning Pompey,
who placed card after card on my table, and stated that
the gentlemen were the first characters in the place, and
that they were all below, perusing the newspapers, and
awaiting my pleasure.
17*
This state of disagreeable suspense and conjecture,
mingled
with the production of a constant succession of new
cards, continued for some minutes, when it occurred to me
that there really was one gentleman residing in the city,
with whose name and fame I, in common with the whole
country, east and west, was acquainted. Although I had
never seen him, I resolved to apply to him for advice, and
so I dispatched to him the following note:
Dear Sir
I am at No. 6,  hotel, an entire stranger,
and have received a challenge from Mr. E. Beaufort to
meet him in mortal combat. I have never seen Mr.
Beaufort
before to-day, and certainly never insulted or injured
him. If you will consent to give me the benefit of your
advice in the premises, I will avail myself of the opportunity
to relate all the circumstances of the case to you.
Respectfully, your obedient servant,
Luke Shortfield
.
Mr. T. received my note politely, and accompanied the
bearer back to my room. By this time fifty minutes of the
prescribed hour had fled. When Mr. T. was seated, I
mentioned
the fact to him, and he paused a moment to reflect
what should be done, during which time I took occasion to
look at him. He was of Herculean frame, with a large head;
all the features of his face remarkably prominent, and all
bearing the marks of extraordinary intelligence. He was
a giant in intellect, and thought only as a giant.
Write the words down that I shall dictate, said he;
write them with a pencil on the back of this card.
Saying
this, he handed me one from his pocket. Now write
`
I am consulting with the gentleman whose name is on this
cardwhen I am done, you shall hear from me again. L. S.
'
Now, sir, continued he, with dignified emphasis, give
me frankly and fully the details of this affair.
I did so in few wordsbut he seemed to comprehend the
whole case before I was half through with my narration.
I see it all, said he, his features relaxing into a smile;
I see the whole length and breadth of it. And, young
man, I must inform you that my sympathies are on the side
of Beaufort. His is a family with a history to it. It may
be traced back some generations, without finding any of its
members descending below a certain level. I do not know
anything about you, and I suppose Beaufort is as ignorant
of your stock as I am; but it is not a name that one can
be familiar with at the mere mention of it. I have
daughters
myselfand nothing could offend me more grossly,
or injure me more deeply, than for some Mr. Nobody to
attempt to form an alliance with my family. But as you
have paid me the compliment to select me as an adviser
in the present matter, I will give you my counsel. If
you do not wish to meet Mr. Beaufort, I will get you off
with honor. But if you were to fight him, it is my
impression
,
judging from your genteel appearance, that he
would like you well enough to consent to the match at
some future time.
But he might kill me, or . Here he interrupted
me by a fit of uncontrollable laughter, and then exclaimed:
Pardon mepardon my rude interruption; it was caused
by a mere fancy of my own, and should not have been
suggested
by your ingenuous expression. You were proceeding
in a deliberate course of ratiocination, very natural to a
brave man in your circumstances, and my interference was
rude and unmannerly. Pardon it, and proceed.
Or, I continued, I might kill him.
That places you
rectus in curi
, said he.
In either event, I proceeded, an irreparable act will
have been committed. If I fall, I shall have no need for
his consent; if he falls, he cannot give it; and in either
case, the match, should such a thing be in contemplation,
would certainly not be consummated.
That is well argued, replied the distinguished
individual
and
this whole business of duelling, except in
cases of peculiar aggravation, is but a vestige of barbarian
nonsense. But am I to infer that there is no `match' in
`contemplation?'
I should have informed you of it, decidedly. Nothing
of the kind has been proposed by me, or entertained by
Blanche. We were schoolmates, and contracted a friendship
which has not subsided with subsequent years. We have
kept up a friendly correspondence at long intervals; and
this is the only visit I have made her since we first parted.
We have not uttered a word about love or marriage.
Pooh! nonsense! said he, interrupting me again; you
may not possibly be aware of it, to its full extent; but you
may take my word for it, that you are deeply, inextricably
in love with each other, and will continue to be, perhaps,
until death parts you. But, as you say you have no
disposition
to be killed in a duel
Or to kill her uncle, said I.
Trueyou said that, too, and in time, he continued,
smilingand as you do not propose to carry off your
lady-love at this time, and will probably be absent a whole
yearduring which time one of you, that is, one of the
three, may be removed by disease, in which event the
difficulty
would be obviatedI think the best course to be
pursued
is to postpone the whole matter for a twelvemonth.
But, said I, can you devise a feasible plan to
accomplish
such a result? Mr. B. demands satisfaction
peremptorily
and immediately.
To be sure I can devise a plan, said he, taking up a
pen to compose a reply for me to the message.
While he was writing, Pompey came in with a note for
me. It was from Blanche. She wrote as follows:
Luke
:The servant who hands you this, belongs to
me, and has informed me that my uncle has challenged
you to mortal combat. He says he heard my uncle tell
his friends that he liked your appearance so much, he was
almost sorry that he had quarreled with you, and that if
you behaved well on the field, he would tender you his
friendship, after an exchange of shots, which he hoped
might have no serious result. Now, Luke, are you
willing
to fight for me? You have never said you desired to
have me, nor I that I was at your service. I desire it to
be distinctly understood by you, as it is sufficiently by
him, that I am not at the disposal of my uncle. I am of
age, and am my own mistress. My uncle is kind to me
in my presence, and never seeks to control my actions.
Should I make an unworthy alliance, the worst thing he
could do, or would have a desire to attempt, would be to
abandon my society. You now understand the relation in
which we stand. I do not, however, wish to break with
my uncle. He is generous, brave, and magnanimous; and
of course it would wound me past recovery if you, my
friend, should slay him in a duel. Thus you see that, by
acceding to his proposition, to obtain his friendship, you
would lose mine. Of that you may be assured. If you
resolve to meet him, I resolve never to see you again. You
must choose between him and me. But if you determine
to accede to my request, and depart without a collision with
him, you have my promise that, at a future day, should
it be your pleasure, you can see me again, unchanged
in every particular.
Blanche
.
I handed this epistle to Mr. T., who read it while I
indited
a brief reply. I stated in my note, that it had never
been my intention to fight her uncleand that it was now
my irrevocable determination not to do so. But that if any
rival
aspired to her hand, and sought to deprive me of her
friendship and esteem, then life would not only be of no
value to me, but an intolerable burden, which I would be
desirous of getting rid of at his hands. I ventured to say
that.
May I also read your reply? asked Mr. T., laying
down the note he had been reading. I handed it to him,
and observed a slight frown on his brow as he perused the
concluding lines. He said nothing, however; but taking
up his pen, finished the reply to the challenge he had been
composing for me.
Copy this, and send it to him, said he. It will be
sufficient. I am going across the bay this morning. Good
morning, sir. And so he took leave of me and withdrew.
The following was the reply to the challenge which he
prepared for me.
Sir
:I have the honor to acknowledge the receipt of
your note of this morning. In reply, I have to state that,
inasmuch as no definite proposal has been made by me to
your niece, and as my engagements will demand my
unintermitting
presence at a point some two thousand miles
distant from this, for at least a year to come, I must
decline
the meeting you demand, at least for the present.
Should fortune bring me again in the vicinity of your niece,
at some future day, and it should then be your pleasure to
renew the demand, that will be the proper time for me to
announce my final decision.
Very respectfully,
Your obedient servant,
L. S.
That short reply did the business. Its contents, when
made known to those who had been informed of the pending
affair, seemed to be satisfactory. The gentlemen who had
so kindly tendered their services to officiate in my behalf,
as well as the other party, soon dispersed, and my
departure
from the place, as may well be expected, was not long
delayed.
As the steamer ran down the river, I could not avoid
felicitating myself on my lucky escape. When we touched
at Old Point, I found a rumor was in circulation that the
meeting had taken place, and I was asked by one of the
gentlemen on the wharf if Mr. Shortfield had expired on
the field, or died afterwards at the hotel. That I was dead,
seemed to be a matter of certainty. I merely replied that
I had not been informed of the occurrence at all. The
questioner only stared at me incredulously.
When I reached Baltimore, I found my death
announced
in the papers, and moreover ascertained that I
had disabled my antagonist, by shattering his pistol-arm.
When I arrived in Philadelphia, the papers had it that
we were both mortally wounded; and when I entered the
stores of my acquaintances in Market Street, they stared at
me as if I was a ghost. But the one who seemed to be the
most astonishedin fact, rather disappointedwas my old
friend Moses, whom I met at one of the principal dry-goods
houses. I lost no time in assuring the newspaper men
that I was alive and wellbut they hesitated to contradict
the false report, because, as they alleged, I was a stranger
to them, and might be imposing on them with an interested
and partial version of the affair. I deemed it a most
outrageous
thing to find my name in all the paperscoupled
with every variety of stigma for suffering myself to be
killedwhen I was alive. I was contented, however, to
enjoy the reality of life, and had no desire to interfere with
the business of the reporters.
CHAPTER IX.
I have
said that I met with Moses, the Jew. One of the
Market Street men, seeing his goods were marked for
Hanover
,
my place of business, asked me some questions about
him. When I had given him all the information I possessed,
he remarked that he had not inquired with any view to
make Moses a customer. He made it a rule never to
trust western Jews. Moses had paid him for the goods
he bought, which, packed in two boxes, were standing
on the pavement before the door. He said that he had
supposed Moses was a Jew, although his language and
dress were in exact imitation of the thorough-bred
western
merchant; and upon putting the question to him directly,
had forced him to make an affirmative reply; and he then
declined selling him anything on credit. But Moses had
insisted on buying his goods, and had paid the money for
them.
All this surprised me. Why had Moses attempted to
conceal the fact of his being a true Israelite? Why had
he bought goods of a house which refused to sell him on
time? I could not then divine his motive, but suspected
there was some design in itand so did the merchant
alluded to. But neither of us had anything to do with the
designs of others; so we agreed to let the matter drop, and
attend to our own business.
The next day I started westward, in company with a
number of western men. After being overturned once or
twice in the mountains, without sustaining further injury
than a few contusions, we reached Pittsburgh on the third or
fourth day. When we stopped at the door of the hotel,
who should jump down from the driver's box, whip in hand,
but the ubiquitous Moses! In the character of an itinerant
peddler, he had learned the use of the whip, and had made,
an arrangement to drive the coach through to Pittsburgh,
so that he would have no passage money to pay.
In the afternoon we were descending the beautiful Ohio,
on the new steamer Flora McIvorthe name of the
heroine who pitied and protected Prince Charles Edward,
the fugitive Stuart, and Pretender to the British throne.
The sun beamed brightly on the clear gliding stream, (after
we had emerged from the cloud of dark smoke hanging
like a pall over the city,) and we enjoyed the refreshing
breeze as we sat on the boiler deck. Again I was doomed
to meet my evil genius, Moses, who was now transformed
into a book peddler (he would not hesitate to peddle this
work, and to inform the purchaser that he was the identical
Moses described in it), and seemed to be making expenses.
The most of the time was spent, on our return, in the
examination of invoices. We compared them with each
other, (being mostly from different locations,) and although
the qualities of many of the articles could not be ascertained,
yet from our knowledge of the market we were enabled to
form a very correct idea of the extra per cent. put on by
some of the jobbers. And I noticed that when any one of
our party ascertained he had been charged less for an article
than his neighbors, he boasted of it, as an indication of his
18
superior judgment, rather than an evidence of the extortion
of the seller. It frequently occurred that the old regular
houses had charged a shade higher for leading staple goods,
the value of which we all knew, than their more modern
competitors. But in most instances, when there was a
material
difference in price discovered, the comparison was
rather against the latter. Yet we thought the greatest
disparity
existed in the New York bills, and always to the
disadvantage of the inexperienced purchaser. And it was
ascertained that where a bill had been made with an
irregular
Jew house, the poor silly victim had been skinned
alive. This habit of examination and comparison on the
part of the western merchants, is still kept up, and is a
capital mode of ascertaining the relative merits of eastern
houses.
We were all some two weeks ahead of our goods.
Getting
them to Pittsburgh was a tedious process, as they
had to be conveyed most of the way in wagons. The
charges to Pittsburgh were from two and a half to five
dollars
per hundred pounds. Now, they can be taken from
Philadelphia, during most seasons, to the utmost bounds of
civilization in the far west, for about two dollars the
hundred
pounds. It was not important that I should get home
before my goods arrived. My brother was at Hanover, and
was entirely qualified to manage the establishment, with
its reduced stock of goods, during my absence. So I
determined
to spend a short time in Kentucky, at my former
home. When I landed at a village on the river, for the
purpose
of going into the interior, I was surprised to find that
so many of the passengers of the Flora McIvor had parents
and sisters and brothers in Kentucky. Their situations were
similar to my own, and they availed themselves of the
interval
required to bring up their goods, to visit the homes of
their childhood. This circumstance explains why there
were so many more marriageable males than females in
Missouri, and indeed in all the new states. The young
men set out to seek their fortunes, leaving their sisters
behind
.
When the new countries become civilized, then the
girls go out. But the scarcity of the commodity at the
early stages of settlement, certainly affords any enterprising
girl a capital opportunity of making an advantageous
speculation in the matrimonial line. They are in better
demand in the new states than elsewhere; and I have
frequently
known them to marry immediately after going
thither, even several years after they had arrived at the age
of despair at home. I state a notorious fact, which merits
the attention of the redundant female population in the
east.
I proceeded without delay to the home of my childhood,
and entered my mother's humble house unannounced and
unexpected, for I had not informed her of my purpose of
going thither. But nevertheless I was not the less welcome.
I had the parent's kiss, and saw the tear of joyful affection
glitter on her aged cheek. My father had several years
before been consigned to the tomb. He had collected
around his couch those of his family who were in the
vicinity, whom he blessed, and leaving his blessing for
those who were absent, he departed in peacea happy,
confiding Christian. But before his eyes were closed, he
had spoken most impressively of the just ways of
Providence
,
while a smile of triumph beamed upon his face.
My mother remembered his words, and repeated them to
me, as follows: My dear children, you all know that I was
once rich in this world's goods, and now am poor. You
all know that I have endeavored to discharge the duties of
a faithful and consistent Christian; and yet misfortune fell
upon me, and scattered to distant quarters most of those I
loved and cherished. More than half of them are now
absent, while I am upon my dying bed. What see you in
all this? Do you think I have been hardly dealt with by
my Heavenly Father, whom I have tried faithfully to serve?
Do not think so. I die happy. I behold his goodness
with a grateful heart. Had I died possessed of the fortune
I once held, I doubt not every member of my family would
have been still under my roof, wholly dependent upon my
little wealth for their future subsistence, and disqualified to
take care of themselves after my removal. Were it so,
the consciousness of that fact would trouble my last
moments
with pangs of anxiety, and misgivings for their
future welfare. But now, since you have been taught to
rely upon yourselves, under the guidance of the Eternal
Disposer of events, for the means of future enjoyment, I
have no cares on that head. I have letters from those who
are absent, stating the amount of wealth they have each
realized, and I have made an estimate of the means of
those present. These amounts, added together, make a
much larger sum than I ever possessed. Thus you see the
kindness of God, and his superior wisdom in providing for
those who put their trust in him. What we were disposed
to regard as a very great evil, proves to be a very great
blessing. The loss of my wealth has resulted in a most
fortunate event, instead of being a permanent misfortune,
as you were too apt to regard it. Let this circumstance,
or rather the lesson it inculcates, have an abiding-place in
your minds. Be faithful, confiding Christians, and leave
the rest to Him who knows all your wants and necessities
better than you know them yourselves. And when
misfortunes
shall comeand come they willstill, oh, still
trust in God, and murmur not! If you be true and
faithful
,
no earthly event can deprive you of an adequate share
of happiness in this life. And remember that the darkest
hours, in our worldly affairs, are often but the precursors
of brighter days. So I counsel you never to despair when
disasters seem to encompass you. We do not abide here
long, and we can take nothing with us. When we go
hence, we can have no use for any of the objects or
enjoyments
of this world. We go to mansions provided for our
eternal abode, prepared by the great Creator for those who
obey him. And so he passed away, without a struggle,
without a sigh, like an infant falling asleep.
For several days I wandered about the village and its
vicinity, visiting the haunts of my early days. But this visit
was one of sadness rather than of pleasure. The scenes
of my boyhood, it is true, had not changed; the same
trees, and brooks, and houses, were therebut the
associations
were gonemy old playmates were scattered to
the winds, and new faces met me at every turn. I, too,
had changed. I was now a man, and found that the
things which had beguiled my youthful fancy (all except
one) could no longer interest my more mature mind. The
lawns, and groves, and fieldsthe village streets and
housesseemed strangely diminutive and contracted when
contrasted with the expanded and illimitable views in the
far west, or the immense avenues and structures of the
far east. I had been roving in the great world, and could
no longer confine my attention to the old schoolboy limits.
Thus I sighed to find one of my cherished anticipations
forever dispelled. I had habitually indulged the fond
day-dream
of being enabled, at some future time, to return to
this once lovely spot, in ample competence, and there to
spend in peace the remnant of my days. But the vision
was now gone. I felt that this place could never again
18*
be my homeand that to dwell with fond remembrance,
when far away, upon the happy days I had passed there,
would be the only enjoyment I should be able in the
future to derive from it.
Near the old school-house was the graveyard. I
entered
it, and stood by the head-stone of my father. The
grave was sodded over, with here and there a modest
flower lifting its petals. And I thought of the inevitable
time when I, too, must repose in the bosom of the earth.
The time seemed near at hand when compared with
eternity
.
There was no exemption for any one. I ran over
in my mind the long list of nations whose history I had
read, and the catalogue of illustrious names, distinguished
for their wisdom and their acts, whether for good or evil;
and not one of them, however great or powerful he had
been on earth, had been able to avoid the narrow tomb.
All had perished. All must perish. But all must rise
again, to die no more, to dwell in bliss or misery. I
trembled while I gazed and meditated. I dwelt upon the
dying words of my father, whose crumbling remains
reposed
beneath my feet, and made a solemn vow to
remember
his counsels, and uttered a secret prayer that my end
might be as peaceful and calm as his. I turned away,
impressed with the conviction that those who are doomed
to wander through the world, would derive a benefit by an
occasional pilgrimage to the graves of their parents and
kindred. It would serve to demonstrate what is so often
lightly heard from the pulpitthe solemn fact that all our
schemes of ambition, all our labors for the attainment of
earthly enjoyments, must have a terminationand that we
should be more vitally interested in the affairs of the life
beyond the grave, where our condition is destined to be
unchangeable.
My sadness was measurably dispelled in the enjoyment
of the society of my mother, and brothers and sisters who
still lived in the vicinity. All of the family that were
married
were doing well. My sisters' children were quite
numerous, while their parents by successful enterprise
and industry, were amply providing for their education
and support. None of the family were reprobates; if there
was to be a black sheep among us, he was not yet
developed. All were either religious, or strictly moral. My
brother Jacob, who had failed in business at Claysville, and
had been sold out by the sheriff about the time he brought
home his bride, had gone off with his wife, still cheerful in
misfortune, to one of the western cities, where he met with
business, and soon amassed sufficient capital to buy a good
stock of goods without going in debt. He had done this,
and returned to the village before time and distance had
destroyed his ideas of its beauty. He was now in the full
tide of successful experiment, rendered careful by his
reverses, and secure against a repetition of them. It was
not long before he too purchased his goods in Philadelphia,
where his credit, when he desired to use it, was well
established
.
At the end of a fortnight, I took my leave of my mother
and the family, and was soon again descending the bright
waters of the Ohio, on my way to St. Louis. I arrived at
that busy mart without accident, or incident worthy of
relation
,
just in time to see my goods brought thither by
another steamer. Again I saw Moses on the quay. He
was full of business, with a bill of lading in his hand. I
witnessed the disembarkation of his goods, which made
an enormous pile on the wharf. He had some fifty boxes
of dry-goods! I was truly alarmed to think that he should
take such a quantity of goods to Hanover, where I supposed
some $15,000 worth would be the utmost amount that could
be disposed of at a profit. I also wondered how he became
possessed of money enough to pay for such a vast quantity
of merchandize.
You seem to stare at my goots, said he; but never
mint, I von't pe in your vay. I have written to my
bartner
in Jefferson city to hire me a pig house. I am going
to stob dere vith my goots. Hanover von't do for me yet
a vile, unless you go off. You von't let me undersell you,
and if I go dere I can't get all de gash. At Jefferson, de
old merchants, ven I undersell dem, still ask der old brices,
and vait for me to sell out. Dey sell on creditI for gash.
Ven I get all te money, I go some blace else, and let dem
collect der debts if dey can. When money gets blenty I
vill go back again.
This was the last of my personal acquaintance with
Moses. But I heard of him again; for he made quite a
noise in Missouri. He did get all the money in his
neighborhood
,
and truly he did undersell everybody. He sold
for cash, and for less than the cost of the goods in his
invoices
,
and yet he made more money than any other
merchant
in that whole section of country. It turned out that the
goods he had paid for at one or two of the leading houses
in the east, enabled him to buy on credit from the others;
and, to use a very expressive western phrase, he had
gone the whole figure, and picked them up to the
tune of some thirty thousand dollars. Before the
expiration
of six months Moses was in bankruptcy, and
pretended
to be the most unfortunate and the most miserable
man alive. He said he had been defrauded by his clerks,
and cheated by the people, who paid him in bad money.
He had, besides, been robbed of several thousand dollars,
to say nothing of the immense amount of goods that had
been stolen from his store one dark night. He showed
how his door had been broken open, and exhibited to the
people his rifled and empty strong box. His creditors
seized what was left. His assets amounted to five
thousand
dollarshis debts to thirty thousand. But the injury
he had wrought did not end here. He had completely
destroyed the business of the other merchants, who
designed
to pay for their goods, but were rendered unable to
do so punctually.
My business at Hanover, like Joseph's at Pike Bluff,
went on flourishingly. Our profits this season were equal
to our hopes. The country around us was rapidly
filling
up with
German
emigrantsindustrious farmers,
artisans
and manufacturers. Although their outward
appearance
indicated extreme poverty, it was soon
ascertained
that their old oaken chests contained an
astonishing
amount of gold; and the coins of Europe soon began
to circulate more abundantly in Missouri than, perhaps, in
any other part of the Union. The trade with New Mexico
likewise brought us a large amount of dollars and
doubloons
;
and so there was no occasion for the use of
shin-plasters
.
This was the result of circumstances, none of
which had the politicians any hand in bringing about
although they enjoyed the credit of giving us such a good
circulating medium. Subsequent experience has proved
that the depreciated shinplasters of other states could not
be kept out of circulation by all the wisdom of our rulers;
and since the banishment of the U. S. Bank notes, every
Missouri merchant has at times been under the necessity
of submitting to the extortionate discounts of brokers,
when converting the currency taken in his neighborhood
into paper that would be received in the east.
When the spring business was over, I took an account
of stock, and found myself worth seven thousand dollars.
I had hardly completed this business, and was
congratulating
myself on my success, when a gentleman arrived from
Tennessee, and announced his purpose to embark in
business
at Hanover. During a conversation with him, I
remarked
that, as there was not more business transacted in
Hanover
than one establishment could do, I would sell out to
him, provided he paid me cost and carriage for the goods on
hand, and would also purchase my house (which had been
enlarged and improved), and all the debts due me. To my
surprise he consented to do so, and proposed paying the
cash down. I consulted with Joseph, who advised me to
close with him. I did so, and, at the end of June, found
myself out of business. But all my debts were paid, and
I had a handsome sum left.
I did not for some time know exactly what course to
pursue next. I had remitted to the east sufficient money
to pay every debt there, and had resolved to go thither
myself with the remainder. This much was determined
upon. But still I hesitated, for some time, to fix upon
another
location, and was in doubt whether Blanche would go
with me to Missouri, for I had positively concluded that
I would demand the hand of Blanche. That idea had
become fully developed at last. But I had some
misgivings
about her uncle, who would probably still insist on
my fighting him, before consenting to the match. That I
would not fight a duel, was another matter determined in
my mind. I could see no necessity for itnot to think of
the personal risk attending such amusements. Blanche
was of age, and did not require the permission of any one
to get married; and so I resolved, she being willing, to
marry her without her uncle's consent, if that could only
be obtained through an exchange of bullets.
Finally, Joseph persuaded me to select a location for
my next stock of goods, some hundred miles in the
interior
,
where the country was filling up rapidly with
emigrants
,
and whither he intended removing himself at no
distant day. The places in which we had been operating
were now becoming
too old
for us. Competitors were
springing up thickly, and we had not sufficient
elbow-room
.
We wanted a whole region to ourselves, so that
we might control the trade for a vast extent around us.
I made out a memorandum for an entire stock of new
goods, and agreed to be the pioneer for Joseph in the
south-western portion of the state, provided Blanche threw
no obstacles in the way. Nevertheless, other considerations
sometimes induced me to think that it might not be at all
necessary for me to bury myself, and particularly Blanche,
in the wilds of the west, where there was but little society
like that to which she had been accustomed. Although
fate seemed to destine me to hopeless obscurity, yet I
could not help regarding a residence in the east, in one
of the cities of the old states, as the only means of
obtaining
a realization of the comforts and pleasures of life,
the charming descriptions of which I had so often read
in romances. I had often heard that it would be a good
exchange to barter a whole lifetime in the west for a few
delicious years in the east. Such is the effect of the
exaggerations
of fashionable novel writers, and the
extravagant
tales of foolish travelers, who do not view a city
long enough for its novelty to wear off. I had accumulated
a considerable sum of money, by my own honest industry;
and then, if Blanche should consent to link her fortune
with mine, my capital would be considerably increased. I
did not know the extent of her fortunebut I knew that the
income which it yielded was sufficiently large to maintain
her. Her uncles were rich by inheritance, and she was the
representative of their deceased brother. They had the
management of her estate, while she was a minor, and as
they never embarked in speculation, a thing rather
degrading
in their estimation, and were certainly honorable in all
their transactions, it might be inferred that Blanche had no
mean possessions for the one on whom she might confer
her hand. Then I was young enough to supply the
omissions
in my early education, and might study a profession,
or simply live at ease on the proceeds of judicious
investments
in real estate. These subjects filled my thoughts
often both by day and night. But still there was a charm
in the half-roving life of the western merchant, which I
could not think of abandoning without regret. Had I not
fallen in love with Blanche, or had I chosen a wife in the
far west, I felt that I could have spent all my days, as I
had been spending them, in perfect contentment. But it
was vain to speculate on what I might have done. So
far I had done very well, and it seemed that I was
destined
to do better still, if I would only follow up my good
fortune.
It was in the balmy month of June, when they say maids
are fondest, and youths most attractive, that I took passage
on the steamer Ioway for St. Louis. The Ioway was
commanded
by Captain Shalcross, one of the kindest, most
gentlemanly, and most accomplished masters on the river.
Capt. S. gave me bank notes for my gold. With this paper
I designed buying a draft from the bank, on the east, as it
was said to be drawing. The gold I could not conveniently
carry about my person, and did not like to leave it in my
trunk. Silver would have been better, being too unwieldy
for robbers to carry away. During the passage down,
I made an exact estimate of what I was worth, and found
the sum to be upwards of seven thousand dollars, besides
some two hundred dollars in Philadelphia, being the interest
allowed me on the payments I had made before the bills
were due.
When we arrived at St. Louis, I immediately went to the
bank to purchase a draft; but so high a premium on
eastern
exchange was demanded, that I resolved not to pay it.
So I demanded the specie for their notes which I held.
They paid me the money, all in half dollars, which I placed
in my large strong trunk, and had it taken down in a dray
to the boat on which I was to go to Pittsburgh.
The steamer in which I took passage was the Earthquake,
a famous craft for speed, but now somewhat old. Lying
beside
her at the landing, was the Ark, a new and superb
vessel, which insisted on having the old price for passage,
while the former abated the terms to the extent of five
dollars
.
Travelers had not learned wisdom thenexperience
had to teach it. The Earthquake, when new, had been
a crack boat, both for beauty and speed; and now its
fame survived its powers and its charms. Every two or
three years improvements were introduced in boat-building,
and every new brood of boats surpassed the last, both for
speed and accommodations. These facts did not occur to
me at the time, and so I followed the crowd that preferred
the Earthquake.
Both boats had up steam, and were advertised to start at
the same hour; and from the hurried movements of the
officers and crew about their bows, it seemed that they
really intended to verify the assertions of their masters.
The master of the Ark told us all that he intended to beat
the Earthquake to Pittsburghhe thought he would get
there two days first. Some of our passengers who were
pressed for time, left us and went on board the Ark, being
willing to pay the extra five dollars for the sake of the
19
time to be saved. Upon learning what had been said and
done, our master became very indignant. He said it was
a deliberate falsehood asserted by his rivaland that no
boat running from St. Louis to Pittsburgh had ever beaten
the Earthquake. The Ark
should not
do it; and he
intended
to mortify the passengers who had left him, by
convincing
them that they had been imposed on.
When the hour of ten o'clock A. M. arrived, true to his
pledge, the captain of the Earthquake shouted out to his
man standing by the huge iron ring on shore, to which the
cable was fastened, Let go there! He was obeyed, and
the next moment we were backing out from the thick
cluster of boats that surrounded us. Instead of going up
the river to make a display, as the Princess Victoria had
done, the Earthquake turned its nose down stream as soon
as it got clear of the other vessels, and put out on its
voyage under a full head of steam. The Ark, on the
contrary
,
as if it had been playing a game of artifice, instead
of following in our wake, suffered its pent up steam to
escape
,
which enveloped its chimneys in a huge white cloud,
and caused our captain to remark, the Ark is wasting its
steam, which it will need before it gets to Pittsburgh. I
wonder what the  they got up steam for? If it was to
make the people believe he told the truth, and would go at
the time appointed, its escape now, which every one must
notice, for there is a  sight of it, will give the lie to
his pretensions. I wonder how the passengers who left us,
feel about this time? This was spoken to a few of us
who stood beside him on the hurricane deck, near the
pilot's house. The pilot shook his head, with a meaning
that was not at first comprehended by us.
You think he will come after us, then? asked the
captain.
I don't think anything else, replied the pilot.
But what makes you think so? continued the captain,
still looking back, as we descended the current rapidly on
the Illinois side, and seeing no indication that the Ark
intended
to pursue us.
The captain of the Ark said he intended to beat us to
Pittsburgh. I
know
him. I have sailed with him. He
never lies.
But he has lied, not ten minutes ago, as you and
everybody
knows. He said he would push out at ten o'clock,
and he hasn't moved yet, said the captain, with an air of
triumph.
He'll
wipe it out
before we get to Pittsburgh, said the
pilot, giving the wheel a vigorous whirl, while the vessel,
answering to the helm, followed a turn of the current, and
sped along where the waters of the muddy Missouri and
the transparent Mississippi met, still seeming reluctant to
mingle, although they had coursed side by side upwards of
twenty miles. On our right, the water was of the color of
rich coffee, about one-third cream; on the left it was a sea
of crystal.
Onward we sped, and still no boat could be seen pushing
out behind us. At length, when we entered the turn below
the great bar, and were about to lose sight of the city, a
white cloud of steam could be perceived far up the river.
There he comes! said the pilot.
No, replied the captain; that is the Sultana, going
to New Orleans. I know her by the length of her stroke,
and the intervals between the escape of her steam.
The Ark has a long stroke, and a big engine, said
the pilot, smiling.
That's the War Eagle, said the barkeeper, who had
come up with a telescope. She is from the upper
Mississippi
,
and was expected in this morning.
You know more about adulterated liquors and marked
cards, than the names of steamboats, at this distance,
retorted
the pilot; that functionary being indignant that any
one, even the master himself, should pretend to know more
about such matters than he did.
Just then, and before it could be ascertained whether
the boat in question was approaching or leaving the
landing
,
the bend in the river hid it from our view, and put an
end to the conjectures. The captain seemed in doubt, and
ill at ease. He was also vexed to find his principal officer
disposed to substantiate the predictions of his rival
commander
.
Do you really think the Ark will beat us, Mr. Lucas?
said he, in an under tone, which I could hear, as I
happened
to be standing quite near the open window of the
pilot-house.
I am sure of it, replied the pilot. The Ark is of the
same tonnage as the Earthquake, and has one more boiler,
and a more powerful engine. If they choose to push her
with a full head of steam, she
must
beat us; and hence I
don't see the use of trying to keep ahead of her.
But she is new, this being her second trip, and her
machinery is not smooth yet, said the captain.
Besides
,
they never like to push a new boat at first. They
must ascertain her full capacity by degreestry her
gradually
and safelyfor there are sometimes flaws in new
machinery
and new boilers, that won't stand
rushing
as well
as those of an old boat.
Sometimes that is the case, and sometimes it is not,
continued the imperturbable Mr. Lucas, who did not now
for an instant remove his eyes from some guiding object
in the distance before him. It is not the case with the
Ark. The pilot of her told me that they put her up to tip
top speed against the Ben Franklin, as they came down to
Louisville, and for three hours they ran side by side, hip
and thigh, and she performed well, without a screw getting
loose. Still, I admit, her captain is a timid man; and
being part owner, he will not like to run any risk. But
from what her pilot told me, and from the time she made
coming from the mouth of the Ohio up to St. Louis, her
ordinary speed, under a moderate head of steam, is about
equal to ours when we `rush the kettles' to the utmost.
So if she were merely to keep up her usual fires, we would
have to be on a desperate strain all the time to keep pace
with her. But if they throw in a little rosin, they must
shoot ahead of us in spite of the dl.
We can beat her one way, persisted the captain;
we can make fewer stops at the towns, and refuse to take
any way-freight. We can be more active at the wood
yards, and thus make up for her superiority in speed. I
want to beat her, Mr. Lucas. I desire that you will take
all near cuts. We are lighter than she is, and can go
where she durst not follow.
After hearing this very edifying colloquy, I went down
below, and took a seat among the passengers on the boiler
deck. They, too, were discussing the chances of victory
and defeat. But the majority, presuming upon the fame
of the Earthquake, achieved in other days, seemed
confident
that we should see nothing more of the Ark during
the voyage. I said nothing to check their flow of spirits,
but felt impressed with the conviction that they were
destined
to be disappointed.
The bell rang for dinner, and we all went in. For
the first time I saw all the passengers collected at the
long well-furnished table. There were about sixty, one
half of whom were ladies. During the first five minutes
19*
after being seated, a silence was maintained. We were
all strangers to each other, excepting a few parties of two
or three, being of the same families; and the first five
minutes were spent in gazing at one another. By the
expiration of the next five minutes, however, the scene
had changed, and a constant hum of voices had succeeded
to the silence. Each one had made the acquaintance of
his neighbor, (such being the interesting custom on the
western waters,) and inquiries and replies were heard
freely on all sides. This was succeeded by anecdotes
and laughter, and so the time passed off very agreeably,
as did the sumptuous repast.
After dinner, those of us who had none of the other
sex in charge, and those who had not been so
particularly
interested in the conversation of any lady as to desire
to prolong it, resumed our seats on the boiler deck, and
regaling ourselves with cigars, chatted upon the
miscellaneous
topics that occurred at the moment.
My thoughts relating chiefly to my own affairs, I was
more of a listener than a talker. But I felt peculiarly
invigorated with the fine dinner, and enlivened by the
flavor of my cigar. I looked at the receding banks with
a feeling of joy and independence, as we glided on our
way to the accomplishment of our various objects, and
especially to mine. I had my fortune in my trunk, and
the key of my state-room in my pocket. My health was
good; I was young; I was on my way to claim the hand
of her I loved; and bright skies, and brighter hopes,
seemed to beam propitiously on my pathway.
You seem to be in a good humor, remarked an old
gentleman who sat next to me, and who had, no doubt,
marked the expression of my features, and listened to the
cheerful tune I had been humming.
Oh, yes, said I, I am in a good humor with
myself
,
and with all around me. But
you
don't seem to be
as gay as the rest of us, I replied, observing his sharp
sneering cast of face.
And what is more, said he, I am sure I never
would seem to be so, out here in the west, for I could
never feel contented among such a populationand I am
glad to be going homeward. Perhaps that's the cause
of
your
cheerfulness.
You are an eastern man, then?
Certainly I am, said he; I am certain you could
not take me to be any other. To tell you my mind freely,
I have not a high opinion of the western folks. I suppose,
from your appearance, that you do not live in any of the
new statesI mean, by the new states, Missouri and
Illinois
;
not Kentucky, Ohio, Indiana, or Tennessee.
You are mistaken, said I, somewhat warmly; I am
a western man, and live in Missouri; and I beg to differ
from you in the estimation you place upon the western
people. May I ask where you reside? I have told you the
place of my abode.
I live in New York, said he.
By this time the subject of our conversation had
attracted
the attention of the company; and I determined to
make an effort to vindicate the western character.
Why, may I ask, I continued, do you hold the
western people in such low estimation?
Because of one thing, said he; they have not
schools enough; and, as a consequence, they must be
deficient
in intelligence and all the comforts of good society.
But, sir, said I, that is a deficiency which will be
supplied, as the country grows older. Besides, the people
who now inhabit the new states were already educated
before
they came hither, and educated, too, in the old states,
which seem to monopolize your affections.
What kind of education had they? he continued,
sneeringly, (he seemed to be a crabbed, ill-natured old
man;) and what kind of people do you find going to
such a wilderness? Do you behold any of the polished
portion of the population of the eastern states coming out
here?
Yes, said I, I see
you
here. The object which
brought you here may bring others. This produced a
laugh at the expense of the old gentleman, which irritated
him considerably.
No doubt a good many do come out on the same
errand that brought me. But, like me, they go back again,
disgusted with the profanity, dissipation, rudeness, and
ignorance they behold.
This was a pretty rough rejoinder; but instead of being
laughed at, it was heard with manifest displeasure by a
majority of the listeners.
Every one does not see with your eyes, neighbor
Snapup, interposed a gentleman at his side. I am
from the east, too, and my business has called me to the
far west more than once. I must confess that the people
appear
to me to be as shrewd, upright, and kind, as the mixed
population of the cities; and generally they are far more
contented. Gentlemen, Mr. Snapup, as you may have
heard, is the head of one of our largest importing houses,
and sometimes sustains heavy losses in the west. He
thinks he is privileged to enjoy his revenge in abusing the
country, because some of the people have been too
keen
for him in business transactions.
Business transactions! replied Mr. S.,
contemptuously
.
What do they know of business? I mean the
merchants, as they call themselves.
Pardon me for one moment, said I; I do not desire
to deprecate your wrath against the merchants; I merely
wish to show these good people, none of whom are
merchants
for
this is not the season, as you are aware, when
they go eastthat I am not ashamed to acknowledge my
occupation or my abode. I am a western merchanta
Missouri merchant.
There may be exceptions in every class, continued
Mr. Snapup; and I do not assert that you are not such
an exception, not knowing you one way or the other; but
I mean to say, that not one in a hundred of the so-called
western merchants know anything of the first principles of
business. They do not know the value of anything they
deal in; but merely regulate the price to be demanded for
an article by its cost.
Admitting that they are not regularly educated in the
business, said I, like the city merchants, still I cannot
perceive a better or safer guide by which to be governed
than the one you have named. If they give one dollar for
an article and sell it for two, I do not see the indispensable
necessity of their being acquainted with the intrinsic value
of the goods sold.
You don't, eh? Then I do. They have to cope with
us
, when they come to buy their goods. They are in our
power, and we can cheat their eyes out of them. Don't
talk to me about the
shrewdness
of western merchants.
The eastern men can beat them at any kind of a bargain.
When we are not familiar with the value of an article,
said I, we rely upon the word and honor of the man we
buy of. Surely you don't mean to throw out the inference,
that cheating and making false representations form a part
of the education of the eastern merchant, and are to be
taken as specimens of your eastern refinement and
manners
.
If so, the more you condemn us, the better we will
be pleased with ourselves. Here he was again irritated
by the laughter that ensued.
No, sir! cried he, I do not mean that you shall draw
any such inference. My words do not warrant it. I said
we
could
take advantage of your ignorancenot that we
would do it, or had done it. But it is different with you.
If you possessed the same advantage, you would use it.
But you do not possess anything of the kind, sir; you never
cheat us, with all your shrewdness. I never knew an
instance
of it.
I strove to check the angry feelings which his very offen
sive and personal remarks were well calculated to produce.
I suspected that his wealth and age had habituated him to
the exercise of such license in his unscrupulous
denunciations
.
And it struck me that perhaps he had recently
sustained
some heavy losses, which might naturally have caused
his ill-humorbut which, if I could elicit the fact, would
contradict the assertion that the western merchant was
never able to make the best bargain. So I asked him
if he had any fault to find with his Missouri customers.
Fault to find? I can find
nothing else
, to use one of
their own vulgar expressions, said he, actually red with
indignation, when I ought to find some thirty thousand
dollars.
How so? I inquired.
I'll tell you, sir. One of your men of St. Louis failed
in business two years ago, owing me twenty thousand
dollars
.
I was the first to be informed of the failure. I
hurried
out here, and soon found it was a desperate case. He
had been speculating in lands, and hiring tenants to
improve
them, instead of making them pay him rent. He
had ten thousand acres up the Missouri river, divided into
twenty farms of five hundred acres each. On these he had
rude houses erected, and fields enclosed, which cost him a
deal of money. In short, when I arrived, his assets
consisted
mostly of theses investments. They had cost him
first and last, full twenty thousand dollars. But he said
lands were increasing in value, and his would bring five
dollars per acre at the end of two years. All the people
told me the same thing; I didn't weigh
his
word a feather.
That would be fifty thousand dollars at the end of two
years. I demanded the documents. He exhibited the
patents, all right, so that there could be no dispute about
the title. He then proposed to settle with me, and asked
what proportion of the lands would satisfy me. I told him
I wanted them all. I looked at the chart, and saw that
they lay along the river. They were situated well, and I
wanted to have the
benefit of the rise
. So I compounded
with him by paying him ten thousand dollars in cash,
besides
giving up his notes, and took all the farms.
The next one I had large dealings with, was a peaked
nosed fellow, who, instead of giving his references in the
usual manner, boldly pointed to his boxes before the doors
of several of our leading merchants, and showed invoices
of his purchases in Philadelphia. He was too bold, we
thought, and too indifferent about buying, to be irresponsible.
So we sold him ten thousand dollars' worth of goods on six
months' time, it being understood that he was not to have
any longer indulgence. Well, six months have not elapsed,
and yet I am too late. The rascal swindled me. He
sacrificed
the goods to obtain cash for them, which he now
holds in his pocket, and coolly intimates that he hopes I
may get it! Have I no fault to find?
Was his name Moses? asked I.
You know him, then! he continued. Yes, it was
Mr. Moses Tubal, sir, at your service. I find he is an
acquaintance
of yours.
He is a wandering Jew, sir, and has been my rival
and antagonist in business. But, sir, he never got the
advantage
of me, as he did, confessedly, of you. Did you
not say the western men never were known to be shrewd
enough to get the advantage of you?
Yes! yes! he did! exclaimed a half dozen voices,
mingled with laughter. This was more than Mr. Snapup
could endure. He clenched his fists, foamed at the mouth,
and springing up from his chair, walked backwards and
forwards rapidly, for several minutes.
But you have not told us the sequel of the other
transaction
;
perhaps you had no fault to find with it? said I,
when he became a little composed. This threw him into
greater excitement than ever.
Fault to find! I tell you I found nothing else! When
I left the Jew, I went straight to look after my farms. Sir,
this spring's flood has washed away every acre of them!
Then you had the
benefit of the rise
, said I. But he
did not hear me. He rushed into the state room and
locked himself up.
CHAPTER X.
We
ran all day without seeing anything more of the steamer
which the pilot supposed was chasing us. We overtook
and passed one or two boats bound downward, which had
started several hours before us; and so most of the
passengers
ceased to think any more of the Ark.
The Earthquake performed well, and was really a fine
running craft; besides, the captain consumed no time
unnecessarily
by the way. When forced to land for a supply
of wood, he ran ashore himself, where he remained,
constantly
urging the crew and the deck passengers, (whom he
compelled to give their aid,) to greater activity and
expedition
;
and when the last stick was deposited on the guards,
the boat was always in readiness to push out again, with
an ample supply of steam. He refused to take in more
freight, and declined rounding to for more passengers.
The night was fair, all the stars being out, and we
continued
onward with unabated speed. The weather was
warm, and many of us remained on the boiler deck till
a late hour to avoid the perforations of the musquitoes,
which had taken possession of our state rooms. The
velocity
of the boat produced such a current of air on the
forward
deck, that they were unable to buzz about our ears.
Nothing disperses a cloud of musquitoes so quickly and so
effectually as a smart puff of wind. Some of the
passengers
,
however, braved the fury of the insects at the exciting
card table. They bled freely, both in pocket and from
their veins, and seemed to evince most impatience under
the first-named system of phlebotomy. I noticed that those
whose circumstances were the most desperate, and who
could least afford to lose, were the boldest to bet, and the
most eager to play. I had my stakes safely under lock
and key, and refused every invitation to join the hazardous
game. I remembered my adventure on the old Belvidere,
and resolved not to play. I kept my resolution on the
Earthquake.
Towards midnight I retired to rest, first anointing my
face and hands, and other parts likely to be exposed to the
assaults of the annoying insects, with the oil of pennyroyal,
20
which is particularly annoying to all kinds of tiny
blood-suckers
.
I slept soundly. The rumbling of machinery,
and the motion of a steamer on the western waters, never
fail to produce profound slumber, if one's mind is at ease.
The boat acts like a vast cradle, and gently rocks one to
sleep. True, it sometimes acts as a baby-jumper, and
tosses the slumberers helter-skelter through the air;but
one must not think of such a thing if he desires to have a
refreshing nap.
I awoke the next morning to the sound of a tremendous
hissing of steam. It seemed like a ton of shot poured down
from a high tower on plates of tin. I dressed myself and
walked up on the hurricane deck, making my way pretty
well back to the stern. The sound of escaping steam
always
has a disagreeable effect on my nerves, and
involuntarily
produces a disposition to remove my corpse as far
as possible from the locality of the boilers. I have been
often laughed at and rallied by others, when seen briskly
walking towards the hindmost part of the vessel; but their
rallying has rarely sufficed to disturb an equanimity based
upon the consciousness of being distant from the focus of
danger. Now-a-days, however, the boilers are placed so
very far backreaching almost to the centre of the vessel
that they have a fair sweep when they blow up, ripping
everything fore and aft; and one is quite at a loss to find a
place of security. I hope they will adopt the plan of taking
passengers in tow, and have floating saloons constructed
for that purpose. The one who first seizes upon this hint,
may make a fortune. He shall certainly have my patronage.
The hissing and whistling continued, so that when I
stood on the top deck, solitary and alone, I was
completely
enveloped in a white cloud of steam, and was for
some moments unable to perceive whence it proceeded.
Finally, when I succeeded in getting a view of the state
of things around me, I found that the vapor did not come
from the Earthquake, but from another steamer that lay
beside us, which had just landed. Her captain wisely
preferred to lose the steam generated in her boilers than to
run the risk of their bursting. Our boat was quiet enough,
economizing all its resources. We were at Cairothat
famous city yet to spring up at the mouth of the Ohioand
the steamer along side of us was the dreaded
Ark
.
I learned that we had been lying there nearly an hour,
taking in a large supply of wood, and that the Ark had just
come in for a similar supply. So we still had the start of
her. I soon found that the ambitious desire to beat her
was fast spreading from the captain and crew to the
passengers
,
who, coming out one after another in succession,
expressed the hope that we might again leave the Ark in
our rear.
While I stood on the hurricane deck the cable was
loosened
,
and the Earthquake putting out, rushed up the stream,
trembling at every joint, and making the woods on either
side quake with the reverberations of its roar. A long
white mark was left behind us as we receded from the
Ark, showing the violence of our progress. I remained
on deck until we had turned out of sight of Cairo, and
long after the rest of the passengerssummoned by the
steward's bellhad gone below. I had no stomach for any
breakfast until I was satisfied the terrible Earthquake had
worked off its palpable superabundance of steam, and
until I supposed there was a probability of having time
accorded me to digest a meal. I did not profess to be
profoundly
wise in regard to the philosophy of explosions;
but common sense taught me that when the steam was out,
it could not burst the boilers, and that the furious rushing
of the boat was an indication that it was getting out as fast
as possible. Nor could I help reflecting that when a blow
up did take place, some were killed and some escaped;
and I had a peculiar desire, in the event of the Earthquake
gaping open, to be included in the latter category.
I made my appearance at the table in time to get
my breakfast, and with an improved appetite, for the
cool fresh air of the morning had braced me amazingly.
While I was seated at the table, the old Snarleyyow from
New York came creeping out of his state-room and sat
down opposite to me. His vinegar face seemed more acid
than ever; and, as he did not deign to speak to me, I
politely reciprocated the compliment by not speaking to
him. Still I could not wholly forbear the temptation to
speak
at
him. I saw that he turned up his nose at
everything
set before him, and made mouths particularly at the
coffee, because there was no cream to put in it. So I
called for a cup beyond my usual number, and took
occasion
to praise its flavor. The old gentleman put down
his cup, and rose from the table without finishing his meal.
He spoiled his stomach to spite the table; and only afforded
amusement for the mischievous cabin boys. It is a
common
saying, when there is no remedy for an evil, it is well
to grin and bear it. My experience in traveling
convinces
me that it is best to bear it without grinning.
When I walked forward, I found the passengers talking
of nothing else but the racealways a word of ill-omen
to me on a steamer. It seemed to produce a pleasurable
excitement among them, in which I could not participate.
I might have been somewhat differently affected, had I not
had all my fortune on board, and had I not been on the
highway
to matrimony.
Again I ascended to the hurricane deck, and looked
down the river. To my dismay, I beheld a column of steam
some five miles below. Whether the boat was, or was not
the Ark, it was unquestionably gaining on us; for there
was no steamer that nigh us when I went down to
breakfast
.
The captain, the pilot, indeed all of us, gazed at it
in silence. It was too evident that we were pursued by
a superior boat. I asked no questions and made no
requests
,
as all seemed intent on keeping the Earthquake at
its utmost speed; nothing I could have said against it would
have produced any effect. I merely descended and walked
back to my state-room. I pulled off my coat, and opening
the door on the outside to let in the fresh air, threw myself
on my berth, and attempted to read one of the light works
that I had purchased from a newsboy in St. Louis. But
the author, whoever he was, (his name was wisely
withheld
,)
had not the power to beguile me. His imaginary
love fits did not touch my heart, nor his piratical encounters
dispel my fears. So truth is not only stranger, but stronger
than fiction.
At the end of a couple of hours, I walked on the
hurricane
deck again, without exchanging a word with any one
in my progress thither. I now saw the Ark plainly enough,
for she was not more than half a mile behind us. The
captain was evidently trying her metal, for she ploughed
the water like one of the North river steamers.
I sat down on a bale of hemp to await the result, and
partly to conceal the tremor that seized upon the joints of
my knees. There were many others on the top deck, among
whom were several of the females from the ladies' cabin,
who seemed to enjoy the sight as much as any of the rest.
Our firemen, while at breakfast, had suffered the steam
to escape faster than it was generated, and now the captain
was almost furious in his orders to throw in wood and
rosin. However, it required time to produce the desired
20*
effect; and in the meantime the Ark ran up gracefully
(oh, very gracefully!) along side of us. She also had been
making pretty violent efforts to diminish the distance
between
us, and had consumed the major part of her steam.
But when we were precisely even, bow with bow, and when
I expected to see her pass by us (hoping she would leave
us out of sight, and annoy us no more), our sweating
firemen
below, who had been skipping about the doors of the
furnaces like sable imps from the nether regions, had done
their work so effectually, that the Earthquake itself quivered
with the internal impulse, and shooting forward, absolutely
glided past its puffing and groaning antagonist, amid the
huzzas, exulting screams, and frenzied excitement of the
men, women, and even the children on our decks.
The Ark's bow, as she fell behind, turned towards our
stern, and she ran along in our wake only a few yards
distant from us. I could distinctly see that she was
preparing
to make another effort. Her firemen were in a
savage commotion, and soon two dark whirling columns of
smoke rose from her chimneys. But our imps of darkness
were not idle. We had our sable columns too, sometimes
mingled with red angry flame, as the rosin and lard were
applied.
For many painful moments (to me) each boat maintained
its position. The distance between them continued about
the same. It occurred to me that if any accident,
however
slight, should happen to our machinery, and cause us
to stop, the Ark, immediately in our rear, must inevitably
run into us. I thought, besides, that our relative
positions
might be maintained equally as well, and with much
more comfort, at less expense, and vastly greater safety,
if both boats would only consent to dispense with about
half their steam. But their commanders had no such
thoughts.
At length, when we got to a long bend of the river, the
Ark sheered out to the left, as if she designed to take
advantage
of a more direct course to the distant point ahead
viz., the inside track. Her steam was now at its greatest
pressure, and it was in vain that the Earthquake essayed
to defeat the object. She likewise diverged to the left;
but when the steamers came together again, the Ark was
even with us. Our firemen relaxed not their exertions,
and for a long time we seemed to maintain our position.
At last, to my infinite gratification, it was announced from
below that the combustibles were getting short. The
last barrel of rosin had been knocked on the head, and the
last keg of lard had been pulled up the hatches. While
I rejoiced at this intelligence, the rest seemed dismayed.
There was an old lady on board, whose husband was well
known as one of the richest farmers of Illinois; and the
wife was pretty well known too, as being the better
horse, and assuming rather more than feminine authority
in her better half's business. She was, however, well
skilled in speculations, and was generally very lucky in
devising plans to get the highest price for their produce.
This horrible old lady sat on the other end of the bale of
hemp I occupied. She had been sitting there a long time
without uttering a single word; but her toothless mouth
was drawn up to a purse-like pucker, while her chin almost
touched her nose. Her little sharp eyes sparkled like a
serpent's, as she watched the progress of the race. I
supposed
at first that she was partaking of my painful alarm,
inasmuch as she was a woman, and an old woman at
that. No such thing. When it was understood that the
combustibles were failing, she beckoned the captain to
come to her, with a commanding gesture, which indicated
nerves of iron rather than flesh and blood.
See here, Captain, said she, in a squeaking voice,
I am a true grit Kentuckian, from the old Boonsboro
settlement
,
on the Kentucky river. I have seen the boys chase
the Indians, and run their blood horses. I have raised
race horses myself, and have a spirit in me that can't
stand being beat. I have twenty casks of bacon hams on
board, which are at your service. They will make as hot
a fire as anything elseI have tried them; for my cook
once burnt down my kitchen with a fat ham. Take them,
and go ahead!
Such was the substance of her speech. The captain
made no reply, but hastened below. In a few moments
the atmosphere was loaded with the fumes of the
wholesale
fry; and the Earthquake, which had begun to lose
ground, held its own again. The boats were now close
beside each other, and the passengers amused themselves
by occasionally stepping from one deck to the other.
I looked at the shore, near which we were now running,
and for the first time was enabled to realize the fearful
speed we were making. The trees danced by us like the
flitting creatures of a vision; and the occasional houses,
orchards, and fields beyond, seemed to be twisting, whirling
and flying about, as if indeed all creation had broken
loose. I closed my eyes on the thrilling scene, and
strove for some time to banish the startling apprehensions,
which held me on the rack, from my mind. It was a vain
endeavor.
We were now approaching Paducah, and both boats
were striving more furiously than ever to gain the victory.
The landing in front of the town was crowded with
spectators
.
They took a most lively interest in the exciting
scene, as could be seen from the waving of hats and
upraised
arms. Our wheels hummed like whirligigs in the
water, while the escape pipes coughed like claps of thunder.
On we rushed, the Earthquake being next to the shore, and
not twenty paces distant from it. Most of the passengers
on the hurricane deck collected around the pilot house in
front, while I maintained my position in the rear. But in
the intensity of my alarm I had unconsciously risen from
my seat, and now stood upright on the bale of hemp.
The old lady sat still, her livid lips compressed, if possible,
still more closely than ever, while not a sigh escaped her,
and not an exhibition of the slightest tremor.
Both steamers had freight to put out at Paducah; but
neither seemed disposed to stop. We had the inside track,
and the Ark strove in vain to head us. At length, when we
were even with the landing, the Ark's machinery stopped
abruptly; she fell back and landed. From the moment
her wheels ceased to work, her considerate engineer had
begun to let off the steam, which escaped with a deafening
sound, forming an expanded cloud over head, and creating
astonishment that such an immense amount of vapor could
have been confined in so small a compass as three boilers.
The Earthquake ran ahead a few rods, and then stopped.
The freight to be delivered there had been previously placed
on the gangway, so that it might be rolled off without a
moment's delay: this was done. No steam escaped from
our boilers; all was husbanded for the renewal of the
struggle. Indeed, there was no diminution of the
exertions
of the infuriated firemen during the brief delay at the
landing. Wood and hams of bacon were still crammed
into the jaws of the gaping furnace. The huge chimneys
grew red-hot, and all the passengers were forced to retreat
from the boiler-deck.
As soon as the freight was put ashore, the men were
ordered to push out instantly, which they lost no time in
doing, for the lowest subordinate on board was now
thoroughly imbued with the prevailing anxiety and
determination
to win the race. The merchant for whom the
freight had been delivered was seen coming down from his
store with a bag of money in his hand. But our captain
would not wait to receive it. When he reached the water's
edge the planks were pulled in, and the crew were
pushing
the boat out into the current. The vessel turned out
quickly, so that the bow pointed up the stream. We were
some sixty feet from the shore when the order was given to
go ahead. The engineer obeyed. The wheels made two or
three revolutionsand thenoh how shall I describe it! I
can never bring my mind to reflect upon what ensued,
without
a renewal of the thrill of agony which seized upon my
soul. I saw the huge black chimneys shoot high up in the
airpieces of machinery, timbers, fragments of hissing red
hot ironhuman limbs separated from their bodiesbodies
without limbsmen, women and childrenall in one
horrible
promiscuous mass, hurled upward, in the twinkling
of an eye, and followed, like the blinding flash of lightning,
by such an awful explosion as seemed to rend the heavens
and the earth. A blindness, a deafness, a total insensibility
then kindly intervened, and obscured from my vision the
appalling spectacle.
I do not know how long it was before my consciousness
returned. My last impression was that of having been
enveloped in steam, which collapsed my lungs. The first
thing I observed, on recovering my senses, was that I lay
extended, with my face on the earth, and that my clothes
were saturated with water. After one or two feeble attempts
to rise, I only succeeded in turning over on my side. The
first object that met my eyes was the body of a female,
without a head
, lying within a few inches of me. I turned
and looked in the opposite direction. There, too, were the
dead and the dying. I sat up, and gazed in bitter agony
on the most heart-rending scene that ever mortal eyes
beheld. I was in the midst of a long row of the dead and
the dying, which had been either thrown ashore, or rescued
from the water. Men and women were busy around us,
striving to alleviate the sufferings of the wounded. Groans,
and cries, and shrieks were heard on every hand.
Carriages
and litters came to take us awaysome to lingering
couches, others to the grave.
I found, upon an examination of my limbs, that I had
not received any material injury. The only pain I felt was
a scalding sensation in the lungs, which seemed to
diminish
,
as I breathed more deeply. Though satisfied of my
own safety, the miserable condition of those around me
again overwhelmed me with horror. I fell back, closed
my eyes, and stopped my ears, in the vain hope to obtain
a brief respite from the realization of the mournful event.
The picture was graven in my brain, and the unhappy
spectacle could not be hidden from my mind. At last they
were all removed but me. I was startled by the rude
hand of a cartman placed upon my shoulder. I turned
and looked him in the face.
You are not dead? said he.
No, I replied; nor do I believe I am hurt much,
I continued, as I made an unsuccessful effort to rise up.
Pray, tell me how many have perished.
Nobody will ever know how many, said the driver.
The cabin passengers were registered, and all of this class
that cannot be found, will be missed and counted. But
the poor deck passengers had not their names put down.
They suffered the most, as usual. The few of them that
survive, say there must have been fifty on deck. But ten
escaped. Of the cabin passengers, it is supposed only
fifteen were killedbut as many more are wounded. They
counted you as dead.
But where is the other boat? I inquired, seeing the
Ark alone at the wharf.
She was blown to pieces. As I came to town, I found
several doors of her state-rooms three hundred yards beyond
the farthest house. All of her that was not blown away,
immediately sunk. They say her hull was split open in
the centre, and that she spread out and went down before
any one could go to the rescue of the passengers that
remained
on the wreck.
But how came I on shore? I asked.
I cannot tellI was not here, said he.
I can tell you, replied a gentleman who had
witnessed
the explosion. I was looking at you when the
boat blew up. You stood upon a bale, and towered above
the rest. A heavy piece of iron came up through the
decks, and carried away the head of a female sitting near
you. You still remained standing. When the steam
rushed up, and all the decks, as well as the hull, sank
down in one chaotic mass, I perceived you still in your
erect attitude, as a puff of wind blew aside the cloud of
vapor that enveloped you. Thus you went down. When
you reached the water, the bale on which you stood turned
over, and then, for the first time, your position was
changed. You sank down on your side, without lifting
your arms, and the water closed over you. You rose
again, pale and stiff, and was brought ashore in a yawl,
supposed to be dead.
I could now stand upand with a little assistance, for I
was very weak, I walked up to the nighest hotel, and was
conducted to a room, where I lay in bed while they dried
my clothes before a fire. When this was done, I rose
again and dressed myself. I sat down to reflect. My
first thought, then, (I must own it,) was about my money.
I had heard nothing of my trunk. If it, too, had been
sent sailing through the air, I had no doubt it had burst in
its course like a bomb-shell, and scattered my treasure in
such a manner that I would never recover it. On the
other hand, if it had gone down with the boat, still the
chances were twenty to one against my ever seeing it
again.
These were bitter reflections, and banished the
remaining
effects of the steam and the submersion. I no longer
felt pain in my lungs, nor as much sympathy as at first
for my fellow-sufferers. On the contrary, the sickness of
despair seized upon my heart. If I was doomed thus to
lose everything I had hitherto been toiling for, it was
almost a matter of regret that I, too, had not perished with
the rest.
I had a few bank notes in a belt round my body. They
were Virginia notes, which I was unable to convert into
specie in St. Louis without submitting to a discount I was
unwilling to bear. I unbuttoned my vest and took off the
belt. It was wet and warm with the returning heat of my
body. I spread the smoking notes on the table before the
fire. They were stained, but not ruined. I clutched
them as the last remnant of my fortune, and counted them
over and over again, as if this process could increase their
number, or magnify their denominations. They amounted
to about one hundred dollars, which, with some two
hundred
I had in Philadelphia, formed my entire wealth.
But I could not, at first, realize my sudden destitution.
21
I felt strong now, and walking down stairs without difficulty,
I went out to the scene of the disaster. I wandered among
the remains of the wreck upon the shore in search of my
treasure. I could find fragments of human beings, but no
money. I made known my loss, and offered a liberal
reward for its recovery. Other trunks were found floating
on the surface of the stream, but not mine; while not a
vestige of it had been seen on the land.
Others involved in the calamity had large sums about
them, but sustained no serious losses. Theirs were in
checks and drafts; mineoh, the infatuation of our
foolish
resolves!I had determined should be in heavy metal,
which was to save me some seventy-five dollars in
exchange
.
And it had been for the purpose of saving a few
paltry dollars that I had taken passage on the ill-fated boat!
CHAPTER XI.
Would
that I might obliterate the next few months of
my life from my memory! But that may not be. Well,
then, why record the events which followed? Expressly
that my example may be a warning to others. I ran
through a career of folly, which hundreds in destitute
circumstances
embark in, to find in the end what I found
disappointment and mortification. Such generally sink into
the grave, or into impenetrable obscurity, their history
which, if once stated in candor, might deter others from
pursuing a similar courseunknown. I have no
hesitation
,
therefore, in recapitulating my errors, if that may be
the means, as I trust it will, of deterring some few
romantic
young men or young ladies from casting themselves
into a vortex as delusive in reality as it is bright in
appearance
,
and which too frequently leads to destruction; while
neverno, neverdoes it conduct any one to the full
realization
of his hopes! But sufficient unto the day is the evil
thereof, and I will not anticipate.
For several days I wandered about the wharf in the
vicinity of the scene of my disaster. At the close of each
day the small particle of hope with which I set out in the
morning, was more and more diminished, and finally
became
extinct. I grew thoughtful, silent, almost desperate.
I was calm in outward appearance, while burning
meditations
consumed me within. One moment my thoughts ran
back rapidly through the past, when I had been happy
without appreciating my condition. Then I reflected how
easily I might have spared a few more dollars, and taken
passage on the Ark, where all would have been safe and
wellbut this was only adding fuel to the fire. My
fortune
was gone, irrecoverably gone, and why should I
draw upon the past for additional pangs? I then thought
of the future, and that was but little better. Blanche, too
all hopes of her must be relinquished. A beggar could not
aspire to the possession of her hand. I might go back to the
hospitable wilds of Missouri, and accumulate another little
fortune; but this would be a tedious process, ever mingled
with the intolerable remembrance of what I had lost, and
what I might have enjoyed, had not misfortune overtaken
me. The very contemplation of it seemed like forcing
back the current of my life. I wanted not solitude now.
My mind was seized with a desperate frenzy, and I
could not brook deliberation. I felt that some pursuit was
necessary which would distract my thoughts, rather than
one that might lead me to brood over the past. The words
of my father occurred to me more than once; but I could
not conceive that such a calamity was the work of
Providence
for some good or wise purpose. In truth, I was
tempted to reproach what I considered to be the injustice
of the Supreme Ruler of events, in permitting such a
calamity
to befall me and all the rest that suffered. I could
not be convinced of the possibility of any good growing
out of such a disaster.
I resolved to pursue my journey eastward, but not to
Norfolk; and so I took passage on the next boat going up
the river. I was now more indifferent about my fate; and
never hesitated to occupy a seat at the card-table directly
over the boilers. I indulged in play, and in any other
amusement likely to keep my thoughts from running back
to the past. There was one means, however, too often
resorted to by others in similar circumstances, which I
avoided. I did not, and never could, go to the bottle.
But, as I have said, I sought mental excitement at the
card-table on the boat. At first I won, and won pretty
freely sometimes; but it happened that I invariably lost
nearly all I won before I rose from the table. Upon the
whole, my playing neither diminished nor increased to any
great extent the funds I possessed.
A small sum in still remained my pocket on reaching
Philadelphia, which, added to the amount to my credit on
the books of the firm which had made disbursements for
me, was enough to keep me from want for some time.
The calamity of which I was one of the victims had been
published in all the papers, and the loss of my trunk
formed one of the paragraphs of the narrative. The
merchants
of whom I had been in the habit of purchasing
my goods, proposed, with a generosity which did them
honor, to sell me another stock entirely on credit,
provided
I had any desire to try my luck again. But I
declined the offer. Then one of them offered me a
liberal
salary as a salesman in his establishment. This I
acceded to. But it was not long before my new
employment
became insufferably irksome.
While the novelty of my situation continued, and while
I was kept actively egaged in the business of my employers,
the time seemed to pass lightly enough: but when, in the
midst of a dull season, I sat down like the rest, my thoughts
immediately reverted to the past, and I could not avoid
making a contrast between my present condition and that
of independence and almost affluence which I had so
recently
enjoyed. My employers, perceiving my fits of
sadness
,
and rightly conjecturing the cause, did everything in
their power to dissipate my cares, and to encourage me to
persevere in my new career. I saw their kind solicitude,
and felt grateful. I was familiar with the manners and
modes of thought of the western merchants, and every one
whose custom I was so fortunate as to draw to the house of
my employers, acceded to my wishes. There can be no
doubt, if I had continued a few years in this kind of
employment, that I would have repaired all my losses.
My acquaintance among the western merchants was very
extensive, and they would naturally have preferred to deal
with a house whose saleman had been taken from among
themselves.
But now my evil star seemed to be in the ascendant. I
resolved not to remain, and announced my determination to
the firm. They parted with me reluctantly, after offering
an increase of salary, and a prospective interest in the
profits
of the house. At that time there were few, perhaps
not any, young men from the far west in Market street
and the brief time I was there, sufficed to show the
advantages
21*
to be derived from a true knowledge of western
character
.
When I abandoned my employment, I had still a few
and only a fewhundred dollars. I took an attic room in
my boarding-house, that I might be undisturbed in my
inevitable meditations. There I shut myself up for some
daysa prey to grief and melancholy. I had just sense
enough left to find out pretty soon that this mode of life
could afford no remedy for a mind diseased; and so I sought
distraction in the drawing-room of the establishment, where
I always found lively and gay company, music, and all
the inexhaustible diversions of accomplished female
society
.
I attended the ladies to concerts, to the theatre,
and other places of amusementbut rarely to church. Yet
even this kind of life did not long beguile me. I thought
often of the indispensable necessity of providing for my
future support, and as my present supply of money was
gradually diminishing, my anxiety increased. I hoped
something would turn up in my behalfI cared not what;
while the idea of returning to any ordinary business
pursuit
,
never occurred to me without being speedily
dismissed
with contempt.
I was rapidly approaching lunacy, and my course was
only accelerated by the habit I had contracted of daily
perusing and re-perusing the works of Lord Byron, in the
solitude of my chamber. To one in my desperate
circumstances
,
whose course of reading had been pretty extensive
in the flowery paths of light literature, and whose nature
was, perhaps, in an unusually high degree, tinged with the
dangerous hue of romance, the flights of that unparalleled
genius in the world of passion were the least likely of
any others that could have fallen into my hands, to bring
me to my senses. They increased my madness, my
recklessness
,
and desperation.
From his impassioned verse, I turned to the noble poet's
letters, and was particularly struck with the vast amount
of money he boasted of receiving for his MSS. I gloated
over the page, until the sums set down seemed to rise up
in heaps of glittering gold before me, and invite my hand
to seize upon them, that I might resume my career of
prosperity
which had been so abruptly checked. Why could
I not write poetry, too, and also realize such enormous
wealth? Such was the presumptuous interrogatory I dared
to propound to myself. Byron had his woes, and I had
mineand there the similarity ended. But I did not
pursue
the comparison any farther. The idea had seized upon
me, and fired my excited mind. I thought of nothing now
but the emoluments and the glory of a literary career. Of
its disappointments and miseries, Byron made no mention,
and they did not occur to me.
I seized my pen and perpetrated several stanzas, which
were offered to a family newspaper. They were accepted,
and printed with some commendations. This was almost
fatal to me; for it made me believe that I was really
possessed
of genius, and at once banished from my mind all
suggestions of pursuits of another nature. My pen alone
was henceforward to constitute my sole means of support,
notwithstanding I had received nothing for my stanzas. I
understood, however, that such bagatelles were considered
as gratuitous contributions; and, filled with thoughts of the
immensity of fortune and fame I was to acquire in the
future
,
I had every disposition to be liberal with the
publishers
.
But there was one thing which surprised me. I
discovered, upon enlarging my literary acquaintancefor
there is a sort of free masonry among the novitiate literati,
as well as among men of acknowledged talentsthat there
was a prodigious number of scribblers of verse and prose in
the city, both male and female, and that not one of them, as
far as I could learn, had made a fortune by the pen. Nor had
many of them even a very exalted niche in the temple of
fame. But still they never ceased to write. How they
lived, was to me a great mystery.
But Byron had not acquired his fame and amassed his
fortune by writing sonnets and tales for the papers and
magazinesand neither would I attempt it. I would not
deal in such small matters. And above all, my infatuated
mind now shrunk with horror from the contemplation of
any of the dray-horse, honest business pursuits of the day
and particularly from the recollection of the time when I
sold goods by the retail in a
hen-house
, out in the western
wilds. I would as soon have proclaimed that I had been a
counterfeiter or a burglar, as to have intimated that I had
once measured goods by the yard. So far had been my
progress in this very prevalent species of insanity.
I lost no time in purchasing several quires of foolscap
paper to begin with. I determined to write a long poem,
which of course I resolved should be a great one. I was
not precisely certain what description of a poem it should
be; and in truth, I was hardly able to distinguish between
an epic and an elegy. It should be original, wild,
rambling
,
bold, startling; in short, it was to be different from
anything that had preceded it, and beyond the imitation of
any who were to come after me. My first and greatest
difficulty was to fix upon a title; and it was a very great
difficulty, for I had not adopted any particular subject to
constitute its body. I sat for an hour with my pen
suspended
over the page, racking my perturbed mind for a
title, and finally adopted the Rover. This would give
me scope enough. I might go whithersoever I pleased; and
so I did. I dived into the past and soared into the future;
traversed our own country, and crossed the great ocean to
compliment Byron, Shakspeare, and all the renowned
literary worthies. It was a tribute which I felt was due
from me. I hallowed Washington, and immortalized all
the heroes of the revolution. I dwelt especially upon the
emotions of my own heart, and described with minuteness
of detail the impression made by matters and things in
general, on my own mind.
The first day and night I accomplished about twenty
Spenserian stanzas, and then threw myself down to rest, but
not to sleep, for my mind was a boiling caldron of
disjointed
images and fragmentary fancies. I thought the
true inspiration was upon me, and I perused what I had
written with delight. Of course others would derive a
similar delight from its perusal; and judging by this
criterion
,
I felt assured of successof fame and fortune. My
next ridiculous impulse was to spring up and count the
lines of one of Byron's cantos, which had been at first
published
separately, and then refer to the time which it took
him to write it. I made an exact computation, and was
gratified to find that I could write as fast as the great poet
had written.
I counted the days and weeks which would be consumed
in the composition, and then estimated the delay of printing
and binding. Time was now an object to me. I longed
to read the commendations of the press, to realize the golden
harvest, and enjoy the super-eminent distinction in the
world which my visions depicted. And above all I sighed
for the bright day to come when, with my fortune retrieved,
and my merits on the tongues of all, I might present
myself
before Blanche, like some triumphant hero of romance,
and proudly claim her hand, with the full approbation of
her appeased uncle. These were the thoughts that incited
me, and which kept my pen in motion. The matter of the
work was left to the inspiration of the moment, and was to
flow from my pen like words from the mouths of the
apostles
.
When forced to take a modicum of exercise, to
relieve
the pains and cramps of my inactive limbs, I walked
the streets with a conscious superiority. Whenever any
one would stare at me, attracted by my abstracted gaze, I
thought it might be one who had heard of the great work I
was writing, or had, perhaps, when I was absent, found
access to my manuscript, and now regarded me with
wonder
and admiration. Such are the ridiculous fancies of
merely moon-stricken scribblers; and it would surprise any
one to have a correct knowledge of the astonishing number
of this class of subjects that daily wander about the streets
of our principal cities, hoping against hope.
Well, it was not many weeks before my great work was
done. I had passed my perihelion, and now wished to
attract the gaze of the mortals below. I consumed three
whole days revising and transcribing my production. I
then sat down and wrote a polite note to an eminent
publisher
,
stating that I had a poem ready for the press, which
I desired him to issue. The very next day I had his reply.
The note was brought in to me while I was talking to the
young ladies in the parlor. I held it in my hand,
repressing
my anxiety to hasten away to the printers with my
manuscript, not doubting that such was the import of the
reply. The young ladies desired me to read it, but I
declined
,
merely intimating that the subject to which it related
was one of no importance. I had, somehow or other, the
prudence, or the luck, to keep my correspondence with
publishers a profound secret.
I opened the note in the privacy of my chamber. It
was brief, and to the point. He simply declined making
any additional engagements, in consequence of the
precarious
condition of the business of the country, &c. &c. I
thought this was very strange. He had not read my
production
;
and how could he know but that it might improve
his business? I had never supposed, for a moment, that
the publisher who got my work would run any risk; and
surely a man could not enter into too many engagements
which paid him a profit. I felt quite indignant, and wrote
to another publisher. His answer was similar to that of
the first. I wrote to others, and still it was the same.
They all declined. I thought surely there must be a
combination
to suppress native merit! It was inconceivable to
me why they should decline my poem without reading it.
How could they know it would not make their fortunes as
well as mine? They knew nothing about my capabilities;
I might be a genius equal in every respect to Byron, and
they might see the day when they should regret having
declined to publish my work. Such was my hallucination.
But it is precisely the same with hundreds of young
gentlemen
and ladies at this day. There is a fascination
in this description of delusion surpassing ordinary
comprehension
.
Every poetic aspirant in this country, and
in most countries, is deluded with the belief that he is
gifted above all others, and that he is destined to encircle
his brows with an unparalleled halo of glory. He may be
told, and it may be demonstrated beyond the possibility of
contradiction, that not one perpetrator of poetry in a
thousand
succeeds in Europe, and that not a single one in this
country has ever yet realized sufficient means from the
profits of his pen (the poetic pen) to support his family;
yet he will not hesitate a moment to relinquish all other
modes of making a living, and take the desperate chance
of winning a substantial triumph which all other poets have
failed to achieve!
Such was my case, indubitably; for while I was writing
to the different publishers in the several cities, two of my
brothers arrived from the West, to purchase fresh supplies
of goods, and offered me most advantageous terms, if I
would only give up my mad project and accompany them
back to Missouri. I refused peremptorily. I told them
my lot was cast, and henceforth I would follow the course
my star pointed out. Fate had bereft me of the fortune I
had amassed in the pursuit of business, and might do it
again if I returned to the West. NoI was resolved to make
my way through the world by my wits, or fall in the
attempt
;
and I hinted to them the possibility of my
succeeding
some day in surpassing them all in the pursuit of wealth
in my peculiar way, and then it would be a subject of
bitter reflection to them that they had attempted to dissuade
me. I borrowed some money of them, and we parted.
There was one publisher who desired to see my work and
ascertain its merits. Upon this being intimated to me, I
took my manuscript to him, and he placed it in the hands
of a lady of some literary taste and judgment, who perused
it and gave her opinion of its merits. This lady was
doubtless
an admirer of Byron, and must have been, to some
extent, a partaker of the same kind of enthusiasm which
actuated me. If she still lives, I hope she will pardon this
expression, when she learns the extent of suffering in which
her praises contributed to involve me. At the time they
were communicated to me, I could have fallen down at her
feet and worshiped her. If I had been the possessor of
millions, they would have been at her service. But I
never met her. And the fact that she never approached
my presence, or afforded an opportunity for me to approach
her, only heightened my admiration of her. It drove more
deeply into my soul the fatal conviction that I was a poet,
for it evinced the fact that she was wholly disinterested
in her commendations.
The following is a verbatim copy of her note to the
publisher
:
This poem I have attentively perused; it is extremely
interesting; it shows a quick imagination and a brilliant
intellect. The writer without doubt is a gentleman of
profound
talent, and is destined at no distant period to shine a
bright star in the literary hemisphere.
I fully appreciate its worth, but am ill calculated to give
it a deserving opinion.
The name of course I suppress, because it was not my
fortune to realize her prediction. Had I succeeded, it
would have been the study of my life how to please and
serve that lady; for she seemed to be the only friend I had
in the wide world. She alone seemed to appreciate my
talents, and to encourage my lofty aspirations.
The bookseller was very naturally influenced by the
frank expression of such unbounded encomiums. He
promptly agreed to be the publisher, and the poem was
placed without delay in the hands of the printer, who
executed
his part of the work in a faultless manner. It was
completed in due time, (although my impatience made the
necessary delay seem like a cruelty,) and delivered to the
publisher. I marked every step of its progress through
the press, through the hands of the binder, to the house
of the publisher. I even saw the boy take the
presentation
copies, with the advertisements, to the different
newspaper
offices; and then I returned to my garret to ruminate
on what was to follow. That night I could not sleep. My
22
mind was filled with fancies and anticipations which kept
me in a fever of excitement. My name was not to the
poem, it was true; but would not the poem itself be the
subject of conversation in every polite circle the next day?
What would the critics write about it? I felt willing
to compound for a share of denunciation mingled with
plaudits. That my poem would be praised by some of the
editors, I did not doubt, inasmuch as the only individual
to whom it had been submitted, had felt herself constrained
to express so favorable an opinion of its merits. There
could have been no partiality to sway her judgment, for
she did not know the author. But that some would
condemn
it, was a matter of course. Still, I looked forward to
their condemnation with much complacencyfor had not
Byron himself been assailed by the Edinburgh reviewers?
The morning came at last, and I took my place at the
table, modestly and diffidently. I presumed the company
had seen the morning papers. Most of them had learned
that I had a poem in press, from seeing the proof sheets
brought in by the printer's boy. I ventured to peep at their
faces, but did not observe that their eyes were on me.
And when the usual conversation began, it was all about
Robinson and Helen Jewett, instead of my immortal
poem.
I made no inquiries, but rose from the table, and taking
an umbrella, (it was raining,) wended my way stealthily to
a public reading-room, where they kept the papers, as well
as oysters and liquors. I trembled as I approached the file of
the U. S. Gazette. I strove to affect a careless
indifference
as, glancing over its columns, I looked at the heads of
the editorial articles. With a palpitating heart, and a
perspiring
brow, I read over every paragraph without noticing
a line about my production. I then shifted my position to
the Philadelphia Gazette, and with the same result. It
was the same with all, except the Inquirer, which mildly
noticed the reception of the work. This was all very strange
to me, thenbut subsequently it seemed natural enough. I
felt a cold pain at my heart as I withdrew; but it was only
momentary. It occurred to me that to read a poem of some
sixty pages, and to review it properly, required some little
time. I then turned back and examined the advertising
columns of the papers, where I found the work set forth by
its title in all of them. I returned to my room, expecting
to enjoy the praises I had so fondly anticipated, the next
day. But the next and the next came and passed away
like the first. For weeks I continued to frequent the
reading-rooms
,
and never saw another notice, commendatory or
condemnatory, of my work. This was a most
astounding
and unexpected result. Where was my fame? Where
the mint of gold that was to compensate for my lonely labor
by the flickering light of the midnight taper? For some
time I was plunged more deeply than ever in the darkness
of despair. I ascertained that but few copies were sold,
and that even these were called for mostly by the miserable
poetic tenants of other garrets, who had met with a similar
fate.
This ecstacy of folly still exists in all our cities, while
none reap the full fruition of their illusory hopes. This
narrative of my own pitiable case is painful to give, and
it would never have been undertaken, had I not believed it
might deter others from pursuing a similar career,
inevitably
to end in harsh regret and stinging mortification.
I would not be understood as deprecating all attempts at
poetic success. I would merely warn the young, the
ardent
,
the inexperienced and the incapable, against relying
upon a fondly hoped-for success as the means of support.
But those who, in addition to ample means of subsistence,
possess sufficient leisure, I should certainly not feel disposed
to dissuade from indulging such fancies to a limited
extent
,
if they really believe they have, what I firmly believe
I hadgenius. I would also warn literary ladies and
gentlemen
against pronouncing hasty opinions upon the merits
of the productions submitted for their perusal. I need not
be particularly careful to warn the publishers; they know
their own business best.
Still, I was not cured of my fatal hallucination. After
floundering some time in the depths of despondency, I rose
full-fledged from the ashes of my first immolation.
Perhaps
I had mistaken the appropriate field for the exercise
of my genius. That I had genius, and of a high order,
too, I still did not doubt. Perhaps all the editors and
poets on the continent, as well as the publishers, were not,
as I was at first inclined to believe, in actual combination
against me. My work might not really possess the merit I
thought it possessed. Besides, the admirers of poetry were
select and few in number, compared with the readers of
other descriptions of composition. I would make another
effort. It should be in prosea novelin short, the
Wanderings
of . I chose Fielding for my model, and set
to work with all the ardor and rapidity of a new impulse.
I supposed the taste of the majority of readers to be the
same that it was when Tom Jones was published; else,
thought I, why is that work reprinted and circulated so
extensively
?
So I succeeded in rivaling both Fielding and
Smollett in licentiousness and vulgarity, but was minus
their wit, their humor, and their philosophy. I felt a sort
of resentment against the public for its neglect to buy my
poem; and was otherwise mad enough in all conscience.
I described some of the worst scenes occurring among the
most groveling portions of humanity, without the slightest
stint of their phraseology, or of their depraved actions.
The work was completed in an incredible short space of
time. It was printed, and failed. The independent public
were not to be inveigled into the expenditure of money to
enable me to be revenged on them.
Thus ended my second step as a man of the world and
author, after the abandonment of my legitimate pursuit.
Each step was a manifest descent and departure from the
condition of independence and happiness that I had once
enjoyed. But still I looked with a sullen eye steadfastly
downward. I had not yet the first impulse to turn back,
or to look upward. I was conscious of being thwarted
of being miserable and destitute; but still I braved my
sad predicament with a firmness and determination worthy
of a better cause.
I now floated upon the waves of time, like a dismasted
ship, a mere wreck, and reckless whether the winds should
waft me outward, or drive me headlong upon the
breakers
.
I never felt, however, the slightest inclination to
perpetrate dishonest or dishonorable acts: the counsels and
example of my pious parents had secured me against
the approach of such evil temptations. But I became
prodigal of my existence, and by nourishing the miseries
which consumed me, was, by a slow but sure process,
laying violent hands upon my own life. Abject dependence
on the charity of others, utter destitution, vagabondism!
the very thought of such a conditionand such was the
inevitable tendency of my coursepierced my heart like a
dagger! I no longer found refreshment in quiet slumber.
Incessant dreams disturbed my rest. The horrors of bitter
and unsuccessful struggles uniformly filled my visions, and
I awoke to prefer the reality of the infliction to its hideous
aspect.
22*
I grew weak and pale, and began to look for the end.
I supposed I should die; but even this conviction did not
produce any disposition to retrace my steps. I had
defied
the worst that fate could do, and still felt a
determination
to resist even unto death. I knew not precisely what
I resisted; but I was convinced that I contended against
something; and as I felt that something had ill used me,
I desired to have the victory or death. Such is sometimes
the perverseness and haughtiness of our nature, even when
we have not the means of obtaining food and clothing.
Some forty dollars, now, comprised my entire stock of
money. It would be mere folly to try my pen again. It
was true my last work, in spite of its many absurdities and
its immoral tendency, had been reviewed rather favorably
by several sympathizing critics; still it failed to produce me
any substantial benefit to compensate for the labor of
composition
;though
this was, in fact, a small matter. I could
not remain in Philadelphia. I was not willing to die where
my poor works had been so prematurely buried. Nor could
I live where I would be pointed out as a disappointed and
unsuccessful author. And yet I knew not whither to go, nor
what to do. With no promise of employment, no
engagement
on which to rely, I resolved to go to another city. I
came to this resolution one night during a solitary and
aimless
stroll through one of the public squares. I say a
solitary
walk among the crowd, and I say the truth; for there
is a painful sense of utter loneliness in mingling with a
multitude of fellow-beings, when none of them notice you.
More cheerful by far would be the scene in the solitude of
some impenetrable desert; for there the company of one's
own fancies and meditations might be enjoyed without
limitation
.
But to a person in my condition, one's own thoughts
are his enemies and assailants, and I sought distraction.
I had never injured any mortal on earth; had never
perpetrated
any description of crime; and yet, the thought that
I should be reduced to such a state of misery almost rent
the heart that indulged it.
Having formed a determination to leave the city the
next morning, I walked briskly in the direction of my
boarding-house, to make preparations for the journey. As
I passed along Chestnut street, I happened to cast my eyes
towards the brilliant saloon of one of the fashionable hotels,
which was filled with gay strangers. I paused abruptly,
for I beheld through the open window the friend of my
youth, the object of my adorationBlanche. I stood and
gazed. She was sitting on a sofa, arrayed in lawns, laces,
jewels, and surrounded by an admiring crowd. But the
one who was the most diligent in his attentions, was a
young gentleman of fine stature, and noble brow. I had
struggled to teach myself to regard Blanche as one lost to
me forever. She was involved in the failure of my literary
projects. All my bright hopes were crushed together.
Blanche was relinquished with the rest. But in
relinquishing
her, the idea had not occurred to me that she might be
appropriated by any one else.
I stood immovable as a statue, and gazed on that fair,
but maddening scene. Gradually one after another
the dreadful uncle among the restretired from my view,
and Blanche and her young gallant were left alone to
continue
their half-whispered conversation. She happened to
look out in the direction of the place where I was standing,
and I supposed my eyeballs gleamed upon her like orbs
of fire. She started, and rose. What were the words
addressed
to her by the gentleman at her side, or what she
replied, I could not hear. But I saw her ineffectual
attempt
to smile, with lips as pale as marble, and I
supposed
she was striving to conceal the true cause of her
excitement
.
She came, followed by her attendant, towards
the window. I retreated across the street, and ascended the
steps of the arcade. When I turned, I saw them standing
on the iron balcony. Blanche had not lost sight of me.
Her eyes were doubtless still fixed upon the dim outline of
my form, when I paused within the shadow of one of the
arches. She could not be sure, but she evidently appeared
to think, that it was myself she gazed upon. She was
abstracted, while her friend seemed to become more
assiduous
in his attentions. It was a place well adapted for a
tender declaration, and I fancied that he was availing
himself
of the opportunity. Presently, I saw him make a
profound
bow, and withdraw from her presence, leaving her
alone. She did not turn her head when his parting words
were addressed to her, but continued to gaze in the
direction
of my position. Something whispered to me that she
had given my stranger rival his quietus, even while I
looked upon her. I felt a measure of relief from this
conviction
,
but did not dare to approach her. She knew of my
loss of fortune, but not of my present degradation. I could
not present myself in such a predicament. She might
scorn to recognize one who had thus abandoned himself
and I scorned to be either an object of pity, or a wretch to
make her a participator in my misfortunes. Resolving to
address her a letter, taking my final leave of her, at no
distant
day, I embraced an opportunity, when a company of
six or eight came by, to mingle with the crowd, and pursue
my lonely walk. After going some distance, I turned
aside, and observed that she still stood alone upon the
balcony
,
and that she still kept her face in its original
position
.
There I left her, and returned to the privacy of my
dreary room.
The next morning I took passage for another city. But
all cities were alike to me now, as I carried with me the
source of my misery. More than once I was seized with
utter despair, and hoped that death would put an end to
my sufferings before my scanty supply of money was
entirely
gone. I took cheap lodgings, so as to prolong my
means of payment until I should meet with some
unexpected
good fortune, or sink quietly into the grave.
Once or twice a precarious description of employment,
(I still rejected all other modes of making a living than with
my pendetermined to be a literary martyr)which a
generous and gifted literary friend, who still watched my
downward course, and desired my ultimate success, threw
in my way. These were the mere fitful resuscitations
preceding
eventual literary death.
Time dragged on in this manner, until spring, the season
that brought the western merchants eastward. It once
occurred
to me that I might replenish my finances, by seeking
them out. Not one, I felt sure, would refuse to lend me a
moderate sum of money. I had never known one to
refuse
.
But now I had reached the lowest round of my
downward
course, and why should I desire a prolongation of my
misery? I determined that I would do nothing myself, but
leave all to chance. And while I sat in my gloomy
apartment
,
and came to this conclusion, I felt a strange kind of
relief in my recklessness of the present, oblivion of the
past, and contempt of the future. I even laughed aloud
in the maniacal ecstasy of my strange exemption from the
tortures which had hitherto incessantly preyed upon my
mind. I then took up my pen to bid a final adieu to
BlancheI could not bear the thought of writing to my
mother. No, the letter to Blanche should be my last act.
I wrote fervently. I described everything just as it had
occurred. I told her how I had long admired, and then how
deeply I had loved her; not omitting to state my intention to
have declared myself in form, and solicited her hand, when
the fatal catastrophe scattered my money and my hopes to
the winds. I filled the sheet with my half-subdued ravings,
and closed with an eternal adieu. That she might not
know my address, I determined to dispatch the letter by a
private hand to Philadelphia, where it should be mailed.
I have said that I could not bear the thought of writing to
my mother. But my letter to Blanche, by touching a
mysterious
connecting link in my memory, produced some sad,
but not altogether painful fancies. The joys of my
childhood
rose in retrospection; and father, mother, Blanche,
were with me again. It was a moving panorama, and I
followed the vision. I re-perused the letters of Blanche,
which I still preserved. Once more my heart was partially
imbued with those Christian influences she always strove to
inculcate; and this led to the death-bed scene of my father
his dying wordsand my meditations at his grave.
I tore open the sealed letter and added a postscripta
faithful transcript of my sudden emotions, and concluded
by declaring that I would immediately seek the counsel of
some pious clergyman, and be guided by his advice; but
reiterated my intention never to presume to thrust my
unworthy
self again in her presence.
The counsel of the pious minister was freely accorded
me, and I determined as soon as I could become
prepared
,
to seek admission into the church, and die, as my
Christian father had done, with a full conviction of an
eternal future, and a firm hope of a happy existence in it.
A star, a far-off star of hope, now beamed upon my heart.
Its twinkling rays, at first feeble, and scarcely perceptible,
seemed to increase daily, until my heart became at length
fully illuminated with its glorious light. It was the star of
Bethlehem. My desires, my purposes, my disposition, all
were undergoing a change; and my state of abject misery
was being converted into a condition of hope, faith and
happiness. Hope, that I might be enabled to retrieve the
past; faith, that I had discovered the means of doing so;
happiness, in the conviction that if I performed my duty,
no evils could overwhelm me here, or assail me in the
life to come.
One day I was most unexpectedly confronted in the
street by my old friend, Elijah Sage. My first impulse
was to avoid him; but the next moment better thoughts
prevailed. He might know my history if he desired it.
But he had evidently heard it from others.
Luke, said he, taking my hand, I have a message,
as well as some information, for you. But you must first
promise me to get in the cars, which will start in fifteen
minutes for Philadelphia; and that, when there, you will
proceed directly to the counting-room of Messrs. Y.S. & K.
Will you promise?
I cannot, said I.
Why not?
To tell you the truth, I continued, I have not the
money I once possessed, and it is prudent for me to
observe
due economy in my expenditures. You know, as a
merchant, I should consider whether there is any profit
likely to be realized from the undertaking.
Elijah stared at me a moment, astonished at my
calmness
and my smile; and then pulling out his pocket-book,
told me to take what I wanted. I refused, and he stared
again.
How much have you? he asked.
Five dollars, after paying my board.
That will do, said he, putting his pocket-book back.
Then I stared at him. That will be sufficient to carry
you to Philadelphia. I say you will not lose by the trip.
Then I promise, said I. But what is this
information
?
What message have you?
You will find, at the counting-room named, a letter for
you from Norfolk, Va., marked `
immediate and important
.'
The message is from your brother Joseph, who is there.
He says
Never mind what he says, Elijah! I replied,
hurrying
away abruptly, without waiting for the message. I
paid the good old landlady the last stiver that I owed her,
and soon found myself on the way to Philadelphia,
thinking
of nothing but the letter. What could Blanche say in
reply to my final adieu? Would her letter also contain a
final adieu? Such thoughts alone occupied my mind.
Six hours sufficed to annihilate the space. I was met
at the front door of Y. S. & K.'s establishment, by Joseph,
and several western acquaintances. I rushed through them,
after brief salutations, and did not pause until I clutched
the letter. Then I strove to make my way out with as
little ceremony as I had observed on entering, but I was
forcibly detained by Joseph.
Luke, said he, are you mad?
I will be, Joseph, I fear, if you keep me a minute
from reading this letter, said I, struggling to depart.
Why not sit down and read it here? he inquired.
No, I must be alone, said I.
Now, Luke, said he, I think I can make you forget
all about the letter.
You can't, said I.
I can, said he. Your trunk has been found, and I
have brought it on with me, with your money safe.
You can't! I still repeated. But now I shall go
to your hotel instead of my old garret. Drive to the City
Hotel! said I, springing into a hackney coach, and
vanishing
with the letter in my hand.
When I was alone in my room, with trembling hands I
broke open the seal of the epistle.
Luke, said Blanche, if you have seen proper to
afflict
yourself without reason, it was cruel to afflict Blanche
also, who never did you any harm. And now, if you
persist
in dying, you may have the consolation, if the fact
can console you, of knowing that Blanche will die also,
murdered by you. * * * * You declare your love, and
announce
your purpose never to see me more. Would it
not have been generous to have withheld the declaration,
and left me in doubt? Luke, did you know that the
passion
was mutual? You have spoken plainly, at last; and
I will do so too. Never, since we first parted, no, never for
a moment, have I entertained the shadow of a thought that
I could or would bestow my hand on any other than
yourself
and
such is the case still. * * * * * Luke, I have
been addressed by several since we parted last, and all
have abandoned the pursuit on learning my purpose,
which I have frankly made known to them. My uncle
took me to the falls of Niagara, Saratoga Springs, and
divers other gay places last summer; but all in vain: he
found that it was impossible to wean me from my first
attachment. On my return, I pronounced my last positive
rejection of the suit of the one whom my uncle preferred.
Luke, we were standing on the balcony of a hotel in
23
Philadelphia, when he desired to know my decision. At
that moment I thought I beheld your pale features, and
that you cast upon me a look of reproach and sadness. A
monosyllable sufficed for my petitioner, and I did not even
have the curiosity to look after him, and observe how
deeply he was disappointed and piqued. I had eyes only
for the vision before me, if vision it was. I felt that
Providence
had linked our destinies together by adamantine
chains, and I had no disposition to rupture them if they
had been formed of a weaker material. Luke, was it you?
Oh, if it was, how cruel not to come and speak to me!
* * * * * * Luke, when I learned through the newspapers
of your loss on that terrible steamer, my mind was made
up. It was my fixed determination to place myself and
my little fortune in your keeping, if you desired it, as soon
as we met. How
could
you suppose that the loss of your
money might involve the loss of my affection? No, Luke,
you have not yet learned fully the character of Blanche.
In misfortune she will cling the more closely to you, and
be all the bolder in her ministrations of solace and
encouragement
.
* * * * *
Now I will surprise you. I have shown your letter to
my uncleall excepting the postscript, which pleased me
most, and formed the foundation of my present hopes. My
uncle sent away for your poem and novel, and read them
both before making any response. He then brought them
to me to read, with an air of pleasure. He said, although
he was no judge of the merits of such productions, yet as
he believed them to contain indications of respectable
talents, and of a
lofty ambition
, he announced his purpose
not to oppose our marriage, if such a thing should be desired
by us! Luke, how could he suppose you would
condescend
to desire any such thing? But such is the very
miraculous change in his views. The loss of your money,
although he is aware of it, has never been even alluded
to. So you see that his motives have never been
mercenary
.
For my part, Luke, I have not the pride and vanity
to desire you to consume your days and destroy your
health in quest of a mere name. I have no objections to
the pursuit of business. * * * * * * Yet you must not
understand
me as pronouncing an unqualified condemnation
of your books. If you write well, I should never object
to your writingonly I hope, if you should be disposed to
take up the pen in future, you will compose nothing but
what may be calculated, at least designed, to instruct and
benefit some portion of your fellow beings. * * * * * Now
I must close this
audacious
effusion. You must act as
your judgment will dictate on its reception.
Blanche
.
When Joseph, and several of my acquaintances from
the west, came to the hotel to look after me, they found me
at the door, about to get into a hack.
Where are you going, Luke? asked Joseph.
To Norfolk, said I.
What for?
To be married! said I, boldly. And I want you,
and all of you, to go with me.
Pshaw! said he. I'm afraid you are mad, past
recovery
.
But I am not, though. I must be off. Will you go
with me?
Why, said he, if you are really going to be married,
I am under an obligation to accompany you. You may
perhaps, recollect that you went to my wedding. I did
recollect itthe immersion and the toothache were
indelible
remembrancers.
But, he continued, you have not money enough to
pay the parson, nor to pay your expenses thither, nor to
buy a wedding suit. Miss Blanche, they say, has some
little fortune; but would it not be indelicate to draw upon
her purse
so soon?
This speech brought me to my senses. It was a
sensible
speech, and the plain truth. My entire wardrobe was
on my person, and there were only one or two dollars in
my pocket. So I gave up the trip for the present, and
made preparations to set out the next day.
I soon overhauled my trunk full of dollars. They were
black and rusty enough from the effects of their
submersion
.
Only one hundred dollars had been claimed as a
reward for fishing them up. After taking out a sufficient
sum to answer my purposes, I had the rest deposited in the
Philadelphia Bank, with a request for Mr. T., the cashier,
to invest the balance for sixty days, at six per cent., taking
good collateral security.
We arrived in safety at Norfolk, and I was again with
Blanche. * * * * * * Our silly speeches and actions I
will suppress, as matters too
personal
to be laid before the
public.
The very next day, at sunrise, the wedding party was
assembled before the chancel in the church, while the whole
town seemed to be present as witnesses. Every pew
below
,
and every seat in the galleries above, appeared to be
occupied. My old counselor and friend, Mr. T., gave me
away, while the terrible uncle officiated for Blanche. The
minister, in his sacerdotal garments, advanced and solemnly
performed the rites.
The moral of the past may be summed up in these
simple
words:
Adhere Steadfastly to your Business
.
Luke Shortfield
.
P.S. Blanche adds another moral:
Adhere Steadfastly to your First Love
.
The minister adds:
Adhere Steadfastly to the Church
.
THE END.Norfolk, Va.
,
Dec. 1st, 183-.
Dear Luke
:I cannot restrain myself any longer from
writing to you. Your last letter, informing me of your good
prospects, and of your intention to commence business for
yourself at Hanover, was directed to
me
, and not in an
envelope to a third personso it fell into the hands of
my guardian-uncle, and excited his wrath and indignation
to a frightful extent. But the worst of it was that he did
not tell me what it was all about, but kept the letter
himself
.
Now, I am my own mistress, and have some fortune
here in old Virginia in my own right. I might at any time
13
relieve myself of his supervision, and his eccentric
solicitude
.
Yet as my uncles are the nearest of kin that I have,
I hope to be able to avoid a rupture with them. But to
my narration. A few days after your letter fell into his
hands, he announced his intention to take me to Virginia,
and leave me under the protection of his brother, my uncle
Edgar Beaufort. Not being aware of the cause which
induced
this step on his part, I was delighted with the idea
of going back to old Virginia, and so I readily agreed to
his proposition, without paying any particular attention to
his remarks about the opportunity the change would afford
me of marrying some one of my own station, equal in birth
and fortune.
We set out at the time appointed, and I had a very
pleasant trip of it. My uncle became very indulgent as we
progressed eastward, and seemed disposed to gratify all my
wishes. We visited Philadelphia, New York, the Saratoga
Springs, and even the Falls of Niagara, before we turned
southward. He took me to balls, theatres, concerts, &c.,
and really seemed to be anxious for me to contract an
`eligible match,' as he termed it. But I fell in love with
nobodyand if any one fell in love with me, I never
heard of it. And as for the places of amusement, you
know I have no partiality for them. I always enjoyed
myself much better on Sundays at church. You have no
idea, Luke, how I was charmed to find myself within the
walls of a real church again. I was baptized and reared
in this (the Episcopal) church, and have an
inextinguishable
affection for it.
At last we reached Virginia, and as I was never partial
to the country, I obtained the consent of my uncle to board
in this pleasant city. I had not been located here more
than a month before I ascertained, for the first time, the
cause of my removal to the east. One of my servant
women, living with uncle Edgar, who is the laundress of
his family, and whom I had taught to read, discovered your
letter to me in the pocket of my uncle's vest. She saw it
was addressed to me, and determined I should have it. So
when she came to town on the ensuing Saturday to bring
my clothes, she handed it to me. Of course it explained
everythingthe reason of my removal, my uncle's anxiety
for me to make an `eligible match,' my pleasant tour, and
all. I am really obliged to you for all this kindness, and
you have my sincere thanks.
But why should your innocent epistle produce such a
commotion with my uncle? You have never made a
declaration of love to me, nor have I ever breathed or
written a word which might lead any one to suppose that I
had a passion for you. We have merely corresponded as
friends. We have been associates, it is true, and have
esteemed each other. Because I did not drop your
acquaintance
,
like some others, when misfortune reduced your
family from affluence, I don't see why they should suppose
I intended to marry you. I have some pride of family,
as well as my uncles; but I cannot perceive anything
derogatory
in reciprocating the friendship of a schoolmate
who happens to be poor, so long as he aspires to rise in
the world by industry, and rectitude of moral conduct.
Your letter to me did not demand a reply, and perhaps
it would have been forgotten by both of us by this time,
if my uncle had given it to me and said nothing about it.
Perhaps by this time we might have forgotten one another,
and you would have ultimately married (as you probably
will), that brazen Miss Polly something, whom your brother
has written about to Kentucky, and I might have formed
an `eligible match,' some of these days, to the entire `
contentation
,'
as Queen Elizabeth would say, of my very
particular
brace of uncles. But I do not like to be watched,
suspected, and kept in leading-strings, as if I were
incapable
of conducting myself with propriety; and so I have
a disposition to give my uncles a taste of my qualityby
refusing every match they make for me, and finally to
choose for myself, provided I should ever marry.
Now I do not propose to marry
you
understand that.
But you are good-looking enough to be a
beau
, and your
studies, incessantly pursued, have made you an intelligent
correspondent. Now if you were only, through conviction,
a member of
the church
, I could hold free converse with
youand if you were so disposed,
I would do so
, in spite
of my uncles. I will do so, as it is, to a limited extent,
provided you will read the works I enjoin. And what is
more, without farther preface, I
tender
you my promise
not to consent to any `eligible match,' before I see you
not meaning that there is any probability of ever making a
bargain `for better, for worse' with you. But I like the
idea of a correspondence, and it will afford me great
pleasure to hear of your success in everything you
undertake
.
And rest assured that, notwithstanding I have some
of the `high notions' of my uncles in regard to families,
I shall never consider any honorable pursuit, by which
you may acquire wealth, as disgraceful, or as rendering
you unworthy of my esteem. Be industrious, be honorable,
and, if possible, be religious, is the counsel of your old
friend,
Blanche
.Norfolk
,
March 11th, 183-.
Luke
, if you come to see me, remember it is merely
the careless passing visit of a friend. There is a
Methodist
meeting house near the  hotel, in which they are
holding a protracted meeting. If you follow a merry little
old woman (you will know her by her shouting in the
meeting
house) to her broading-house, you will find me. My
uncle is here, and might be harsh if he met you. Should
you meet, you must not resent anything he may say, and
above all, have no hostile collision with him. You must
register a promise in heaven to do as I bid, before starting
hitherward; else you have not my permission to come.
Remember
Blanche
.Sir
In violation of the expressed desire of my brother,
you have persisted in addressing letters to my niece; you
have not only done that, but you have had the
presumption
to seek and obtain a clandestine interview with her.
Being her next of kin, and natural protector, I deem it
incumbent
on me to demand, in this formal manner, the
satisfaction
which one gentleman has a right to require of another
(and which no gentleman can refuse), for such an intrusive
disregard of the wishes expressed by my brother, and
endorsed
by myself.
My friend, Col. S., will arrange the preliminaries with
the friend you may be pleased to select to officiate in your
behalf.
I am, sir, with all due consideration, your obedient
servant
,
E. Beaufort
.Dear Sir
I am at No. 6,  hotel, an entire stranger,
and have received a challenge from Mr. E. Beaufort to
meet him in mortal combat. I have never seen Mr.
Beaufort
before to-day, and certainly never insulted or injured
him. If you will consent to give me the benefit of your
advice in the premises, I will avail myself of the opportunity
to relate all the circumstances of the case to you.
Respectfully, your obedient servant,
Luke Shortfield
.Luke
:The servant who hands you this, belongs to
me, and has informed me that my uncle has challenged
you to mortal combat. He says he heard my uncle tell
his friends that he liked your appearance so much, he was
almost sorry that he had quarreled with you, and that if
you behaved well on the field, he would tender you his
friendship, after an exchange of shots, which he hoped
might have no serious result. Now, Luke, are you
willing
to fight for me? You have never said you desired to
have me, nor I that I was at your service. I desire it to
be distinctly understood by you, as it is sufficiently by
him, that I am not at the disposal of my uncle. I am of
age, and am my own mistress. My uncle is kind to me
in my presence, and never seeks to control my actions.
Should I make an unworthy alliance, the worst thing he
could do, or would have a desire to attempt, would be to
abandon my society. You now understand the relation in
which we stand. I do not, however, wish to break with
my uncle. He is generous, brave, and magnanimous; and
of course it would wound me past recovery if you, my
friend, should slay him in a duel. Thus you see that, by
acceding to his proposition, to obtain his friendship, you
would lose mine. Of that you may be assured. If you
resolve to meet him, I resolve never to see you again. You
must choose between him and me. But if you determine
to accede to my request, and depart without a collision with
him, you have my promise that, at a future day, should
it be your pleasure, you can see me again, unchanged
in every particular.
Blanche
.Sir
:I have the honor to acknowledge the receipt of
your note of this morning. In reply, I have to state that,
inasmuch as no definite proposal has been made by me to
your niece, and as my engagements will demand my
unintermitting
presence at a point some two thousand miles
distant from this, for at least a year to come, I must
decline
the meeting you demand, at least for the present.
Should fortune bring me again in the vicinity of your niece,
at some future day, and it should then be your pleasure to
renew the demand, that will be the proper time for me to
announce my final decision.
Very respectfully,
Your obedient servant,
L. S.Luke, said Blanche, if you have seen proper to
afflict
yourself without reason, it was cruel to afflict Blanche
also, who never did you any harm. And now, if you
persist
in dying, you may have the consolation, if the fact
can console you, of knowing that Blanche will die also,
murdered by you. * * * * You declare your love, and
announce
your purpose never to see me more. Would it
not have been generous to have withheld the declaration,
and left me in doubt? Luke, did you know that the
passion
was mutual? You have spoken plainly, at last; and
I will do so too. Never, since we first parted, no, never for
a moment, have I entertained the shadow of a thought that
I could or would bestow my hand on any other than
yourself
and
such is the case still. * * * * * Luke, I have
been addressed by several since we parted last, and all
have abandoned the pursuit on learning my purpose,
which I have frankly made known to them. My uncle
took me to the falls of Niagara, Saratoga Springs, and
divers other gay places last summer; but all in vain: he
found that it was impossible to wean me from my first
attachment. On my return, I pronounced my last positive
rejection of the suit of the one whom my uncle preferred.
Luke, we were standing on the balcony of a hotel in
23
Philadelphia, when he desired to know my decision. At
that moment I thought I beheld your pale features, and
that you cast upon me a look of reproach and sadness. A
monosyllable sufficed for my petitioner, and I did not even
have the curiosity to look after him, and observe how
deeply he was disappointed and piqued. I had eyes only
for the vision before me, if vision it was. I felt that
Providence
had linked our destinies together by adamantine
chains, and I had no disposition to rupture them if they
had been formed of a weaker material. Luke, was it you?
Oh, if it was, how cruel not to come and speak to me!
* * * * * * Luke, when I learned through the newspapers
of your loss on that terrible steamer, my mind was made
up. It was my fixed determination to place myself and
my little fortune in your keeping, if you desired it, as soon
as we met. How
could
you suppose that the loss of your
money might involve the loss of my affection? No, Luke,
you have not yet learned fully the character of Blanche.
In misfortune she will cling the more closely to you, and
be all the bolder in her ministrations of solace and
encouragement
.
* * * * *
Now I will surprise you. I have shown your letter to
my uncleall excepting the postscript, which pleased me
most, and formed the foundation of my present hopes. My
uncle sent away for your poem and novel, and read them
both before making any response. He then brought them
to me to read, with an air of pleasure. He said, although
he was no judge of the merits of such productions, yet as
he believed them to contain indications of respectable
talents, and of a
lofty ambition
, he announced his purpose
not to oppose our marriage, if such a thing should be desired
by us! Luke, how could he suppose you would
condescend
to desire any such thing? But such is the very
miraculous change in his views. The loss of your money,
although he is aware of it, has never been even alluded
to. So you see that his motives have never been
mercenary
.
For my part, Luke, I have not the pride and vanity
to desire you to consume your days and destroy your
health in quest of a mere name. I have no objections to
the pursuit of business. * * * * * * Yet you must not
understand
me as pronouncing an unqualified condemnation
of your books. If you write well, I should never object
to your writingonly I hope, if you should be disposed to
take up the pen in future, you will compose nothing but
what may be calculated, at least designed, to instruct and
benefit some portion of your fellow beings. * * * * * Now
I must close this
audacious
effusion. You must act as
your judgment will dictate on its reception.
Blanche
.Adhere Steadfastly to your Business
.
Luke Shortfield
.
P.S. Blanche adds another moral:
Adhere Steadfastly to your First Love
.
The minister adds:
Adhere Steadfastly to the Church
.